Authors
Christian Pyle
Number of Reviews
87

Title
Review for Bringing Out the Dead (1999)
Another driver, a very different kind of taxi.  The latest collaboration of
screenwriter Paul Schrader and director Martin Scorsese inevitably brings to
mind  their first, 1976's "Taxi Driver."  Like cabby Travis Bickle, paramedic
Frank Pierce (Nicolas Cage) cruises New York City on the graveyard shift and
has a front-row seat for all the misery and depravity those mean streets can
offer.  Like Travis, Frank is drawn to a woman he wants to save, and both men
also seek to redeem themselves - Travis through violence, Frank through
healing.
Frank suffers from burnout.  He hasn't saved anyone in months, and the ghost of
a homeless girl (Cynthia Roman) who died because of his mistakes pursues Frank
with accusations.  He has become convinced that his purpose is not to save
lives but to serve as a "grief mop."  Some of the grief he mops early in the
movie belongs to Mary Burke (Patricia Arquette) whose estranged father has
suffered a heart attack.  After Frank restarts Mr. Burke's heart, the old man
is transferred to the hospital, where Mary will be found holding vigil when
Frank returns again and again with other patients.  In Mary, a recovering drug
addict, Frank finds a fellow lost soul.
Frank is partnered with a variety of paramedics whose reactions to the carnage
differ from his:  Larry (John Goodman) seems unconcerned and dreams of starting
his own ambulance service, Marcus (Ving Rhames) puts his faith in Jesus and
calls on Frank to do likewise, and Tom (Tom Sizemore) is a violent bigot who
thrives on blood and pain.  Wandering through it all as pale and dazed as the
living dead, Frank explores various routes in search of his own peace,
including drugs from Mary's dealer (Cliff Curtis) and a destructive rampage
with a baseball bat.  Every night Frank begs his boss to fire him, yet he will
not quit.  His eventual redemption is heavily ironic and raises more questions
than it resolves.
Of the many resurrections of the 1970s in recent years, "Bringing Out the Dead"
is the most welcome.  When Scorsese closed that decade with "Raging Bull" (also
from a Schrader screenplay), he seemed to exhaust the style and themes that had
produced not only "Taxi Driver" but also "Mean Streets" and "Alice Doesn't Live
Here Anymore."  Since then he's successfully explored a wide range of genres
including offbeat comedy ("The King of Comedy" and "After Hours"), gangsters
("GoodFellas" and "Casino"), and period pieces ("The Age of Innocence" and
"Kundun").  Now Scorsese returns to familiar turf with the varied skills of a
seasoned director.  With dizzying cinematography and editing, the filmmakers
successfully depict Frank's interior world.
Frank Pierce is Cage's most challenging role since "Leaving Las Vegas," and he
proves again that he is a substantial actor. "Bringing Out the Dead" is also
the first film real-life spouses Cage and Arquette have made together.  Their
romantic scenes seem touchingly genuine.  The entire cast gives strong
performances from start to finish.  It's especially nice that Rhames is getting
to demonstrate his acting range; too many of his most prominent roles have been
criminals and thugs.
Bottom Line:  Scorsese and Schrader are an unbeatable combination.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Road Trip (2000)
"Road Trip" is this year's offering to the audience of "There's Something About
Mary" and "American Pie."  Its hero, Josh Porter (Breckin Meyer), attends the
University of Ithaca, New York, while his sweetheart since childhood, Tiffany
(Rachel Blanchard of TV's "Clueless"), goes to the University of Texas at
Austin.  Tiffany hasn't returned any of his calls for awhile, and Josh worries
that she's dumping him for someone else.  He records a video-taped plea for her
attention and asks a friend to mail it.  Later, after hearing that Tiffany
isn't sleeping in her dorm room, Josh succumbs to the advances of Beth (Amy
Smart) and allows her to tape their erotic exploits.  Of course, the wrong
video tape is mailed to Texas, and the road trip is on.  Desperate to retrieve
the tape before Tiffany sees it, Josh sets out to Texas with three companions:
the overly sexed E. L. (Seann William Scott), the overly neurotic Rubin (Paulo
Costanzo), and the overly virginal Kyle (D. J. Qualls).  
Meanwhile, Barry (Tom Green), a space cadet who's been at Ithaca for seven
years, is in charge of feeding a small mouse to Rubin's pet snake.  He's
obsessed with the sick thrill of feeding one live animal to another, and this
chore occupies his attention for most of the movie.  When Beth comes around
looking for Josh, Barry tells her Josh went to see Tiffany in "Austin,
Massachusetts."  Thinking that he means Boston, Beth sets out on a road trip of
her own.  A fourth storyline:  Kyle's domineering dad (Fred Ward) believes that
Kyle has been kidnapped and follows the trail of Josh and the boys.  A fifth: 
a creepy graduate student (Anthony Rapp) who's stalking Beth plots to keep Josh
from passing philosophy.
I remember seeing an interview with Mike Myers about the making of "Wayne's
World."  He said when they finished filming it, it was too short.  So they put
together some more stuff, and it was still too short.  So they put together
some more stuff . . .  A similar process probably followed Todd Phillips and
Scot Armstrong's idea to make a movie about a bunch of guys on a road trip
where funny stuff happens.  Their screenplay seems to follow the "Wayne's
World" model of padding out a thin plot by adding gags.  The material in "Road
Trip" that actually develops the plot or the characters is sparse.  Josh and
his posse make detours as unlikely as selling semen, visiting Barry's
grandparents, and bluffing their way into an all-black fraternity.
The good news:  all those gags that seem thrown in are really funny.  I laughed
throughout the movie, especially during Barry's attempts at feeding the snake
and during a scene where the boys decide to jump Kyle's car over a collapsed
bridge.  If you enjoy the "Something About Mary" style of comedy, you'll have a
good time watching "Road Trip."
Given Tom Green's prominence in the trailers and posters, his fans might expect
his character to be the protagonist or to at least be included in the titular
road trip.  However, despite the fact that his scenes have nothing to do with
the main plot, "Road Trip" cuts back to him frequently, and he provides more
than his share of laughs.  In addition to the snake-feeding subplot, Barry
appears in a framing sequence in which he relates the tale of the road trip to
a group of prospective students.
The boyish and bony D. J. Qualls will emerge as an unlikely favorite of
audiences because his character Kyle is irresistibly sweet and is also the only
character that is developed during the course of the movie.  The actor who
plays the hero, Breckin Meyer, who previously appeared in "Clueless" and "Go,"
brings little to the party.  Josh is a bland rendition of "typical college
guy."  He has surprisingly little emotional involvement in the love triangle at
the center of the plot; he seems to be with Tiffany out of habit and with Beth
for purely physical reasons.  
Bottom line:  Lots of laughs if you if you don't need frills like a plot or
character development.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Shaft (2000)
There's a new Shaft in town, kids, and he's pissed.  In an update to the 
still-popular 1970's Shaft franchise, NYPD detective John Shaft (Samuel L. 
Jackson) arrests preppie Walter Wade (Christian Bale of "American Psycho") 
for bashing a black man's brains out in a racist rage.  Wade skips bail and 
runs off to Switzerland, while Shaft is exiled to a precinct in the slums for 
punching Wade.  Two years later, Shaft is fighting the local drug lord, 
Peoples Hernandez (Jeffrey Wright of "Basquiat"), when Wade comes back to 
town.  To save his butt, Wade hires Peoples to kill the only witness to the 
murder (Toni Collette of "The Sixth Sense").  Shaft has to find her first 
while fighting off corrupt cops (Dan Hedaya and Ruben Santiago-Hudson) and 
Peoples' thugs.  He gets a little help from a fellow cop (Vanessa L. 
Williams) and a comedy sidekick (Busta Rhymes).
The new "Shaft" is not a remake of the 1971 original.  Wisely, the filmmakers 
take a "next generation" approach.  Jackson's John Shaft is the nephew of the 
original, and "Uncle J." (Richard Roundtree) is still an anti-establishment 
private eye and is still cool after almost 30 years.  Gordon Parks, the 
director of the original "Shaft," also makes a cameo appearance (sitting in a 
bar with John Singleton, the director of the new flick), and Isaac Hayes 
contributes a new rendition of the classic theme song.
So how does the Y2K Shaft measure up?  He's certainly "the cat who won't cop 
out when there's danger all about."  Jackson's Shaft is even more tenacious 
and driven than Roundtree's.  He's also "a bad mutha" (shut yo' mouth) who 
doesn't mind breaking a suspect's nose or pistol-whipping a street punk.  But 
he's not a "black private dick" or a "sex machine with all the chicks."  
Shaft Jr. seems to remain a quasi-cop even after quitting the force in 
disgust, and he does only a token bit of sex-machining.  Of course, 
Roundtree's Shaft lived in the hedonistic 70's (and still does -- in one shot 
Uncle J. leaves a bar with a chick under each arm), while his nephew lives in 
the post-AIDS era of caution.  The potential romance with Officer Carmen 
(Williams) never comes off either, and she seems strangely like the sexless 
"girl Friday" characters who aided 40's detectives.  Still, the new Shaft is 
every bit as suave as his namesake and even more sensitive.  He's "a 
complicated man, and no one understands him":  the new Shaft is a compelling 
mixture of streetwisdom and naďve idealism, anger and compassion.
I was worried that this addition to the Shaft series would be an overblown 
80's-style action flick in the "Die Hard" tradition with a band of 
international terrorists taking over something and gigantic explosions 
aplenty.  Luckily, Singleton and screenwriter Richard Price stay true to 
Shaft as a neighborhood hero.  The bad guys are a rich punk with a bad temper 
and "a two-bit three-block drug dealer," but they provide enough trouble for 
Shaft to keep the action coming.  
At first glance, "Shaft" seems an unusual venture for Singleton, whose four 
previous films ("Boyz N the Hood," "Poetic Justice," "Higher Learning," and 
"Rosewood") were all high-minded dramas on serious racial subjects.  But his 
foray into the summer action genre also has more serious overtones.  The 
world Singleton depicts is filled with racism and corruption, both embodied 
by the white characters and by institutions like the police force and the 
courts.  The political content does not distract from the action, but instead 
gives it a deeper texture by contextualizing Shaft's righteous anger.  
"Shaft" is not only a worthy addition to the 70's series; it's the best of 
the lot.  The story is much tighter and moves faster; the direction is slick 
and skillful.  The performances by Jackson, Bale and Wright are stupendous.  
This is sure to be the crowd-pleaser of the summer.
Bottom line:  Shaft is back, damn right!
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Return to Me (2000)
Because no one demanded it:  David Duchovny in a romantic comedy!  At last,
both his romantic magnetism and his comedic brilliance are mined for all their
resources!  The choice of Duchovny may have something to do with the plot,
which could be fodder for a Valentine's Day episode of "The X-Files."  Bob
Rueland (David Duchovny) loses his wife Elizabeth (Joely Richardson) in a car
accident.  At the same time, Grace Briggs (Minnie Driver) is in the hospital,
waiting for a heart transplant.  Grace gets Elizabeth's heart, and it leads her
to Bob.  It's the romantic equivalent of all those horror films where someone
gets a transplant from a serial killer and then is driven to slaughter people.
Four writers are credited with contributing to the story.  That doesn't seem
possible.  Despite being a solid two hours long, "Return to Me" adds little to
the "boy meets girl / boy loses girl" formula and, as a result, is terribly
tedious and slow-moving.  Duchovny and Driver seem unable to generate any
sparks, and I kept wishing for a fast-forward button to move their scenes
along.  Since Driver has managed to work well in romantic roles before, I blame
Duchovny.  He's out of his element without the manufactured and static sexual
tension of his TV series (and I've always thought that the relationship between
Mulder and Scully on "The X-Files" comes off more sibling-like than
hot-and-bothered).  There's something about Duchovny that makes me uneasy. 
Regardless of the role he's playing, he comes off as a weirdo.
The only redeeming quality of "Return to Me" is its hilarious supporting cast. 
The circle of friends and relatives around Bob and Grace is constantly playing
matchmaker, and they generate the only laughs in the movie.  Carroll O'Connor
is Grace's grandfather Marty O'Reilly.  When Bob comes into Marty's restaurant
after hours, Marty immediately begins quizzing Bob about his marital status. 
When Marty discovers that Bob is a widower, he invites Bob to join his poker
game and introduces him with the declaration, "This is Bob!  His wife is dead!"
 The poker buddies are just as desperate to find a mate for Grace and greet Bob
enthusiastically when they hear the news.
Also funny: Bonnie Hunt as Grace's best friend Megan and James Belushi as
Megan's husband Joe.  Married with children, Megan and Joe provide a useful
counterpoint by showing the mundane results of romance.  Although it's rare to
see him in a movie that premieres in a theater, Belushi delivers his lines with
great comic skill.  Rounding out the impressive supporting cast are David Alan
Grier as Bob's best friend and Robert Loggia as Marty's brother-in-law Angelo. 
In only the lead actors lived up to the standards set by the rest of the cast.
Bottom line:  If you are compelled to see this movie, watch it on video so you
can fast-forward to scenes with Carroll O'Connor and James Belushi.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Shanghai Noon (2000)
It seemed like a good idea:  import the superstars of Hong Kong's successful
action films and put them in American action movies.  So far, though, the
Hollywood efforts of Jackie Chan, Chow Yun-Fat, Jet Li, and director John Woo
have failed to measure up to their work in Hong Kong.  Chan, the most popular
member of the group with American audiences, is the most difficult to fit to an
American genre.  Why?  Because Hollywood doesn't make "Jackie Chan movies." 
The closest equivalent America has had to Chan's unique style were the silent
comedies of Buster Keaton.  In the films of both Chan and Keaton, the emphasis
is on "gags" (stunts) that are simultaneously thrilling, hilarious, and
graceful while the lead character is reduced to a simple persona that the star
plays in every movie and the plot is a loosely woven justification for the
gags.  Ironically, therefore, Chan may have found a better fit with the
Hollywood of the 1920's than with Hollywood today.  When sound came in, they
stopped making "Buster Keaton movies" and could not find a niche for the
stone-faced star.   There was even a disastrous attempt to pair Keaton with
Jimmy Durante in a series of sound comedies.  Some seventy years later, Chan
has found himself with the same sort of awkward mismatch as Hollywood has
inserted him into two "buddy movies":  1998's "Rush Hour" and the new "Shanghai
Noon."
As in "Rush Hour," Chan's character has come to America from the East to save a
kidnapped woman.  This time around it's 1881, and imperial guardsman Chon Wang
(Jackie Chan) is part of a contingent from China's Forbidden City to deliver a
ransom of 100,000 pieces of gold to a mission in Carson City, Nevada, and
retrieve Princess Pei Pei (Lucy Liu).  The princess thought she was escaping
China and an loathsome arranged marriage when she was betrayed and found
herself kidnapped instead by Lo Fong (Roger Yuan), a former member of the
Imperial Guard who was exiled for treason.  Chon gets separated from his
comrades when Roy O'Bannon (Owen Wilson) and his gang rob their train. 
O'Bannon is also cut adrift when he's double-crossed by a new member of the
gang (Walt Goggins).  After some initial fighting and a detour or two, Chon and
Roy team-up to find the princess.  Along the way, they have to fend off Lo
Fong, Marshal Van Cleef (Xander Berkeley) and his posse, and the other imperial
guards (Cui Ya Hi, Rong Guang Yu, and Eric Chen).
References to classic westerns abound.  Chon Wang sounds like John Wayne when
pronounced with Chan's accent ("That's an awful cowboy name," responds Roy). 
Berkeley is made up to look like his character's namesake, Lee Van Cleef, who
starred alongside Clint Eastwood in "The Good, The Bad, and The Ugly."  There's
a well-executed homage at the end to "Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid," as
well.  To its credit, "Shanghai Noon" avoids cliches, for the most part.  (I
assumed there'd be a runaway stagecoach in there somewhere, but there wasn't.) 
At one point, Roy even rejects a cliche.  Roy and Chon are in jail, and Chon
suggests, "I'll pretend to be sick."  Roy replies, "Does that still work in
China?  Because, I gotta tell you, in America it's been done to death."
The way they do break out of the cell is one of the funniest moments in the
movie.  There's another sidesplitting scene when the guys get drunk in a
cathouse.  Other than those two scenes, there were more laughs in the outtakes
at the end than in the movie itself.  Like "Rush Hour," the script for
"Shanghai Noon" is thin and uneven.  There are lots of gaps that left me
scratching my head.  For example, at one point Chon has climbed to the top of a
snow-capped mountain with more of the same stretching before him.  Cut to Chon
by a stream near a forest.  What happened to the mountains?  Another
befuddlement:  for some reason, Van Cleef and Lo Fong think that Roy has the
ransom gold, but the gold was never stolen.  The other guardsmen have it
throughout the movie.  Only the most minimal gestures are made towards
character development.  One central character, a Native American woman Chon
mistakenly marries (Brandon Merrill), is so underdeveloped that the closing
credits refer to her simply as "Indian wife."  Normally we expect a lack of
plot and character development in a "Jackie Chan movie"; plots and characters
exist only to link the stunts and fight scenes together.  However, when Chan
goes out of his own genre and into an American buddy pic, the requirements of
the latter genre and the sparseness of the fast-paced action sequences of
Chan's Cantonese features makes the plot much more important.  The feeble
scripts of "Rush Hour" and "Shanghai Noon" would likely be rejected by any
popular American action hero, but producers probably think, "Hey, Jackie's
movies don't have plots anyway."
Despite it all, Chan is still Chan.  There are some wonderfully inventive fight
scenes where Chan gets to strut his stuff, and he has a lot of fun with
western-themed props like tomahawks and six-guns.  The best moment:  he
fashions a weapon out of a horseshoe and a rope.  However, if this were a real
"Jackie Chan movie," there would be a lot more of these moments, and the movie
would be a lot more fun.  I hope the next time Chan goes west, he travels by
way of Hong Kong.
Bottom line:  It's "Rush Hour 2: The Early Years."  
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Sixth Sense, The (1999)
The Sixth Sense
Written and Directed by M. Night Shyamalan
Starring Bruce Willis, Haley Joel Osment, Toni Collette, Olivia Williams
Official Site:  http://movies.go.com/sixthsense/index.html
Grade: A-
When I saw the trailer for "The Sixth Sense," I didn't expect much from it.  My
snap judgment was that it was a watered-down version of "The Shining" or
possibly a late-entry in the glut of angel-related movies/TV shows of a couple
years ago.  But all the buzz motivated me to give it a shot.  It turned out to
be one of the most satisfying movie experiences of the year.
Bruce Willis plays child psychologist Malcolm Crowe.  At the beginning of the
movie, he is admiring an award the city has given him for his work, but he is
soon confronted by Vincent, a patient Malcolm failed years earlier (Donnie
Wahlberg-former New Kid-in an impressive cameo).  A year passes, and Malcolm is
treating another child with the same symptoms Vincent displayed.  Cole Sear
(Haley Joel Osment) is a withdrawn kid who is called "Freak" by the other boys
in the neighborhood.  Weird things seem to happen around Cole-his mother
(Olivia Williams) leaves the kitchen for a moment and returns to find every
cabinet and drawer open even though Cole hasn't moved-and Cole seems to know
things that a kid his age shouldn't-for example, that there was once a gallows
in his school.  He steals religious icons from churches to build a chapel in a
pup tent in his bedroom.
The trailer gave away the movie's first major plot twist.  If it hadn't, the
first hour of the movie would be more engrossing because we wouldn't know
what's wrong with Cole.  If you're lucky enough to have not seen the trailer,
stop reading this review right now and go see "The Sixth Sense."
Anyway, since the trailer gave it away, I figure it's fair game to discuss
here.  Once Malcolm gains Cole's trust, Cole reveals his secret:  he sees
ghosts everywhere.  Dead people wander around not knowing that they're dead,
invisible to everyone except Cole.  Malcolm gradually begins to realize that
Cole is telling the truth.
The box office success of "The Sixth Sense" has generated a lot of press about
how horror movies rule the box office this year and lots of theories about why
that's so.  I hate to burst anybody's bubble, but "The Sixth Sense" isn't
really a horror film.  At its core, "The Sixth Sense" is a touching story of
how a troubled kid and an emotionally-scarred adult help each other to move
past their problems.  Some scenes with the ghosts are wonderfully creepy,
though.  One that really got to me:  the ghost of a boy says to Cole, "I'll
show you where my dad keeps his gun"; when the ghost turns, we see the bullet
wound in the back of his head.
Osment gives the best performance I've ever seen from a child actor.  It's hard
enough to find a grown-up in Hollywood who can give a subtle, realistic
portrayal!  Although Willis gets top billing, Cole is really the protagonist of
the story, and Osment truly brings the complex kid to life.  If only Willis'
work were as impressive.  Accustomed to delivering catchphrases rather than
dialogue, Willis is stiff and awkward as Malcolm, his most challenging role to
date.  (This is a bad omen for his next movie, "The Story of Us," which
chronicles the ups and downs of a marriage).
Writer/Director M. Night Shyamalan has a light, poetic touch that goes to the
heart of the viewer without seeming sappy or trite.  He's also a skillful
storyteller, as the movie's ending demonstrates.  Only when the final secret is
revealed do you realize that Shyamalan has been hinting at it throughout the
movie.  Look for a cameo by the director as a doctor who treats Cole.
Bottom line:  Osment should get an Oscar nomination, and you should go see this
movie.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Major League: Back to the Minors (1998)
1989's "Major League" was a delightful surprise.  I didn't expect much of it
when I decided to watch it on cable, but it proved to be fresh and funny. 
However, when the appeal of a movie is its freshness, the sequels are virtually
guaranteed to be stale.  That's certainly true of "Major League II" and the
most recent entry, "Major League:  Back to the Minors."
The title is, of course, a contradiction.  Shouldn't it be "Minor League?" 
That contradiction suggests the lengths to which writer/director John Warren
has gone to squeeze a third movie out of the formula established by the first
movie.  Original stars Charlie Sheen and Tom Berenger (who returned for "Major
League II") are not around, leaving Corbin Bernsen the only original headliner
to make the third movie.  The other veterans who return (Dennis Haysbert as
voodoo-inspired batter Cerrano and Takaaki Ishibashi as Tanaka, who was
introduced in "League II") seem to be around just to lend legitimacy to the
enterprise.  The only returning cast member who produces any laughs is Bob
Uecker as radio announcer Harry Doyle, inexplicably broadcasting the games of a
minor league team far from his home turf.
The protagonist this time around is retiring pitcher Gus Cantrell (Scott
Bakula), who is hired by Minnesota Twins owner Roger Dorn (Bernsen) to manage
the Twins' AAA team, the Buzz.  You can write the movie from here:  he finds a
group of misfits who need to learn how to play together as a team in order to
win.  There's a future superstar whose ego keeps him from growing (Walton
Goggins), an ex-ballet dancer (Kenneth Johnson), a broken-down old timer (Thom
Barry), twin outfielders both named Juan (the DiFilippo triplets), and a couple
pitchers with throwing problems (Judson Mills and Peter Mackenzie).  Along the
way, Gus picks up Cerrano and Tanaka (Gus is supposedly an old teammate of
theirs, even though he wasn't in either of the preceding films).  Sum total: 
none.  The entire enterprise is artificial, and the cast is not ready for the
Hollywood majors.
Gus' antagonist is Twins manager Leonard Huff (Ted McGinley).  Leonard is a
slimy, sniveling little egotist, and the Twins are lazy, spoiled, and full of
themselves.  (Even watching the first movie I wondered why any real-life team
would lend itself to being caricatured in this manner).  Gus challenges Leonard
to a match, the Buzz vs. the Twins.  (Wanna guess who wins?)
"Back to the Minors" is a movie that has no reason to exist.  There's hardly a
laugh in it, the cast is weak, and the first movie left no room for even one
sequel.  
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
.">http://www.wpd.net/madreview/>.

Title
Review for Drowning Mona (2000)
Welcome to the tiny hamlet of Verplank, NY, where everyone drives a Yugo with
vanity plates.  (If you drove a Yugo, would you want to advertise the fact?) 
The most hated woman in town, Mona Dearly (Bette Midler), just took a fatal
plunge into the lake.  The cause:  cut brake lines.  Suspects?  There's her
husband Phil (William Fichtner) who's having an affair with waitress Rona Mace
(Jamie Lee Curtis).  Or her dimwitted son Jeff (or Jeph, it's spelled one way
on his vanity plates and another on his key chain) (Marcus Thomas) who lost his
right hand to Mona's anger.  How about Jeff's partner Bobby Calzone (Casey
Affleck)?  Jeff and Mona were destroying his landscaping business.  Don't
forget Bobby's fiancee Ellen Rash (Neve Campbell); if Bobby's business sinks,
so does her future.  Sorting it all out is Police Chief Wyatt Rash (Danny
DeVito), Ellen's father.
That seems like a promising set-up for a murder mystery, but the clues are
painfully obvious to interpret.  However, the inscrutable Chief Rash seems slow
to see the connections.  Screenwriter Peter Steinfeld rejects suspense in his
quest for quirky humor.  Sometimes he hits the target, more often he misses. 
Steinfeld also sacrifices the believability of characters.  He seems to plot
the movie by asking at each juncture "What's the goofiest plot twist I can
throw in here?" rather than "What would this character do here?"
The cast works hard to make the deliberately odd script work.  Neve Campbell
was especially good.  She seems to have been invigorated by being a character
actor rather than the lead.  William Fichtner and Marcus Thomas are funny as
the survivors of the dysfunctional Dearly family.  In the numerous flashbacks,
Bette Midler plays a bitch-on-wheels with verve.  The weak link is Casey
Affleck, whose character is more or less the protagonist in this ensemble.  I
couldn't decide whether Affleck was a really bad actor or just giving a good
performance as the timid and awkward Bobby.  Either way he was painful to
watch, and I kept hoping he'd drown.
Bottom line:  "Drowning Mona" really wants to be "Fargo," but it never comes
close.  However, despite the one glaring exception, the stellar cast makes a
superb effort and manages to wring some laughs out of it.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Lost & Found (1999/I)
With "Lost & Found," David Spade steps onto the center of the stage.  In his
previous film work, he's either played second fiddle to another comic ("Black
Sheep," "Tommy Boy," "Senseless") or filled a supporting role ("PCU," "8 Heads
in a Duffel Bag").  So, "Lost & Found" is a test of Spade's mettle as a comic
actor; if he passes at all, it's barely.
"Lost & Found" is also Spade's debut as a romantic lead.  He plays Dylan
Ramsey, a restaurateur who's just broken up with his stripper girlfriend.  He
becomes smitten with his new neighbor, French cellist Lila Dubois (Sophie
Marceau).  In an attempt to trick Lila into spending time with him, Dylan
kidnaps her dog, Jack.  He plans to spend the day walking around the
neighborhood with Lila looking for Jack, then to "find" the dog and be her
hero.  The plan becomes complicated when Jack steals a diamond ring that Dylan
is holding for his best friend and business partner (Mitchell Whitfield).  So,
Jack has to remain "lost" until the ring reappears.  Enter Rene (Patrick
Bruel), Lila's rich ex-fiance, who's come to win her back.  . . . And hilarity
ensues.
The plot is (forgive the pun) doggedly predictable.  Boy meets girl, boy lies
to girl, girl falls for boy as boy tries to cover up lie, girl finds out about
the lie, boy is chastened, girl forgives boy.  A rigidly formulaic film like
this depends on its details--the gags, the characters--to work.  "Lost & Found"
is funny in spots; the trouble for Spade is that they're the wrong spots.  As a
charming romantic lead, he's a washout.  Spade is funniest when he's a
malicious elf.  His funniest scenes are ones where he is cruel, verbally and
physically, to others, particularly the dog.  (If Lila knew everything Dylan
did to Jack, we'd never get to "girl forgives boy").  But, the callousness that
makes him funny in the abusive scenes also works against him in scenes where
he's trying to be sweet and sensitive.
That conflict between cruelty and kindness pervades the movie.  The script is
funny but uneven; it has jokes which are very crude (some involving dogshit)
and others which are endearing.  People impressed by one sort of humor will
probably be put off by the other. None of the three screenwriters (James B.
Cook, Marc Meeks, and Spade) has had a screenwriting credit before.  They could
have used an experienced editor.
Just what is Sophie Marceau doing in this movie anyway?  She became known on
this side of the Atlantic playing the princess in "Braveheart."  Her upcoming
films include the new Bond movie ("The World Is Not Enough") and  Shakespeare's
"A Midsummer Night's Dream."  She has way too much class to be in this movie
(although it is fun to see her clowning around during the end credits).
The rest of the cast is a bizarre mix.  Artie Lange plays Wally, Dylan's
dimwitted sidekick.  Wally has the crudest of the crude scenes, and "Lost &
Found" would be much more pleasant to watch if he were edited out entirely. 
(Besides, the inclusion of the rotund Lange seems a vain attempt to replace
Spade's late partner, Chris Farley.)  Dylan's landlady (Estelle Harris of
"Seinfeld") plays poker with a group of lusty, beer-swilling broads (including
Rose Marie of "The Dick Van Dyke Show" and Marla Gibbs of "The Jeffersons"). 
Jon Lovitz has a cameo as a "dog whisperer," and Martin Sheen (whatever
happened to his career? or his dignity?) is the banker that Dylan has to
impress to get a loan for his restaurant.

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
The Blair Witch Project
Written and Directed by Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sánchez 
Starring Heather Donahue, Michael C. Williams, Joshua Leonard
Official Sites: http://www.blairwitch.com/  (mythology-recommended!)
http://www.artisanent.com/blairwitch/  (trailers, screensavers, comic book,
etc.)
http://www.blairwitchdirect.com/  (merchandise)
Grade: A-
Horror films have often proven that Less is More.  Many classics of the genre
have been made on relatively small budgets:  "The Last House on the Left," "The
Night of the Living Dead," "The Texas Chainsaw Massacre," "Assault on Precinct
13," "The Hills Have Eyes," "Halloween."  Even "Psycho" could join the list;
Alfred Hitchcock chose to make his first true horror film on a small budget to
limit studio interference.
Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sánchez's low-budget indie "The Blair Witch Project"
is the ultimate expression of the Less is More principle.  It follows this rule
not only in its method of production but also in what it shows-or, more
accurately, doesn't show-the audience.
By now, you've read the words that open "The Blair Witch Project."  They appear
on the posters, on the webpages, and in the trailers:
One year later their footage was found.
The movie the follows is supposed to be the recovered footage that three
college students-Heather, Mike, and Josh (apparently using their real
names)-made as a project for their film class.  Their subject is the local
legend of the Blair Witch, a ghostly figure who lives deep in the Black Hills
Forest and inspires the murders of children.  After some preliminary interviews
with Burkittsville (formerly Blair) residents about the legend, the trio sets
out into the woods armed with a Hi-8 video camera, a CP-16 film camera loaded
with black & white film, DAT sound equipment, and camping gear.
For the first quarter of the film the three students have a lot of fun playing
with their equipment.  They record themselves drinking, film a study of Mike's
sporadic chest hair, and try to catch Heather peeing.  This is all so real that
it's almost tedious except for the ominous knowledge that they won't be coming
back from this trip.
Before long, they're lost in the woods, and the map is gone.  There are
terrifying noises in the night and ritualistic warnings to leave.  Unlike most
teens in horror films, these three would be happy to leave if they could only
find the way back.  
After seeing "The Blair Witch Project," I'm not surprised that recent exit
polls have shown widespread audience dissatisfaction.  It's an experimental
film, and it doesn't offer what the average moviegoer is seeking.  When I saw
the ending I was initially disappointed myself, but my reaction was the result
of mistaken expectations.  
To continue this line of discussion, I have to wander in to SPOILER territory,
kids.  So, you might want to TURN BACK NOW.  
Watching "Blair Witch" can be as frustrating as it is frightening.  What we see
and hear is what would be recorded by three amateur filmmakers out in the
woods.  Most of the movie is shot by Heather with the small video camera which
lacks the definition we usually see in theatrical releases.  Some shots are out
of focus, others are shot in total darkness.  The sounds in the distance are
hard to make out.  Important events happen when the cameras aren't running.
Most frustrating of all for many horror fans, we don't see the witch.  In
"Danse Macabre," Stephen King said that one of the most terrifying monsters can
be "the monster behind the door."  He cautioned, though, that the writer can
never open that door because regardless of how awful the actual monster is, the
reader was expecting something worse.  However, the recent reactions to "Blair
Witch" suggest that not opening the door may leave the audience just as
disappointed, especially in a visual medium like film.
So, where do I get off giving it an A-?  Partly because I admire its audacity. 
Making a movie that suggests rather than shows takes guts.  The choice to film
most of the movie with a small camcorder is not only brave but also clever; in
part, "Blair Witch" is an examination of the technology that liberates
creativity (with video cameras widely available, almost anybody can make a
movie) but also obscures as much as it reveals (details in the movie's
low-definition video images are difficult to decipher).
>From Blair Witch's internet promotion, I expected a movie with the raw
intensity and gut-wrenching imagery of  "The Last House on the Left" or "The
Texas Chainsaw Massacre."  However, that's not what "Blair Witch" offers.  It
has only the slightest touch of gore and violence.  However, "Blair Witch"
still packs a punch-it's just that its intensity lies in the subtle way it
works on the viewer's mind rather than in horrific images.  While I was
watching the movie, I did not think it had affected me at all, but when I got
home I turned on the lights in every room.  The effect lasted until the next
night.  An really good horror film doesn't just scare you; it crawls inside
your head and rearranges the wiring.
One last aspect of interest:  "The Blair Witch Project" takes a step toward the
interactive multimedia that will doubtless be the dominant artform of the next
century.  It's website ">http://www.blairwitch.com/> takes the position that all
of the events depicted in the film are true and expands on the mythology of the
Blair Witch legend and on the search for the missing filmmakers.  It offers
photos of and interviews with characters who don't appear in the film and even
Real Video of television coverage of the search.  The mythology will be further
explored in a television documentary ("The Curse of the Blair Witch" on the
Sci-Fi Channel), a "true crime" book, and a comic book.  In other words, the
movie is only part of a larger work.  That is a situation quite different from
the familiar pattern of a movie based on a novel or a comic book adaptation of
a movie; those "tie-ins" retell the same story in a different format.  Expect
to see more movie/book/web/video projects which ask the audience to explore
different forms of media to get the whole story and which give the viewer more
choice in how to conduct that exploration.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.wpd.net/madreview/

Title
Review for Mission to Mars (2000)
"Mission to Mars" opens in 2020 as a group of astronauts gather for a barbecue
to celebrate the upcoming jaunt to the red planet.  Then we jump ahead thirteen
months and scientist Luke Graham (Don Cheadle) is on Mars with an international
team.  They're out surveying when a sudden tornado attacks them with a
supernatural malevolence.  As the dust clears, a giant stone face is revealed
beneath the Martian soil.  Only Luke survives to crawl back to his base and
send a brief message to mission control before contact is lost.  At mission
control on the World Space Station, Luke's pals Jim McConnell (Gary Sinise) and
Woody Blake (Tim Robbins) plan a rescue mission.  A year later, their ship
nears Mars with two more astronauts along:  Woody's wife Terri Fisher (Connie
Nielsen) and the inexperienced Phil Ohlmyer (Jerry O'Connell).  Things don't go
quite as planned, however, and the rescuers find themselves in mortal danger
before they even get to the planet.
Although it sounds like "'Saving Private Ryan' in space," "Mission to Mars" is
an equal mixture of "2001: A Space Odyssey," "Apollo 13," "Armageddon," and
"Contact."  (For most of the movie, I was mentally naming the source of each
scene and motif.)  "Mars"' closest kin are "2001" and "Contact" because the
central storyline is humanity encountering extraterrestrial life.  Certainly
"Mars" is nowhere close to the magnificence of "2001" (which ranks among the
greatest movies ever made), but it compares favorably to "Contact."  While
"Contact" did a better job at making the translation of a message received from
aliens seem believable ("Mars" rushes through the interpretation of its
message), "Mars" has a better resolution.  "Contact" built a lot of suspense
for the meeting promised by the title, then let audiences down by having the
alien and its world appear as projections from the protagonist's memory.  As a
character on "South Park" put it, "I waited two hours to see the alien, and
it's her goddamn father!"  "Mars" has a much stronger ending.
Produced by a collaboration of the screenwriting team of "Predator" and the
author of "Speed," the script for "Mars" has plenty of thrills and chills, but
character development occurs in awkward patches of down time that almost seem
to have a blinking subtitle saying "character development."  Jim misses his
dead wife.  Woody and Terri love each other.  Phil is  . . . uh . . . wow, they
must have cut that scene.
The premise, of course, is nonsense.  NASA would never undertake a rescue
mission like this to save one astronaut who may already be dead.  It would be
too expensive and time-consuming to be feasible.  (The rescue team arrives a
year after they lost contact with Luke.)  Scientifically-minded folks may also
pick apart the movie's science, but to an English major like me most of it
seemed realistic.  (And in the movies it's not important to be real, only to
seem real).
Bottom line:  Semi-intelligent fun with sporadic action.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
I had the good fortune to be eight years old in 1977 when "Star Wars" appeared
at the recently-constructed two-screen theater in Danville, Kentucky.  I
vividly recall how the destruction of the Death Star seemed the most
spectacular thing I had ever seen.  I saw the movie several times and
accumulated an impressive collection of action figures which has long since
disappeared with my lost youth.  I remember reading in "Dynamite!" that George
Lucas planned for "Star Wars" to be the fourth part of a nine-movie series: 
three trilogies, the next to be set fifty years before "Star Wars," the third
fifty years after.
Twenty-two years later, Lucas has lowered his expectations to six movies and
has finally released "episode one" of the saga.  By its very nature, "The
Phantom Menace" will probably disappoint a lot of moviegoers:  it's the first
chapter of a serial, so it only hints at the conflicts to come.  We shouldn't
be surprised; after all, we've already seen the second half of the serial and
know how it all comes out.
After seeing "The Phantom Menace", I shoved the fourth, fifth, and sixth
episodes into the VCR and reflected on what a tall task Lucas had set for
himself in making "episode one."  There's no Empire and no Rebellion; all of
that will come later, out of the events set in motion in this chapter. 
Instead, "Phantom" concerns a smaller conflict as the Trade Federation, spurred
on by "the phantom menace" of a Dark Lord of the Sith, creates a blockade
around the peace-loving planet of Naboo.  The Republic, also a peace-loving
bunch, dispatches two Jedi knights to settle the conflict.
Enter Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson) and his apprentice Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan
McGregor).  Within a few minutes, the two Jedis are being chased by the bad
guys, befriending the Naboo queen Amidala (Natalie Portman), and taking on a
comedy sidekick, Jar Jar Binks (a computer-generated character voiced by Ahmed
Best).  Escaping from Naboo, they take refuge on the desert planet of Tatooine.
 While hunting for parts for their ship, Qui-Gon discovers a slave boy, Anakin
Skywalker (Jake Lloyd), who seems to have a powerful connection to the Force. 
Anakin, we learn, was a virgin birth (prediction:  the Christian Coalition will
not be happy about this), and Qui-Gon becomes convinced that Anakin is the
prophesied Chosen One who will bring balance to the Force.  (This is a puzzling
turn-of-events-Darth Vader is the Jedi Messiah?  But I suppose by being both
the champion of the Dark Side and the father of Luke and Leia, who eventually
defeat the Dark Side, he did bring balance.  Or maybe Qui-Gon was just wrong.)
Meanwhile sinister forces are brewing.  The Dark Lord Darth Sidious sends his
apprentice, Darth Maul (body of Ray Park, voice of Peter Serafinowicz -- it's
strange they paid somebody to do the voice; Maul's dialogue is limited to "Yes,
master") after Qui-Gon.  Naboo's Senator Palpatine (Ian McDiarmid), who will
become the evil Emperor Luke faces in "Return of the Jedi," uses the conflict
to begin his rise to power.  (The movie hints heavily that Palpatine is Sidious
without actually revealing it even though it hardly seems surprising since we
know that Palpatine is Darth Vader's master).
Along the way, we find some old friends:  R2-D2 and C-3PO (played as always by
Kenny Baker and Anthony Daniels), Jabba the Hut, and Yoda (voiced as always by
Frank Oz).  As required there are several big battle sequences and a climactic
light-saber duel.  John Williams provides a score with many familiar themes.
There are a lot of reasons to dislike "Phantom Menace."  First and foremost,
there's Jar Jar Binks, who seems to be universally hated by fans and critics
alike.  He is a slapstick oaf who speaks in a pidgin English usually reserved
for native sidekicks in old adventure movies (you'll also discover that the
Trade Federation leaders sound exactly like Japanese officers in WWII movies
and that Tatooine junk dealer Waddo sound like an Arab with a head cold).  Jar
Jar even brings with him manure and fart jokes, which seem out of place in the
"Star Wars" saga.
Also, many of the most interesting characters, especially Darth Maul and
Obi-Wan, are underdeveloped.  Lucas seems more concerned with creating
impressive computer-generated aliens and landscapes than in dealing with the
human characters.  He should remember where this all started.  The special
effects of the original "Star Wars" are, by contemporary standards, cheap and
cheesy, but that movie has pleased audiences for twenty years.  Special effects
are a means, not an end.  There's a huge battle sequence between Jar Jar's
people and a legion of battle-droids that generates little interest -- no
character we know except Jar Jar is involved, so we don't care who wins.
And the movie's most impressive "special effect" doesn't come from Industrial
Light and Magic.  It's McGregor's Alec Guinness imitation, which is entirely
convincing.  When he was cast in the role, my first reaction was "Obi-Wan the
young heroin addict?" and my second was "how  the heck can he pull off the
illusion that his Obi-Wan will grow up to be the old Ben we know and love?"  He
did a great job; I only wish his part was bigger.
Despite the film's weak points, I still enjoyed "Phantom Menace."  The primary
reason is that Anakin appeals to the nine-year-old in all of us.  He gets to
pilot a starfighter in battle with R2-D2; that's all I wanted when I was nine.
To enjoy "Phantom," you have to view it as "Episode One" -- it's the first
chapter in a six-chapter serial.  The goal of the first episode is to set the
central conflicts in motion and to get you to come back for the second episode.
 I can't wait.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.wpd.net/madreview/

Title
Review for Men of Honor (2000)
"Make me one promise," Mac Brashear (Carl Lumbly), sweating over a plow, says 
to his son Carl, "don't end up like me."  A few years later, Carl (Cuba 
Gooding Jr.) finds his escape from the life of a Kentucky sharecropper in the 
newly-integrated Navy.  However, the recruiter's claims of a bright future 
for Carl turn out to be lies.  African-American seamen are restricted to 
slinging hash or serving as valets.  Carl sees that he will have to claim a 
career for himself against stiff opposition from a racist system.
"Men of Honor" is based on the life of the U. S. Navy's first 
African-American Master Diver.  The film balances Carl's life against that of 
Master Chief Billy Sunday (Robert De Niro), who is removed from diving duty 
after an injury to his lungs.  Like Carl, Sunday is a man "born to dive," and 
the loss of his career turns Sunday into a mean-spirited alcoholic.  When 
Carl finally gains entry into the Navy's diving school, Sunday is his 
instructor.  Like most of the cadets and the school's insane commanding 
officer (Hal Holbrook), Sunday hates blacks and resents Carl's presence.  
Carl, however, meets opposition with a fearless, iron-willed determination to 
succeed.
Although the real Carl Brashear stamps with approval the movie's 
authenticity, "Men of Honor" tastes suspiciously like Hollywood corn, Rocky 
Balboa in a diving helmet.  However, it's a high grade of corn, and a 
satisfying meal.  A movie like this has to sell its story to the audience, 
and in "Men" several strong performances successfully move the merchandise.
Not surprisingly, the most impressive acting comes from De Niro.  He seems 
well-rested from his vacation in comedy land ("Analyze This," "Rocky & 
Bullwinkle," "Meet the Parents") where he was needed only as an icon, not as 
an actor.   Sunday is a challenging role because the angry bigot goes from 
being Carl's nemesis to being his most ardent supporter.  De Niro pulls off 
the contradictions in this character with such subtlety that it seems 
effortless.  Sunday is repulsive, likeable, and completely convincing all at 
once.  This is De Niro's best work in years.
In contrast, Gooding has an easier job.  Carl is characterized by 
single-minded determination, and therefore doesn't present the complexities 
of Billy Sunday.  However, Gooding is completely convincing and brings 
limitless energy to the character.  
Charlize Theron wins the Not Just a Pretty Face Award for her impressive work 
as Sunday's neglected wife Gwen.  Also, take note of the always good, always 
underused Michael Rapaport as a stammering seaman who befriends Carl.
Although the script for "Men of Honor" is shamelessly manipulative, it is 
also effective.  When a room full of people give Carl a standing ovation in 
the film's climax, I was tempted to stand up in the theater and clap, too.  
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Hard Rain (1998)
In "Hard Rain," an armored car carrying $3M is caught in a flood.  A gang of
thieves led by Morgan Freeman attack, and the surviving guard (Christian
Slater) must run off and hide the money.  The gang pursues Slater through the
flooded streets of a small, evacuated Indiana town.  Along the way, he runs
into a woman restoring a church (Minnie Driver), the sheriff (Randy Quaid), and
a bickering old couple (Richard Dysart and Betty White).  (Dysart and White
provide excellent comic relief.)  The various characters fight each other as
the waters rise and the dam nears the breaking point.
Though burdened with the dumbest title in recent history, "Hard Rain" is an
entertaining blend of the genres of disaster and action.  It offers many
thrills but little depth.  The script by Graham Yost  has the same strengths
and weaknesses of his other work (which includes "Broken Arrow" and "Speed"): 
interesting premise and effective pacing but little attention to character,
i.e. plenty of style, little substance.  The lack of character development in
"Hard Rain" seems especially disappointing because the characters are
intriguing.  The gang of thieves includes a kindly leader (Freeman), a
slow-witted teen (Michael Goorjian), a Bible-quoting young man (Ricky Harris),
and a school teacher (Dann Florek); I kept expecting this odd collection of
people to be explained and developed.  (It wasn't.)
So, what we have is action and thrills.  The action moves well, and Slater and
Driver find many opportunities to nearly drown.  Director Mikael Salomon  has
experience making a movie in and under water; he served as cinematographer for
James Cameron's "The Abyss."
Š 1999 Christian L. Pyle
">http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Christian+Pyle>

Title
Review for Traffic (2000)
"Traffic" has the good fortune of going into wide release after receiving 
Golden Globe nominations and numerous critical top-ten list postings.  
Without much competition, it will probably do well at the Oscars, but despite 
good intentions and some impressive moments, "Traffic" fails to achieve its 
goals.
Rather than centering on a central protagonist, "Traffic" weaves together 
three major storylines:  a) Judge Robert Wakefield (Michael Douglas) becomes 
the new drug czar while his daughter Caroline (Erika Christensen) becomes a 
drug addict; b) Mexican cop Javier Rodriguez Rodriguez (Benicio Del Toro) 
pursues the Tijuana drug cartel and becomes allied with General Arturo 
Salazar (Tomas Milian), who seeks the same goal for his own reasons; and c) 
DEA agents Montel Gordon (Don Cheadle) and Ray Castro (Luis Guzman) watch 
Helena Ayala (Catherine Zeta-Jones) after arresting her drug-dealing husband 
(Steven Bauer).  Director Steven Soderbergh lacks the grace of Robert Altman, 
but he manages to keep all three storylines running simultaneously without 
losing the audience.
The primary reason "Traffic" doesn't fully succeed is that it wants to be 
several different movies:  a thought-provoking indictment of the failed "war 
on drugs," a portrait of addiction, and a gripping crime drama.  Perhaps a 
more talented director than Soderbergh might have been able to pull off this 
triple threat, but "Traffic" only manages to partially fulfill its goals.  
The critique of the methods and ideology of the drug war is spotty and often 
awkward (particularly when minor characters suddenly launch into speeches on 
subjects like the effect of NAFTA on drug traffic).  There's only one drug 
addict in the movie, which seems odd for an issue-driven film on the Drug 
Problem, and that one is unsympathetic.  Caroline Wakefield comes off as a 
spoiled brat, and her descent from prep school honor student to junkie whore 
doesn't elicit the pathos it should.  Erika Christensen does nothing to 
humanize her character.
Its strongest area is the crime drama vein with the parallel stories of 
Mexican and American cops who pursue the same cartel from different ends of 
the supply chain.  Especially compelling is Javier's plight.  An honest cop 
working within a corrupt system, Javier walks a winding and dangerous road 
paved with compromises.  Benicio Del Toro gives a remarkable performance.  A 
film like this tests the ability of an actor to develop his character with 
limited screen time.  Del Toro communicates more with a pensive look than 
most actors can with a soliloquy.
Also passing with high marks:  Don Cheadle and Michael Douglas.  I'm pleased 
that after so many wonderful supporting performances, Cheadle has gotten 
name-above-the-title recognition with this film.  He has great chemistry with 
Guzman (who deserves some recognition of his own).  I expected Robert 
Wakefield to be a heavy, but Douglas makes us feel the concern Robert has for 
his daughter.  
In contrast, the challenge of her first substantial role proves that 
Catherine Zeta-Jones has no acting ability whatsoever.  Her character has to 
go from being a high society wife whose world is overturned to a cop-killing 
drug dealer.  However, Zeta-Jones' performance shows no internal conflict or 
transformation.  She could be one of the worst actors in Hollywood.
In case you haven't guessed, I'm not a Soderbergh fan.  Ever since he came on 
the scene with "sex, lies, and videotape" in 1989, I've dismissed him as 
pretentious hack.  He's the valedictorian of the "Look at me, I'm an auteur" 
school of filmmaking.  (His classmates include Spike Lee and Oliver Stone).  
This style is characterized by an oppressive directorial presence that often 
undercuts the effectiveness of the film.  In "Traffic," Soderbergh joins the 
current trend toward monochromatic tints.  Douglas' scenes often have a blue 
tint while Del Toro's are yellow and grainy.  Luckily the power of those 
actors performances is not impeded by the distraction, but the heavily 
stylized approach seems a poor choice for a film that aspires to realism.
For those who like to play It's Ol' What's His Name, the supporting cast 
includes Dennis Quaid, Miguel Ferrer, Topher Grace (from "That 70's Show"), 
Amy Irving. Peter Riegert, Benjamin Bratt, Albert Finney, Salma Hayek, James 
Brolin, and several real-life senators (including Orrin Hatch, who does not 
read from "The Exorcist").
Bottom Line:  Doesn't deserve most of the Oscars it will win
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Cell, The (2000)
It's probably inevitable that the popular virtual reality genre ("The 
Matrix," "eXistenZ") would collide with the even more popular serial-killer 
genre ("Kiss the Girls," "Se7en").  The result should have been more 
interesting than "The Cell."
As the movie opens, therapist Catharine Deane (Jennifer Lopez) treats a 
catatonic boy (Colton James) by entering his mind through some sort of 
virtual reality technique that's never fully explained.  After months of 
therapy sessions in a surreal desert, Catharine has no success to report.  
Meanwhile, killer Carl Stargher (Vincent D'Onofrio) has claimed another 
victim.  His particular hobby is to kidnap young women, keep them in a glass 
cell overnight, and drown them.  He takes the corpse and soaks it in bleach, 
then suspends himself over the body and jerks off while watching a video tape 
of the drowning.  Although Carl's been doing this for awhile, he's recently 
become sloppy, and FBI Agent Peter Novak (Vince Vaughn) is closing in fast.  
Not fast enough, though, to keep Carl from sticking another woman (Tara 
Subkoff) in the cell or to catch him before he suffers a schizophrenic attack 
that leaves him in a coma.  From the videos in Carl's house, Peter can see 
that the drowning cell is automated and will fill with water forty hours 
after the abduction.  To save the kidnapped girl, Peter has to find the cell 
before the end of the day, and comatose Carl's not talking.  So off they go 
to Catharine in the hope that she can go inside Carl's mind and find out 
where the cell is in time.  
The focus of "The Cell" in on the ornate interior of Carl's mind, but the 
universe director Tarsem Singh creates seems more an exercise in 
computer-generated spectacle than an exploration of the psychotic 
personality.  For the most part, it's style without substance.  In his own 
mind, Carl is a decadent emperor in flowing robes, Ming the Merciless, as 
well as a frightened boy (Jake Thomas) abused by his father.  All in all, the 
mind of a psycho killer turns out to be a strangely dull place, and I kept 
wishing I could fast-forward to the next development.  
Singh is best known for directing music videos, particularly REM's "Losing My 
Religion," and "The Cell" seems very much like a really long, really slow MTV 
video with the sound deleted.  Singer Lopez seems to think she's in a video 
as well; she devotes more time to posing in elaborate costumes than she does 
to acting.  
The premise had great promise.  The computer-generated world within Carl's 
mind could have been a bizarre, surreal universe governed by insanity and 
symbolism rather than logic.  The first room Catharine enters in Carl's head 
shows this promise.  She finds a horse standing in center of the room; 
suddenly, sheets of sharp-edged glass fall into the horse, dividing it into 
segments.  The panes of glass separate, pulling apart the pieces of the 
still-living horse.  This scene is twisted, disturbing, and 
thought-provoking, because the psychological importance of the horse and its 
fate is left to the viewer to ponder.
Another element that should have been developed is the effect on Catharine of 
merging with the mind of a psychopath.  Their minds begin to bleed together 
at one point in the movie, and this should have provided an opportunity to 
discover the dark corners of Catharine's own psyche.  Like Sidney Lumet's 
"The Offence" or Michael Mann's "Manhunter," "The Cell" could have explored 
how the madness of the killer brings out a repressed darkness in the 
investigator.   However, Catharine's character is hardly developed at all, 
and Lopez has no depth to offer the role.
Bottom Line:  Don't get trapped in this one.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Object of My Affection, The (1998)
Playwright Wendy Wasserstein's first screenplay to be produced (based on a
novel by Stephen McCauley) raises intriguing questions about love and the
various forms in which it comes.  At the center of a very amusing array of
characters are roommates George (Paul Rudd) and Nina (Jennifer Aniston). 
George is gay and has just been dumped when he moves in with Nina.  Nina is
dating Vince (John Pankow of "Mad About You"), an overbearing socialist lawyer.
 George and Nina become close friends quickly, leading Nina to hope that they
might become more than friends.  When she becomes pregnant, Nina persuades
George that they should raise the baby together.
        So can a straight woman and a gay man make a go of it?  "The Object of My
Affection" is too smart a film to let Nina off so easy.  She harbors a secret
fantasy, of course, that George will "convert" for her, and she has to suffer
through a series of disappointments before she sees how hopeless that fantasy
is.
        The real charm of the movie is the parade of supporting characters that
Wasserstein uses to broaden and complicate the questions she raises about love.
 These characters include George's conceited ex (Tim Daly of "Wings"), Nina's
stepsister and her bigwig husband (Allison Janney, Alan Alda), George's new
beau Paul (Amo Gulinello), Paul's lovesick mentor Rodney (Nigel Hawthorne),
George's womanizing brother (Steve Zahn), and a nice cop who gives Nina a ride
home (Kevin Carroll).  All these folks are seeking love; a few are in love with
themselves.
        The weak point in this movie is the acting of Jennifer Aniston.  Since Nina's
dreams and disappointments are the focus of "Object," Aniston has to carry more
of the acting load than anyone else, and she is horribly inadequate.  As far as
Aniston is concerned, this might as well be an episode of "Friends" because
there seems to be little difference between Nina and Rachel, Aniston's TV
character.  Aniston's inability to rise to the challenge sinks the movie and
keeps a sharp script from achieving its full potential.
        There's still pleasure to be had, though, by watching the rest of the cast
work.  Rudd does a fine job of portraying the conflicted George, who wants to
be a father to Nina's baby but cannot deny who he is to please her.  Hawthorne
also stands out; he gives a rich and subtle performance as a drama critic
infatuated with Paul, who is young enough to be his grandson.  (Bit of trivia: 
"Object" was directed by Nicholas Hytner, who also directed Hawthorne's
breakthrough film, "The Madness of King George.")   Pankow was surprisingly
good; now that his TV series is retiring, I hope we'll see more of him on the
big screen.

Title
Review for Replacements, The (2000)
Once upon a time, the professional football players went on strike with four 
games left in the regular season.  The owner of the Washington Sentinels 
(Jack Warden) orders his head coach Jimmy McGinty (Gene Hackman) to find a 
team of replacement players.  His choices:  quarterback Shane "Footsteps" 
Falco (Keanu Reeves), who was headed for the pros before an embarrassing loss 
in the Sugar Bowl; defensive player Daniel Bateman (Jon Favreau), a psycho  
SWAT cop; kicker Nigel Gruff (Rhys Ifans), a Welsh soccer player; wide 
receiver Clifford Franklin (Orlando Jones), who runs like the wind but can't 
catch the ball; two gigantic guards (Faizon Love and Michael Taliferro); a 
deaf guy (David Denman); a preacher (Troy Winbush); a convict (Michael Jace); 
and a sumo wrestler (Ace Yonamine).  Meanwhile, head cheerleader Annabelle 
Farrell (Brooke Langton) is looking for a new squad and finds exotic dancers. 
"The Replacements" provides many good laughs.  My favorite is a scene where 
Franklin leads the team in a chorus of Gloria Gaynor's "I Will Survive."  The 
mixture of backgrounds and personality quirks among the players leads to some 
hilariously unconventional plays, made all the funnier by the running 
commentary from announcers John Madden and Pat Summerall.
Favreau steals the show.  He plays the psycho to the hilt, charging wild-eyed 
like a furious bull into the other players.  Jones, a veteran of "MAD TV" and 
the star of the "Make 7-UP Yours" commercials, also is a reliable 
laugh-factory.  The rest of the cast is considerably weaker, and several of 
the characters are barely developed.  I generally hate Reeves, but in 
"Replacements" he doesn't give me an excuse; he plays it straight up the 
middle:  no stoner dude, no cyberpunk messiah.  Hackman seems to be enjoying 
his vacation from real acting, and he dispenses nuggets of wisdom with 
authority.  
I wasn't too far into "The Replacements" before I began to compare it to 
1989's "Major League."  Although they're about different sports, the plots 
are the same (a bunch of misfits have to merge into a team in order to make 
it to the championship).  Of the two, "Major League" is by far the better 
movie because it devotes more time to developing not only the characters but 
also their relationships.  In "The Replacements," for example, there's an 
animosity between Favreau's cop and Jace's convict because of their career 
choices, but the filmmakers don't take it any farther.  However, in "Major 
League," Corbin Bernsen's snob hates Charlie Sheen's ex-con, and the tension 
is advanced when Bernsen's wife seduces Sheen.
On the other hand, "The Replacements" is much better than either of the 
sequels to "Major League."  
Bottom line:  In a laugh-free summer, this may be your only relief.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Final Destination (2000)
While Alex Browning (Devon Sawa) waits at JFK to leave for a school trip to
Paris, bad omens seem to surround him.  As soon as he buckles into the plane,
he has a vision of the plane exploding seconds after take-off.  When the vision
begins to come true, Alex bolts for the door, dragging several students and a
teacher in his wake.  The plane takes off without them and explodes just as
Alex predicted.  He becomes an object of fear and suspicion among the
community, and the tension only increases as the survivors begin to die.  Alex
and another survivor, Clear Rivers (Ali Larter), investigate the suspicious
"suicide" of a friend, and a mortician (Tony "Candyman" Todd) clues them in to
the truth:  Alex interrupted Death's design by saving people who should have
died in the explosion, and Death will want to claim its rightful victims.  In
order to save himself and the others, Alex will have to figure out Death's new
plan and thwart it.
Of the countless horror films that have competed for a piece of the "Scream"
audience, "Final Destination" is the best so far.  Talented young screenwriter
Jeffrey Reddick offers a fresh variation on a familiar formula.  We've seen
hundreds of movies where a group of teenagers are murdered one-by-one by a
faceless slasher, but Reddick cuts out the hockey-masked middle-man and makes
the villain Death itself.  First-time feature director James Wong made the most
of that premise.  Every scene is permeated with creepiness and foreboding,
reminding us that Death is everywhere, can come at anytime.  Everyday objects
and events vibrate with menace.  The most amusing harbinger of doom:  John
Denver's "Rocky Mountain High," which is played several times in the movie
before someone dies.  (The link is that Denver died in a plane crash, and the
song includes a line about fire in the sky.)  
The performances are stronger than those usually elicited by teen horror. 
Devon Sawa, who previously starred in another horror flick, "Idle Hands," gives
a frantic and convincing lead performance.  Kerr Smith is Carter Hogan, an
antagonist of Alex's whose quick temper causes him to pulled off the fatal
plane.  Smith plays Carter as filled with anger and confusion that constantly
threatens to bubble over into violence.  Seann William Scott, who's also in
theaters right now in "Road Trip," plays the somewhat dim Billy Hitchcock and
provides a needed counterpoint to the intensity of Alex and Carter.  Tony
Todd's one-scene cameo is delicious but all too brief.  
Bottom line:  Watchable teen fright flicks are few and far between, but this
destination is worth visiting.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Cookie's Fortune (1999)
Robert Altman is back!  After a series of muddled efforts ("Pret-a-Porter,"
"Kansas City," and "The Gingerbread Man"), Altman has delivered a quirky comedy
that deserves its place on his distinguished resume.
In "Cookie's Fortune," an elderly woman nicknamed Cookie (Patricia Neal)
commits suicide to join her late husband.  The body is discovered by her niece
Camille (Glenn Close), a domineering neurotic who hurriedly makes the suicide
look like a murder so that no one will suspect there is insanity in her family.
 (Of course, anyone who has met Camille KNOWS there is insanity in her family.)
 Suspicion falls on Cookie's only friend, Willis Richland (Charles Dutton), and
the small-town police try to investigate the murder with the help of some
outside experts.
Altman's trademark is the peopling of a film with a variety of unusual
characters, and the population of Holly Springs, Mississippi, has familiar
faces.  Julianne Moore plays Camille's mousy sister Cora, who knows about the
cover-up but says nothing.  Liv Tyler plays Cora's rebellious daughter Emma,
who takes up residence in Willis' cell.  Boy wonder Chris O'Donnell plays a
bumbling deputy who has the hots for Emma.  Ned Beatty is also on the force;
his character, Lester, has a simple reason for knowing that Willis is innocent:
 "I've fished with the man."  Courtney B. Vance is a suave expert who takes
charge of the investigation.  And lurking around the fringes is Altman regular
Lyle Lovett selling catfish.  Altman's genius is that he can develop characters
with only a few strokes and manage to keep them all in motion without the movie
seeming crowded.
Altman and first-time screenwriter Anne Rapp also texture "Cookie's Fortune"
with lots of wonderful comic touches.  Many of the funniest occur when the
developing investigation disrupts a church group production of "Salome" and
several characters wander around the jail in their costumes from the play. 
Willis' lawyer (Donald Moffat) walks in wearing the purple robes of a king of
Judea topped with a Fedora hat.
Glenn Close gives a flawless comic performance.  Camille is a self-obsessed
refugee from a Tennessee Williams play who is audacious enough to cut down the
yellow crime-scene tape and take up residence in Cookie's house on the same day
as the suicide.  As I watched Close work, I realized that it had been years
since I'd seen her in a project worthy of her talent.  Hollywood tends to
discard its actresses as they reach the middle of life; let's hope that this
role generates more opportunities for her.  
It's a joy to see Patricia Neal again.  Even at 72, she retains the gentle
strength that made her performances in films like "The Day the Earth Stood
Still," "A Face in the Crowd," and "Hud" so memorable.  "Cookie's Fortune" is
her first theatrical release in ten years (in the meantime, she's appeared in
three TV movies).
Holly Springs seems like an updated version of  Mayberry.  Its jail cells are
left unlocked, and there's a genial atmosphere that pervades the town.  The
only person who doesn't fit that mold is Camille, who is wound way too tight
for the pace of small town life; like any great comic character, she is extreme
and rigid while everyone around here is free and loose.  "Cookie's Fortune" is
delightful because it welcomes the audience as friends and invites them to
chuckle at the townsfolk's quirks.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
.">http://www.wpd.net/madreview/>.

Title
Review for Mystery Men (1999)
It's tough to be an aspiring superhero in Champion City.  Just ask Mr. Furious
(Ben Stiller), the Blue Raja (Hank Azaria), and The Shoveler (William H. Macy).
 They're trying to break into the biz, but Captain Amazing (Greg Kinnear), the
city's hero numero uno, hogs all the action.  The good captain has his own
problems.  Because he's all but eliminated crime, Amazing's endorsement deals
are falling through.  The public craves a major slugfest, so Amazing engineers
the parole of his one-time arch enemy Casanova Frankenstein (Geoffrey Rush). 
Frankenstein succeeds beyond expectations; he captures Capt. Amazing before
setting out on his scheme to destroy the city.  
So, no one is left to save the day but our would-be superheroes, but their
abilities are more "little league" than "Justice League."  The Raja hurls forks
at foes, the Shoveler hits them with a shovel, and Mr. Furious just yells at
people (Stiller is doing essentially the same character he played in a guest
appearance on "Friends").  After a painful first strike, the guys hold
auditions for teammates and add The Bowler (Janeane Garofalo), who carries her
dead father's skull in her bowling ball; Invisible Boy (Kel Mitchell), who can
only use his powers when no one is looking at him; The Spleen (Paul Reubens),
who blows devastating winds from his rear; and The Sphinx (Wes Studi), a
mysterious figure who will teach them to fight.
"Mystery Men" boasts one of the most talented and eclectic casts ever
assembled.  In addition to those already mentioned, the credits include Lena
Olin as Frankenstein's evil shrink, comedian Eddie Izzard and the Fugees'
Prakazrel Michel as disco-themed thugs, singer Tom Waits as an inventor of
superhero weapons, Artie Lange (from "MAD TV") as another thug, Claire Forlani
(from "Meet Joe Black") as a waitress Mr. Furious is pursuing, Louise Lasser
(from "Mary Hartman, Mary Hartman") as the Blue Raja's mother, and
actor/magician Ricky Jay as Capt. Amazing's manager.  The cast includes four
Oscar-nominated actors!  When I saw the list of players early last year, I
figured the result would be a can't-miss comedy.  
Yet, I must report disappointment.  The script is probably the worst of 1999. 
Nearly every joke misfires.  The stabs at comic books are too obvious to be
funny.  (For example, no one can recognize Capt. Amazing in his secret identity
because he's wearing glasses.)  The fart jokes surrounding the Spleen are
surprisingly the only gags that work.  The cast tries hard, especially Hank
Azaria, whose character adopts an effete British accent while in costume, but
the script is just too lame to run.  
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Gone in Sixty Seconds (2000)
One of my brother's favorite movies is H. B. Halicki's 1974 cult flick "Gone 
is Sixty Seconds," one of the best products of the car-chase genre that 
provided drive-in fare during the 1970's.  Chase pics had more tire squeals 
than dialogue, but they had a strong visceral appeal.  Although it boasts a 
bigger budget and familiar stars, the remake of "Gone in Sixty Seconds" is 
relatively weak and dull.
Randall "Memphis" Raines (Nicolas Cage) is a retired car thief who runs a 
go-cart track.  He got out of crime so that his younger brother Kip (Giovanni 
Ribisi) would not take up boosting cars.  However, Kip became a thief anyway, 
and now he's in big trouble.  Kip promised to deliver fifty luxury and sports 
cars to gangster Raymond Calitri (Christopher Eccleston) by the end of the 
week.  Calitri expects Memphis to fulfill Kip's bargain; if he doesn't come 
through, Kip dies.  Memphis gathers his old crew (Angelina Jolie, Robert 
Duvall, Will Patton, Chi McBride, and Vinnie Jones), and Kip brings his boys 
(T.J. Cross, William Lee Scott, Scott Caan, and James Duval).  As if Calitri 
breathing down their necks wasn't bad enough, the team is pursued by a cop 
(Delroy Lindo) who's still ticked off that he never busted Memphis and by a 
rival gangster (rap star Master P) who wants to take over Calitri's clients.
Watching "Gone," I discovered that stealing fifty cars is not any more 
interesting than stealing one.  Maybe that's why the first forty-nine are 
fairly easy, and the thrills are saved for "Eleanor," a 1967 Shelby GTO, a 
model that has always eluded Memphis.  But the big chase doesn't live up to 
the long wait.
I had high hopes for "Gone" because it is director Dominic Sena's second 
film.  "Kalifornia," his 1993 debut, was a brilliant study in the 
relationship between violence and its audience.  In that movie Sena took a 
simple thriller plot (a couple gives a serial killer a ride) and successfully 
endowed it with deeper significance.  In "Gone" he seems to be aiming for a 
drama about two brothers who can't communicate with each other, but that goal 
just doesn't mesh with this plot.  
"Gone" either takes itself too seriously or not seriously enough.  It's not 
light enough to be fun, or mean enough to be intense.  This chaser has more 
dialogue than tire squeals but is none the better for it.  The lack of action 
is a waste of the premise, which should have challenged the filmmakers to 
create the most spectacular car chases ever.  The weak script is a waste of a 
talented cast.
In a "Newsweek" interview last year, Sean Penn blasted his old pal Nic Cage 
for making bad movies.  Much as I like Cage, for every good picture he does 
("Leaving Las Vegas," "Bringing Out the Dead"), there are two major stinkers 
("Snake Eyes," "Con Air," "8MM," "City of Angels").  That ratio is probably 
better than what a lot of his peers can boast, but Cage has real talent.  
It's a shame to waste it in glitzy, superficial tripe like "Gone in 60 
Seconds."
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Scream 3 (2000)
In my review of "The Spy Who Shagged Me," I postulated an unbreakable law of
film physics:  Every time a sequel is as good as or better than the previous
film in the series, it is followed by a third movie that is a bore.  The cause
is probably complacency; a studio sighs with relief when Part 2 lives up to
expectations and figures Part 3 is a sure thing.  "Scream 3" provides the
latest proof of this rule.
In Los Angeles production has begun on "Stab 3:  Return to Woodsboro," the most
recent installment in the series of movies inspired by the murders surrounding
Sidney Prescott (Neve Campbell).  However, life soon starts imitating art, and
"Stab" cast members turn up stabbed.  Smelling yet another book deal, Gale
Weathers (Courteney Cox Arquette) comes to the set to investigate and finds her
ex-boyfriend Dewey Riley (David Arquette) acting as a technical consultant and
getting chummy with Jennifer (Parker Posey), the actress playing Gale in "Stab
3."  Elsewhere, our heroine Sidney is living in hiding under an assumed name .
. . until she gets a phone call from a familiar evil voice.
The late Randy Meeks (Jamie Kennedy) makes a surprise guest appearance via
video to explain the rules of a trilogy.  He notes the third chapter in a
trilogy has an overabundance of exposition and a huge backstory to contend
with.  Indeed, "Scream 3" tries to link its murders back to the one that
started it all, the murder of Sidney's mother Maureen before the beginning of
the original "Scream." At the scene of each murder in "Scream 3," the killer
leaves a photo of Sidney's mother Maureen as a teenager in Hollywood and even
includes a note claiming to be her real killer.  To find out who the killer is,
our intrepid investigators have to uncover what happened during Maureen's
missing years when she was a starlet appearing in low-budget horror films. 
(Even with that little information, you can probably already guess what the
killer's relationship to Sidney is).
Unlike its predecessors, "Scream 3" doesn't have the guts to even suggest that
the central characters might be the killer.  The characters we do suspect are
all undeveloped, so that by the end we don't even care who the killer is.  The
jaded detective (Patrick Dempsey)?  The kinky producer (Lance Henriksen)?  The
driven young director (Scott Foley)?  The ingenue (Emily Mortimer)?  The
character who turns out to be the killer seems to be selected at random.  Wes
Craven supposedly filmed three different endings to keep the real one a secret,
so it's quite possible the one in the final cut was randomly chosen.  
The series' trademark references to other horror films have become trite and
obvious.  Possibly it's the absence of screenwriter Kevin Williamson, who
penned the first two, or maybe it's that the hip ironic stance eventually
consumes itself and a series that parodies film cliches eventually becomes a
cliche.  I groaned as an attack on Sidney from the first "Scream" was repeated
moment-for-moment in the Hollywood set of her home.  At some point, referencing
becomes just a means to cover up a poverty of new ideas.
"Scream 3" also continues the tradition of having an eclectic set of cameos and
familiar faces in small roles.  Look for Jenny McCarthy, Carrie Fisher, Patrick
Warburton (Puddy from "Seinfeld"), Roger Corman, and Jason Mewes and Kevin
Smith (as Jay and Silent Bob) to walk through at some point.  All these bit
players put forth more effort than the series' returning stars, who are
probably saving their energy for the long post-"Scream" job search.
Another prediction I made in a previous review has come to pass:  more movies
are copying "The Blair Witch Project"'s web strategy.  "Scream 3" has three
official websites that (wink, wink) pretend that the events of the movie are
real and provide additional backstory information not covered in the movie. 
The Sunrise Studios site (scream3.com) has trailers for other Sunrise releases
as well as the "latest 'Stab 3' news."  There's also a Gail Weathers official
site (galeweathers.com) and a Sunrise Sucks site that has more "Stab" scandals
the studio wants to cover up (sunrisesucks.com).
Craven and company promise that this is the last installment in the "Scream"
series.  While I hope that's true, I don't hold out much hope-horror movie
series are even harder to kill than their monsters.  There's a "Halloween H2K"
in the works, even though Michael Myers was beheaded in "H20," and a "Freddy
vs. Jason" has been talked about for awhile, despite the fact that both
characters were "killed off."  There's bound to be a "Scream 4" someday, even
if it starts over with a new set of movie-star wannabes.
Bottom Line:  They should have called this one "Yawn."
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Two Rode Together (1961)
Two Rode Together (1961)
Directed by John Ford  
Written by Frank S. Nugent 
(based on the novel "Comanche Captives" by Will Cook)
Starring James Stewart, Richard Widmark, Shirley Jones, and Linda Cristal
Marshal Guthrie McCabe (James Stewart) has a sweet deal in the sleepy border
town of Tascosa.  He has a protection racket that nets him 10% of every
business in town, and he's the kept man of the local madam (Annelle Hayes). 
However, his life of ease is interrupted when his old friend Cavalry Lt. Jim
Gary (Richard Widmark) recruits McCabe to handle a crisis.  Comanche Chief
Quanah Parker (Henry Brandon) has a collection of white captives who were taken
as children over the past fifteen years.  Because McCabe has dealt successfully
with Parker before, the Army wants him to arrange the release of the captives. 
A large community of settlers have gathered at Fort Grant to await news of
their loved ones, including Marty Purcell (Shirley Jones), who's sweet on Lt.
Gary.
One could easily dismiss "Two Rode Together" as "The Searchers II" because both
films concern the rescue of captives raised by Comanches.  However, while "The
Searchers" focused on the psychology of its protagonist (John Wayne's character
Ethan Edwards), "Two Rode Together" is more interested in exploring societal
issues.  Director John Ford's westerns often have the thesis that the
wilderness breeds savagery and civilization breeds corruption.  (In this movie,
the two extremes are marked by the vicious Comanche Stone Calf, played by Woody
Strode, and rich businessman Harry J. Wringle, played by Willis Bouchey, who
wants to buy any captive boy to take home to his wife.)  The decent folks are
the pioneers and the cavalry who exist between the two poles, but there is
always the understanding that these few good souls will inevitably be swallowed
by the march of "civilization."  Thus, Ford always pursues his tales about the
forging of America with a profound ambivalence.
In "Two Rode Together," even Ford's usual repositories of goodness are
undercut.  The pioneers include the angry and violent Clegg family, who at one
point form a lynch mob to hang the only white child McCabe and Gary managed to
free.  (It's no accident that the Clegg patriarch is a bible-thumping reverend;
Ford generally satirizes the supposedly benevolent institutions of the
on-rushing society).  Many of the cavalry officers behave in a racist and
unchivalrous manner towards Elena (Linda Cristal), one of the captives freed
from the Comanches.  Lt. Gary and Marty stand as the sole embodiments of
unassailable virtue amid a world of compromise, greed, violence, and madness.
The role of the selfish Guthrie McCabe is an unusual choice for Jimmy Stewart,
who is best known as the selfless hero of Frank Capra classics.  However,
Stewart is up to the challenge and brings a devilish delight to his
performance.  As the movie develops, McCabe proves to be a complex character,
who in one moment can horrify Marty by describing what her captive brother
would look like as a full-grown Comanche warrior and in another defend Elena
against the leers of the cavalry soldiers and their wives.  Richard Widmark is
the perfect counter-point:  resolute, honest, brave, kind, loyal, everything an
officer and a gentleman should be.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Wedding Singer, The (1998)
If the 70's nostalgia didn't make you feel old, the 80's nostalgia is bound to.
 One of the latter set, "The Wedding Singer," seems to be written by someone
who did not experience the 1980's directly but only read about them in an
article in Parade magazine.  The wacky fashions are here . . . and the music .
. . and references aplenty to celebrities and signs of the times, but it all
seems tediously-and too obviously-inserted for the
didn't-we-dress-funny-back-then chuckle.
The plot is standard romantic comedy with nothing original:  Robbie (Adam
Sandler) is a wedding singer; Julia (Drew Barrymore) waits tables at weddings. 
Both are engaged; however, Robbie's fiance (Angela Featherstone) dumps him at
the altar, and Julia's fiance (Matthew Glave) is a skirt-chasing speculator in
junk bonds.  Robbie and Julia go through the expected ups-and-downs as they
realize they were meant to be together.
I'll fess up-I've never found Adam Sandler funny.  Whatever his appeal is, I've
missed it.  (Other comedians I don't get include Pauly Shore and Pee Wee
Herman-make your own judgments).
The stupidity and artificiality of the whole project is summarized in a cameo
by Billy Idol as himself.  Idol looks like hell, and the ravages of his
lifestyle are barely concealed by thick makeup.  He's mocked by a photo of his
younger self on a Rolling Stone cover in the same scene.  We're not supposed to
notice that, and we're not supposed to notice how silly it is that Billy Idol
suddenly appears to play fairy godmother to Robbie.
Other cameos, by Steve Buscemi and Jon Lovitz, provide the only real laughs in
the movie.  Lovitz is especially good, playing a rival wedding singer plotting
with the mania of a Bond villain to take advantage of Robbie's post-break-up
depression.

Title
Review for Deuce Bigalow: Male Gigolo (1999)
Deuce Bigalow (Rob Schneider) cleans fish tanks.  Yeah, I didn't know that was
a real job either.  One of his customers is Antoine LeConte (Oded Fehr), a
successful gigolo.  When Antoine has to go to Sweden for three weeks, he lets
Deuce use his house to look after an ailing $800 fish.  Fooling around, Deuce
sets fire to the kitchen and smashes a $6000 fish tank.  After taking a try at
one of Antoine's clients and earning $10, Deuce decides to prostitute himself
to raise the money to replace the fish tank before the fiery-tempered Antoine
returns.  
Enter T. J. (Eddie Griffin), a pimp for "man-whores," who arranges for Deuce to
service an assortment of women whose imperfections keep them from dating. 
There's an enormous woman (played by transvestite porn star Chi Chi La Rue) who
hides food in her clothes.  There's Claire (Gail O'Grady) whose narcolepsy
causes her to fall asleep every few minutes.  Tina (Torsten Voges) is so tall
her face doesn't fit on the screen, and Ruth (Amy Poehler) has Tourette's
Syndrome and shouts obscenities without warning.  Finally there's Kate (Arija
Bareikis) whose sorority sisters secretly paid her fare.  She seems perfect,
and Deuce quickly falls in love with her.  (She does, we discover later, have
an imperfection, but Deuce decides it isn't important.)
Deuce's life is complicated by a bothersome cop (William Forsythe) looking for
information on Antoine and by Kate's discovery of his man-whoring.  However,
neither threat generates much suspense.  The formula is so familiar that we
know how it will end from the start.
"Deuce Bigalow" is the first project from Adam Sandler's company Happy Madison,
the formation of which assures that we'll be seeing the Sandler style of comedy
mass-produced at an increasing rate in years to come.  Be afraid.  Be very
afraid.  
The good news is that Sandler doesn't actually appear in "Deuce" and that Rob
Schneider and Eddie Griffin are funnier than Sandler.  Schneider has a
sweetness that makes the clueless but good-hearted Deuce believable.  Griffin's
delivery is dead-on, especially in the coining of "technical terms" for T. J.'s
profession, as in "Don't make me he-bitch man-slap you!"
There's the expected amount of toilet humor in "Deuce."  (For one thing,
Deuce's dad is a men's room attendant).  Does anyone over the age of eight
actually find bowel movements that funny?  For most of us, I think that
childhood fascination with bodily functions disappears when we hit the far-side
of puberty and discover how funny sex is.  I, for one, will be glad when the
toilet trend is finally flushed.
Bottom line:  "Deuce" doesn't offer anything new but it is intermittently
funny.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)
For once I can't tell you how a movie BEGINS because it would be a spoiler. 
Suffice to say that if, like me, you saw Heather Graham in the trailer for "The
Spy Who Shagged" Me and wondered, "Hey, what happened to Austin's wife?," your
question will be answered.
What I can say is that Dr. Evil (Mike Myers) returns to earth and hatches a
plan to neutralize his nemesis, unfrozen 60's superspy Austin Powers (also
Myers).  Evil goes back in time to 1969 and has henchman Fat Bastard (Myers
again, getting a chance to use his Scottish accent) steal the mojo from the
frozen Austin.  Along the way, Dr. Evil also decides to set up a giant laser on
the moon to destroy the earth.  (No, he doesn't have a reason-just run with
it.)  Mojoless, Austin follows Dr. Evil to 1969 and teams up with CIA agent
Felicity Shagwell (Heather Graham) to foil Evil's scheme.
As Austin tries to contemplate the paradoxes of time travel, he exclaims, "I'm
going all cross-eyed!"  His boss, Basil Exposition (Michael York), cautions
Austin to not worry about it and just have fun.  Then Basil looks at the camera
and says, "That goes for you all, too."  Good advice.  The various plot twists,
cameos, and gags won't hold up under any scrutiny-but it's great fun.
Even more so than the original "Austin Powers, The Spy Who Shagged Me" is
intentionally dumb but making a dumb movie on purpose is harder than it looks. 
(Check out any of the recent work by Leslie Nielsen or Mel Brooks, if you don't
believe me.)  Even though the jokes are juvenile (expect farts, penis-shaped
rockets, and Austin drinking a stool sample), the timing is skillful.  Most of
all, Myers manages to make both Austin and Dr. Evil believable enough to accept
as characters and stupid enough to laugh at.  (On the other hand, Fat Bastard
is just gross.  I haven't been this disgusted by a character since Pizza the
Hut in "Spaceballs").
Dr. Evil is a much funnier character than Austin, and the bad guy gets more
screen time in this outing.  His posse is back:  Number Two (played by both
Robert Wagner and Rob Lowe), Frau Farbissina (Mindy Sterling), and Scott Evil
(Seth Green).  They're joined by a miniature clone of Dr. Evil, Mini-Me (Verne
Troyer), who generates more than half of the laughs in the movie.  I thought
Scott's running commentary on his father's stupid plans was the funniest thing
in the first "Austin", and I'm glad that it continues in the sequel.  (There's
a hilarious scene early in "Spy" where Scott and Dr. Evil go on "Jerry
Springer."  Topic:  "My Dad is Evil and He Wants to Take Over the World").
There's cameos aplenty (many of them in the wrong decade).  As themselves: 
Springer, Burt Bacharach, Elvis Costello, Woody Harrelson, and Willie Nelson. 
Kristen Johnston (from "Third Rock") plays a Russian assassin, Ivana Humpalot. 
Tim Robbins (one of the last people I expected to see in this movie) plays the
president in '69.  Elizabeth Hurley (Vanessa Kensington Powers) and Will
Ferrell (Mustafa) briefly reprise their roles from "Austin Powers,
International Man of Mystery."  I hoped that Mimi Rogers would turn up as well,
but we can't have everything.
Speaking of the previous Powers, you'll enjoy "The Spy Who Shagged Me" more if
you've seen "Austin Powers" recently.  And the first ten minutes will make a
lot more sense.
A brief digression:  Now that "The Spy Who Shagged Me" has joined the ranks of
sequels that measure up to their progenitors, an unbreakable law of film
physics requires that the next movie in the series be a disappointment. 
Really, every time a sequel is as good as or better than the previous film in
the series, it is followed by a third movie that is a bore.  Consider these
fine sequels:  "Superman II," "The Empire Strikes Back," "Star Trek II: The
Wrath of Khan" (in fact, the "even-number rule" of "Trek" movies-only the
even-numbered ones are good-is the best proof of this unbreakable law), "The
Karate Kid Part II," "Lethal Weapon 2," "Back to the Future Part II," "The
Godfather Part II."  All good sequels, all followed by disappointing third
parts.  Can anyone think of an exception to the rule?
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.wpd.net/madreview/

Title
Review for Message in a Bottle (1999)
Robin Wright Penn recently denounced the script for her new movie, "Message in
a Bottle," as being too "in-your-face and precious."  She's right-the script is
a manipulative hanky-puller painted by the numbers, but it is redeemed by
guileless performances and an ending that departs from the simplistic themes
that, up to then, it seems to pursue.
The plot's a sentimental romance with syrupy overtones:  On vacation, Theresa
Osborne (Penn) finds a bottle on a beach.  Inside is a type-written note from
"G." to a departed love, Catherine.  The note testifies to the sensitivity and
depth of feeling of "G.," and Theresa, divorced and lonely, begins a quest to
find the note's author.  Her boss (Robbie Coltrane), a "Chicago Tribune"
columnist, publishes the letter, and two other letters are revealed.
The clues in the letters lead Theresa to the Outer Banks of North Carolina and
boat-restorer Garret Blake (Kevin Costner).  His wife Catherine died two years
earlier, and Garret has lived in limbo ever since.  Theresa, of course, lies to
Garret about why she's there (setting the stage for the inevitable
"girl-loses-boy" development when he finds out  the truth), but they soothe
each other's wounds of lost love.  Romance blooms.
Both Theresa and Garret abandoned their dreams when they lost their spouses. 
She dreamed of being a writer; he intended to build his own boats. 
Predictably, each inspires the other to begin writing/building again.  Up to
the end, the message in this bottle seems clear:  move on after loss, learn to
live and love again.  I won't divulge the ending, of course, but it undercuts
the predictable themes developed up to then.  It led me to rethink my
assumptions about the movie and its subject matter.
This is the sort of movie that has to sell itself to the audience.  I was
willing to buy into it because the performances were open and honest.  Both
Penn and Costner seem quite earnest and genuine in their roles, which is a
surprising turn for Costner, who usually alternates between his "Eliot Ness"
and "Crash Davis" personas.  Paul Newman, who plays Garret's dad, Dodge Blake,
is a national treasure.  He's never given a bad performance or put forth less
than a full effort.  Even in a small supporting role, Newman shines.  By the
time it was over, I found myself caring most about Dodge, a cranky recovering
alcoholic who dotes on his son.
The familiar plot of "Message in a Bottle" shatters easily with slightest
application of cynicism or even realism, but its cast puts forth an admirable
effort to defuse those reactions.

Title
Review for Perfect Murder, A (1998)
Few directors can claim to have improved on the Master of Suspense, Alfred
Hitchcock, but Andrew Davis' "A Perfect Murder" eclipses Hitch's "Dial M for
Murder."
Truth be told, of course, "Dial M" was a substandard product for the Master. 
(But only an idiot or Gus Van Sant would remake a great film).  Adapted from
Frederick Knott's popular stage play, Hitchcock's movie remained stage-bound;
all of its action takes place in one room, and "Dial M" lacks the
experimentation of "Rope" (also a one-room stage adaptation).  As the husband
plotting to kill his wife, Ray Milland was coldly evil but uninteresting.  As
the wife, Grace Kelly was beautiful and vulnerable, and that seemed to be all
that was required of her.
Davis' version retains the basic skeleton of "Dial M"'s plot:  a wife has a guy
on the side; her husband hires someone to murder her, but she kills the
attacker instead; the husband tries to retrieve the house key he gave the
killer but picks the wrong one.  However,  Patrick Smith Kelly's screenplay
takes that basic story in new and interesting directions.  Steven (Michael
Douglas) is a cold and distant millionaire husband to Emily (Gwyneth Paltrow),
who is boffing David (Viggo Mortensen), a bohemian artist.  But David is hiding
a secret past as an ex-con, and Steven blackmails him into a plot to kill
Emily.  Emily spikes the would-be killer with a meat thermometer and soon
discovers the plot against her.  Several plot twists and double-crosses follow.
Besides having a fleshier plot, "A Perfect Murder" boasts better acting than
"Dial M" (directing actors was always Hitch's weak point).  Paltrow stands out
by not simply hashing out another rendition of the stock character Threatened
Woman.  Emily is vulnerable enough to be sympathetic but also tough enough to
be respected.  Douglas is his usual sinister self, part-pouting-victim,
part-vengeful-aggressor.  Mortensen is the weakest cast member and brings
little to the table.
Despite the improvements, "A Perfect Murder" is still genre fare, but it is an
entertaining diversion.  Davis, best known for large-scale action movies like
"The Fugitive" and "Under Siege," shows that he can be just as effective with a
character-driven piece.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.wpd.net/madreview/

Title
Review for Wag the Dog (1997)
WAG THE DOG is a sharp satire on the manipulation of public opinion through the
creation of "news."  Like DR. STRANGELOVE (1964), WAG will likely be referenced
by political commentators for decades to come.  
Conrad Brean (Robert DeNiro), a professional problem solver, has been called in
by the White House to defuse a scandal-the President, nearing reelection, has
been accused of molesting a teenager.  Brean and White House staffer Winifred
Ames (Anne Heche) enlist movie producer Stanley Motss (Dustin Hoffman) to
create "a pageant"-a nonexistent war with Albania-to distract the media and the
public from the sex scandal.  Motss enthusiastically plots the storyline of the
war and deftly keeps the story going as unexpected events block their plans.  
One of WAG's points is that the experience of war for those not actually
fighting it is a collage of stirring images, patriotic songs, and memorials for
heroes.  Therefore, Brean and Motss give America a clip of an Albanian waif
(actually an actress played by Kirsten Dunst) fleeing explosions, numerous
songs, and a heroic soldier (Woody Harrelson) captured by the enemy.  The war
must have happened because, as Brean says several times, "I saw it on TV."
WAG's most obvious target is the use of military action as a political
smokescreen.  When the movie was released, many called it prophetic because,
around the same time, Clinton bombed Iraq in an obvious attempt to divert
attention from his own sex scandal.  However, Hilary Henkin and David Mamet's
screenplay drops references to Reagan and Bush's use of the same tactic.  In
many ways, WAG presents a better world-their war is bloodless.
Another satire, Michael Moore's CANADIAN BACON (1994), explores similar
territory.  In that film, the White House creates a state of tension between
the U.S. and Canada to replace the Cold War.  The message is the same:  having
a common enemy stirs up and unites the populace, and the power to manipulate
that effect has numerous political applications.  WAG is the better film; where
BACON descended into border-crossing hijinks and was weighed down by Moore's
use of its script as a soapbox, WAG is wonderfully subtle and rich in satiric
detail.
The relevance of WAG extends far beyond its parallels with recent history. 
Daniel Boorstin coined the term "pseudo-event" to describe an event which is
planned "for the immediate purpose of being reported."  With today's
technology, WAG THE DOG tells us, the pseudo-events can be more pseudo than
events.  Brean convinces Motss that the fake war can work by claiming that the
most famous image of the Gulf War was filmed on a sound stage with a small
model made of Legos.  Seeing may be believing, but can we believe what we see? 
As we are swept downstream in the constant rush of mass media, can we separate
the genuine from the artificial?  And, if documentary evidence is suspect, what
is history?  Brean adds a blues song to the 1930's by planting an album in the
Library of Congress.  Even history is suspect.

Title
Review for What Women Want (2000)
Somehow the whole feminist movement passed Nick Marshall (Mel Gibson) by.  
He's a cigar-chomping, skirt-chasing, male-chauvinist ad executive who was 
raised by Las Vegas showgirls (really).  But his worldview is shaken when, 
instead of promoting Nick, his boss (Alan Alda) hires Darcy McGuire (Helen 
Hunt) to be creative director.  Nick, it seems, is behind the times because 
women now dominate the marketplace.  Trying to cope with this strange new 
world that he has somehow managed to ignore up 'til now, Nick tries leg wax, 
panty-hose, and mascara, but while he's still a transvestite Nick 
accidentally electrocutes himself.  Rather than killing him or burning off 
all his hair, the sudden shock gives him the ability to hear what women are 
thinking.  (Apparently "Unbreakable" isn't the only current film with a 
superhero motif because this women's underwear + electricity = psychic powers 
equation has the same logic as radiation + spider bite = Spider-man.  If only 
Mel had donned a colorful costume and fought crime as Female Thought-Hearing 
Lad.  Ru Paul could have played the villain.  But I digress . . . ).
Nick is surprised to find that most of the women around him think he's a pig. 
 He finds lots of uses for his new ability:  giving a coffee shop waitress 
(Marisa Tomei) the best sex she's ever had, getting closer to his teenage 
daughter (Ashley Johnson), saving a potential suicide victim, and showing up 
Darcy at work by proposing her ideas as soon as she thinks of them.  But he 
never counted on falling in love . . .
"What Women Want" is either "classic" (what my wife calls it) or "outdated" 
(what I call it).  For Pete's sake, the soundtrack is dominated by Frank 
Sinatra songs!  "WWW" should have been made forty years ago with Rock Hudson 
and Doris Day because it has the same "taming of a playboy" plot as "Pillow 
Talk."  Back then, revealing the erotic thoughts of women would have been 
progressive; now it plays like a sitcom.  Screenwriters Josh Goldsmith and 
Cathy Yuspa (who actually work on a sitcom, "The King of Queens") generate 
some laughs, particularly in the scene where Nick waxes his legs (his 
reaction:  "Why would anyone do that more than once?  Why would anyone even 
do the other leg?").  However, "WWW" doesn't offer any new insights into the 
complexities of the female psyche.  Anyone who's ever watched an episode of 
"Oprah" knows as much as Nick finds out.  If it were all boiled down, What 
Women Want is to be treated with respect.  Aretha Franklin already said it 
more eloquently, more clearly, and more succinctly. 
Although this is only her second feature as a director (the remake of "The 
Parent Trap" was her first), as a screenwriter Nancy Meyers made a specialty 
of light, nonthreatening pseudo-feminist films like "Private Benjamin," 
"Protocol," and "Baby Boom."  But I think What Women really Want are movies 
that don't shy away from controversy or complexity.  While I'm glad to see 
Mel Gibson in something nonviolent for a change, I wish it were a more 
substantial film.
Bottom Line:  This is what women wanted forty years ago.
Traffic
Reviewed by Christian Pyle
Directed by Steven Soderbergh
Written by Stephen Gaghan (based on the miniseries by Simon Moore)
Starring Michael Douglas, Don Cheadle, Benicio Del Toro, Erika Christensen, 
Luis Guzman, and Catherine Zeta-Jones
Grade:  C+
"Traffic" has the good fortune of going into wide release after receiving 
Golden Globe nominations and numerous critical top-ten list postings.  
Without much competition, it will probably do well at the Oscars, but despite 
good intentions and some impressive moments, "Traffic" fails to achieve its 
goals.
Rather than centering on a central protagonist, "Traffic" weaves together 
three major storylines:  a) Judge Robert Wakefield (Michael Douglas) becomes 
the new drug czar while his daughter Caroline (Erika Christensen) becomes a 
drug addict; b) Mexican cop Javier Rodriguez Rodriguez (Benicio Del Toro) 
pursues the Tijuana drug cartel and becomes allied with General Arturo 
Salazar (Tomas Milian), who seeks the same goal for his own reasons; and c) 
DEA agents Montel Gordon (Don Cheadle) and Ray Castro (Luis Guzman) watch 
Helena Ayala (Catherine Zeta-Jones) after arresting her drug-dealing husband 
(Steven Bauer).  Director Steven Soderbergh lacks the grace of Robert Altman, 
but he manages to keep all three storylines running simultaneously without 
losing the audience.
The primary reason "Traffic" doesn't fully succeed is that it wants to be 
several different movies:  a thought-provoking indictment of the failed "war 
on drugs," a portrait of addiction, and a gripping crime drama.  Perhaps a 
more talented director than Soderbergh might have been able to pull off this 
triple threat, but "Traffic" only manages to partially fulfill its goals.  
The critique of the methods and ideology of the drug war is spotty and often 
awkward (particularly when minor characters suddenly launch into speeches on 
subjects like the effect of NAFTA on drug traffic).  There's only one drug 
addict in the movie, which seems odd for an issue-driven film on the Drug 
Problem, and that one is unsympathetic.  Caroline Wakefield comes off as a 
spoiled brat, and her descent from prep school honor student to junkie whore 
doesn't elicit the pathos it should.  Erika Christensen does nothing to 
humanize her character.
Its strongest area is the crime drama vein with the parallel stories of 
Mexican and American cops who pursue the same cartel from different ends of 
the supply chain.  Especially compelling is Javier's plight.  An honest cop 
working within a corrupt system, Javier walks a winding and dangerous road 
paved with compromises.  Benicio Del Toro gives a remarkable performance.  A 
film like this tests the ability of an actor to develop his character with 
limited screen time.  Del Toro communicates more with a pensive look than 
most actors can with a soliloquy.
Also passing with high marks:  Don Cheadle and Michael Douglas.  I'm pleased 
that after so many wonderful supporting performances, Cheadle has gotten 
name-above-the-title recognition with this film.  He has great chemistry with 
Guzman (who deserves some recognition of his own).  I expected Robert 
Wakefield to be a heavy, but Douglas makes us feel the concern Robert has for 
his daughter.  
In contrast, the challenge of her first substantial role proves that 
Catherine Zeta-Jones has no acting ability whatsoever.  Her character has to 
go from being a high society wife whose world is overturned to a cop-killing 
drug dealer.  However, Zeta-Jones' performance shows no internal conflict or 
transformation.  She could be one of the worst actors in Hollywood.
In case you haven't guessed, I'm not a Soderbergh fan.  Ever since he came on 
the scene with "sex, lies, and videotape" in 1989, I've dismissed him as 
pretentious hack.  He's the valedictorian of the "Look at me, I'm an auteur" 
school of filmmaking.  (His classmates include Spike Lee and Oliver Stone).  
This style is characterized by an oppressive directorial presence that often 
undercuts the effectiveness of the film.  In "Traffic," Soderbergh joins the 
current trend toward monochromatic tints.  Douglas' scenes often have a blue 
tint while Del Toro's are yellow and grainy.  Luckily the power of those 
actors performances is not impeded by the distraction, but the heavily 
stylized approach seems a poor choice for a film that aspires to realism.
For those who like to play It's Ol' What's His Name, the supporting cast 
includes Dennis Quaid, Miguel Ferrer, Topher Grace (from "That 70's Show"), 
Amy Irving. Peter Riegert, Benjamin Bratt, Albert Finney, Salma Hayek, James 
Brolin, and several real-life senators (including Orrin Hatch, who does not 
read from "The Exorcist").
Bottom Line:  Doesn't deserve most of the Oscars it will win
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Star Trek: Insurrection (1998)
Of the nine Star Trek films, "Insurrection" most closely approximates the style
of the television series.  It begins, as many TV episodes did, with a
surprising turn of events that intrigues the viewer.  Working with an invisible
survey team, Lt. Cmdr. Data (Brent Spiner) suddenly reveals his presence to the
planet's inhabitants and takes hostages.  Of course, his pals on the Enterprise
rush to investigate.  They discover that the planet's inhabitants-the
Ba'ku-possess immortal youth thanks to the "metaphasic radiation" provided by
the planet's rings and that a Federation admiral (Anthony Zerbe) is plotting
with a dying race-the Son'a-to relocate the Ba'ku and steal the radiation.
The inevitable clash between the admiral and Capt. Picard (Patrick Stewart)
concerns the Federation's Prime Directive, the rule of non-interference with
other cultures.  The Directive was invented back in the original 1960's TV
series as a band-aid for Star Trek's dirty little secret, its roots in
imperialist mythology.  All that boldly-go-where-no-one-has-gone-before,
basic-human-quest-to-explore stuff is the old cover story for European
campaigns to conquer, colonize, and exploit everyone else in the world.  The
Prime Directive reassures viewers that the Federation has higher, selfless
ideals.
Occasionally, Star Trek explores its roots.  In one of the last episodes of the
"Next Generation" series, for example, the Federation ordered Picard to
relocate a tribe of Native Americans because of a treaty the Federation made
with the Cardassians.  "Insurrection" is in the same mold, but seems
artificial:  the Ba'ku are peaceloving and kind; the Son'a are twisted and
selfish.  If the two groups were not so clearly a dichotomy of good and evil,
the movie would be more engaging.
"Insurrection" is the best of the "Next Generation" series thus far, and best
captures the intelligence of the TV series.  However, there are problems with
bringing this crew from the small screen to the large.  The major one is that
the movie is crowded.  While the "classic crew" had a subset (Kirk, Spock, and
McCoy) that, convention dictated, would receive most of the attention, the six
characters serving under Picard all have fan followings and seem to require
equal screen time.  Characters have to be developed on the fly, and little time
is left to introduce each of them to a new audience.
Michael Piller's script is peppered with jokes, probably in an attempt to give
this film the appeal that "Star Trek IV: The Voyage Home" (1986) had.  The
humor that comes out of the personality of the characters works well-for
example, Data, an android long obsessed with understanding the human
experience, befriends a child and learns to play-but other gags are just
embarrassing.  

Title
Review for Mission: Impossible II (2000)
No sooner do I lament the failure of imported Hong Kong superstars to match
their earlier work than I have to retract it.  (You can find the tirade in my
review of "Shanghai Noon").  Just when I least expected it, director John Woo
has given us a feast for the eyes in "Mission: Impossible 2."  It's been a 
long
wait, watching his American movies for hints of the action-master who directed
"The Killer" and "Hard Boiled."  Woo came to Hollywood to make 1993's "Hard
Target" and followed it with "Broken Arrow," "Face/Off," and a few made-for-TV
projects.  All of these movies show at least the fingerprints of Woo in
trademark moments like the hero leaping with two .45 automatics blazing, but
none of the movies reflected the Woo we knew from his Hong Kong works.  I did
not expect this situation to change with "M:I-2," the most-hyped movie of the
summer, because the studio pressure would likely be intense.  But I was wrong 

Title
Review for What Planet Are You From? (2000)

What Planet Are You From?
Reviewed by Christian Pyle
Directed by Mike Nichols  
Written by Garry Shandling, Michael Leeson, Ed Solomon, and Peter Tolan
Starring Garry Shandling, Annette Bening, John Goodman, Greg Kinnear, and Ben
Kingsley
Official Site: http://www.spe.sony.com/movies/whatplanet/
Grade:  C+
Somewhere way out there is a planet with a society that has advanced beyond the
need for reproduction.  However, they haven't gotten past the desire for
conquest yet, so the planet's leader (Ben Kingsley) dispatches H1449-6 (Garry
Shandling) to Earth to impregnate a human female.  (If this works, they'll send
lots more guys to knock up our women, and the offspring will eventually take
over the planet).  The alien operative comes to Earth with the human name
Harold Anderson and a job at a Phoenix bank.  His slimy co-worker Perry (Greg
Kinnear) takes Harold to an AA meeting to pick up chicks.  There they meet
Susan Hart (Annette Bening), who's just given up a life of debauchery in favor
of sobriety.
The aliens have an unusual mode of travel between planets:  they beam
themselves into the restrooms of airplanes in flight.  So, while Harold seeks a
receptive womb, FAA investigator Roland Jones (John Goodman) is looking into
the bright lights and turbulence that accompanied Harold's arrival on Earth. 
Although skeptical after twenty years on the job, Roland soon deduces the truth
about Harold.
On their first date, Susan tells Harold that she's not going to have sex again
until she's married.  The next time he sees her, Harold proposes.  After some
deliberation, Susan accepts, and they're off to Vegas.  Even as he moves closer
to completing his mission, Harold begins to have feelings for Susan that
weren't covered in his training.  Will he be able to leave her when the baby is
born?
>From "The Graduate" to "The Birdcage," Mike Nichols has directed fresher,
funnier movies than this one.  The laughs in "What Planet Are You From?" come
in clumps separated by slow and predictable sequences.  The script by Shandling
and company could have used another rewrite or two.  It benefits from the fact
that sex is always funny, but it doesn't find any new approaches to familiar
gags.  Several of the funniest bits are beaten to death with repetition.  For
example, Harold's artificial penis hums when he gets an erection.  The first
time around, the joke is really funny; by the fifteenth time, it's just
annoying.
In the varied ensemble cast, Annette Bening stands out.  She plays her part of
the recovering alcoholic seeking meaning and stability with the earnestness of
drama.  As a result, Susan is a well-developed, three-dimensional character. 
Although the men get higher billing, the supporting actresses provide many of
the funniest moments.  Caroline Aaron is hilarious as Roland's suspicious wife
Nadine who believes that his sudden interest in work must mean he's having an
affair.  Linda Fiorentino plays Perry's wife who tries to seduce Harold to get
even with her husband (who actually is having an affair).  Nobody can play a
seduction scene as well as she can.
Despite having starred in two ground-breaking television series, Garry
Shandling remains a comedian, not an actor.  He can deliver funny lines with
skillful timing, but he can't bring a character to life.  This flaw doesn't
bode well for his career as a movie star, and I predict he'll find his way back
to the small screen or be content with supporting roles.  Speaking of
supporting actors . . . Greg Kinnear and Ben Kingsley CAN act but this movie
doesn't give them much to work with.  They both try hard but their characters
are standard stock figures we've seen a dozen times before.  I especially hope
to see Kinnear in a meatier role soon.  He proved his talent with his
Oscar-nominated performance in "As Good as It Gets" but hasn't challenged
himself since.
Bottom Line:  A handful of hilarious scenes separated by genial but stale plot
development
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Three Kings (1999)
"Three Kings"
Written and Directed by David O. Russell (from a story by John Ridley)
Starring George Clooney, Mark Wahlberg, Ice Cube, Spike Jonze, Nora Dunn, and
Jamie Kennedy
Official Site:  http://www.three-kings.com/
Grade:  B+
I remember an episode of "Donahue" soon after the Gulf War.  Phil came out and
stoked the crowd by declaring, "We kicked ass!"  Everyone cheered like their
team had just won the Super Bowl.  But then Phil started listing the number of
civilians killed by American bombs and all the issues left unresolved at the
end of the war, and the audience seemed very confused.  Somehow we expected
this war to be as simple as a "Die Hard" movie.
At the beginning of "Three Kings," the war has just ended.  While stripping a
prisoner, Troy (Mark Wahlberg) and Conrad (Spike Jonze) find a map sticking out
of his butt.  Special Forces Major Archie Gates (George Clooney) discovers that
the map shows the location of a fortune in gold that Iraq stole from Kuwait. 
Archie is ticked off because his current assignment is babysitting a reporter
(Nora Dunn), so he's open to a little pilfering that will allow him to retire
in style.  Along with Chief Elgin (Ice Cube), the guys set out into enemy
territory to retrieve the gold, brandishing like a weapon a letter from
President Bush that gives them permission to seize any contraband.  (And, by
the way, yes, there's four guys-I don't know which one isn't a king).  
When they find the gold, they also discover that the war isn't over for
everybody.  In the village where the gold is hidden, Iraqi troops are killing,
torturing, and starving the villagers.  The reason:  President Bush urged the
people to rise up against Saddam Hussein, implying that they would have
American support.  However, the American withdrawal left them at the mercy of a
dictator who wants to crush the rebellion.  
When Archie and company arrive, the enemy troops are so eager to see them leave
that they help the Americans load the gold.  Of course, our heroes are so moved
by the villagers' plight that they load up the people, too.  A battle breaks
out, and any chance that the guys can return quietly to base is lost.
"Three Kings" shifts tone drastically when its heroes discover the misery
created by America's too-simple war.  The movie begins with satiric bite,
chomping away at the assumptions of the American military.  My favorite moment
has Troy instructing his white-trash friend Conrad on the appropriate racial
slurs for their enemy.  When the guys take up the cause of the rebellion, the
tone becomes melodramatic, tugging at the audience's heartstrings with images
of children in danger and of peace-loving families threatened by aggression. 
The switch may be disconcerting to many viewers, and fans of one part of the
movie may not care for the other.  My taste is for the satire.  Director David
O. Russell has a flair for edgy comedy, but his turn to melodrama seems overly
manipulative.
Despite any flaws in its method, "Three Kings" deserves high praise for raising
questions about war and foreign policy.  Very few American films-especially
ones with high-profile stars-take on complex political issues that audiences
would rather not think about.  "Three Kings" forces anyone who sees it to
consider what America's role in the conflicts between other countries should be
and whether any conflict can ever be completely resolved.
Among the stars, Spike Jonze earns particular mention.  Although he is better
known as a director (of music videos and the new feature "Being John
Malkovich"), Jonze proves himself an able actor.  While his higher-billed
costars bring out their familiar, audience-tested personas, Jonze takes a
stereotypical redneck character and brings him to life.  Although he begins as
a dull-witted racist, Conrad becomes the most interesting and appealing
character of the film.
Bottom Line:  "Three Kings" plucks your heart strings too roughly, but it
challenges your mind to think about important issues.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Nurse Betty (2000)
Well, when your husband's brutally murdered in front of you, what can you do 
but drive halfway across the country in search of a soap opera character?  At 
least that's the reaction of Betty Sizemore (Renée Zellweger) in "Nurse 
Betty," the latest entry in the cinema of quirk.
Betty waits tables at the Tip Top Diner in a small town in Kansas and dreams 
of being a nurse.  Del (Aaron Eckhart), her jerk of a husband, sells cars, 
boffs his secretary, and deals stolen cocaine.  The last enterprise brings 
hitmen Charlie (Morgan Freeman) and Wesley (Chris Rock) to his door.  They 
murder Del but don't know that Betty is watching from the next room.  Betty 
has a "dissociative reaction" that causes her to lapse into the fantasy that 
Dr. David Ravell, a character that George McCord (Greg Kinnear) plays on the 
soap "A Reason to Love," is her ex-fiance.  Betty packs up the car she'd 
borrowed from her husband's lot and headed for LA unaware that ten kilos of 
stolen dope are hidden in her trunk.  Since Charlie and Wesley need to find 
the drugs and eliminate the witness, they follow Betty into the desert.  
Along the way, Charlie begins to fall in love with Betty.
Charlie's love for Betty parallels Betty's love for Dr. Ravell in that both 
fall in love with fantasy figures rather than real people.  That irony 
produces most of the laughs in this movie that unashamedly mixes light comedy 
and film noir tension, as if "Soapdish" collided with "Blood Simple."  
However, the filmmakers never sacrifice the illusion of realism for cheap 
laughs or overly contrived plot twists.  "Nurse Betty" is the least 
predictable film I've seen in ages because it refuses to follow generic 
conventions.
Despite its strengths, John Richards and James Flamberg's script is thin and 
what makes "Betty" work is the excellent cast.  Zellweger gives Betty a 
refreshing combination of starry-eyed innocence and steel-willed 
determination.  A character who might otherwise have seemed pathetic becomes 
instead a heroine.  Freeman offers us a disarmingly sensitive hitman, and the 
angry sarcasm of Rock provides a hilarious counterpoint.  Kinnear is quite 
good in "Betty" as well, but considering his amazing performance in "As Good 
As It Gets" I wish he would take on more substantial roles.
The ghost of the Blair Witch continues to haunt internet marketing.  USA 
Films has set up an official site for "A Reason to Love" 
(http://www.areasontolove.com/) and a wonderfully tacky fan site for Dr. 
Ravell (http://www.nurse-betty.com/drravell/). 
Bottom line:  Quirky fun but not for the squeamish.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for A.I. Artificial Intelligence (2001)
"A.I.: Artificial Intelligence"
Reviewed by Christian Pyle
Written and Directed by Steven Spielberg (based on a short story by Brian 
Aldiss)
Starring Haley Joel Osment, Jude Law, and Frances O'Connor
Official Site: http://aimovie.warnerbros.com/
Grade:  B-
In "An Alan Smithee Film: Burn Hollywood Burn," a director demands final cut 
on his picture.  A studio head responds, "Nobody gets final cut except 
Spielberg and Kubrick!"  This is possibly the only time the names of these 
famous directors were mentioned in the same sentence before "A.I." linked 
them to the same project.  Stanley Kubrick worked for years on developing 
Brian Aldiss' "Supertoys Last All Summer Long" into a film.  Before his 
death, Kubrick passed the project on to Steven Spielberg.  Little probably 
remains of Kubrick in "A.I." except for the use of some of his production 
designs for Rouge City, where architecture is derived from the erotic female 
form, and in cinematographer Janusz Kaminski's use of natural light.  (Some 
of Kubrick's designs can be seen in the recent documentary "Stanley Kubrick: 
A Life in Pictures.")
The plot explores familiar science-fiction themes, particularly whether 
artificial intelligence (A.I.) constitutes human life.  The A.I. in question 
belongs to David (Haley Joel Osment), a prototype of a new kind of "mecha" 
(android) that is capable of love.  Up til now, mechas have only been able to 
simulate emotions, but Prof. Hobby (William Hurt) has created a 
child-surrogate who will genuinely love its owner/parent.  Enter Monica and 
Henry Swinton (Frances O'Connor and Sam Robards), whose son Martin (Jake 
Thomas) is in a coma.  Henry brings David home, and, after some initial 
reluctance, Monica initiates David's attachment programming.  However, Martin 
miraculously recovers and returns home.  Naturally, he resents his new 
brother and begins to needle David; David is unable to compete because he's 
programmed to be an ideal child and aspects like sibling rivalry and childish 
cruelty are not part of the package.
After an accident nearly drowns Martin, Monica decides to get rid of David.  
Once a mecha has attached itself to a parent, it cannot be reprogrammed and 
must be destroyed.  However, Monica cannot bring herself to take David back 
to his manufacturer to be melted down, so she releases him in the forest.  
Taking his cue from Pinocchio, David decides to seek out the Blue Fairy to 
turn him into a real boy so his mother will love him again.  As companions he 
has a mecha Teddy Bear (voice of Jack Angel) and a "love-mecha" named Gigolo 
Joe (Jude Law).  
The premise seems sick and sad.  Why would anyone create a child that never 
grows up?  Why would anyone want to love a child whose destiny is to be 
destroyed when its parent dies or becomes bored?  Kubrick specialized in 
"sick and sad," and he may have intended to explore these areas.  However, 
Spielberg seems too wrapped in the high-tech Pinocchio story to think about 
how twisted David's very existence is.
Something about science fiction brings out the sappiest side of Spielberg.  
His aliens in "Close Encounters" and "ET" are the warmest and fuzziest this 
side of Ewoks.  (But even Ewoks tried to eat the humans.)  The treacle of a 
robot's quest to be a real boy is only interesting because the goal seems 
impossible.  However, Spielberg seems unable to accept that.  There is a 
point where the movie seems to end, after David finds the Blue Fairy.  It's a 
good ending, a powerful ending, but a downer.  Spielberg seems unwilling to 
accept that, so the movie continues the story in the even more distant 
future.  
At the heart of the problem in "A.I." is probably Spielberg's father issues.  
He has a well-documented tendency to depict fathers as absent, reluctant, or 
distant.  This theme explains the otherwise bewildering fact that David is 
only programmed to bond with one parent.  David's "father" Henry seems 
irrelevant to David and to Spielberg, who uses Henry as a catalyst to 
introduce David to Monica, then pushes Henry aside.  As David's quest 
develops, he doesn't want to win a place in the family; instead, he wants to 
eliminate his father and brother and have his mother all to himself.  
Spielberg's greatest asset and greatest weakness as a filmmaker is that he 
is, at heart, a ten-year-old boy who never grew up.  This aspect of his 
personality gives his films a trademark sense of wonder that can be 
compelling.  But judging by the self-indulgent ending tacked onto this 
picture, the ten-year-old is still working on his Oedipal conflict.

Title
Review for Blue Streak (1999)
When cat burglar Miles Logan (Martin Lawrence) rips off a $17M diamond just
before the cops close in, he has to leave the stone behind:  duct-taped inside
the heating system of a building under construction.  A couple years later,
Logan gets out of jail and returns to the building to find that it's an LAPD
precinct.  To get inside, he gets forged credentials and passes himself off as
a new transfer to the robbery division.  
With his dorky white partner Carlson (Luke Wilson) in tow, Logan hits the
streets and discovers that being an experienced thief comes in handy for a
detective.  Before long, he's promoted to lead detective.  Meanwhile, his
partners in the diamond heist (Peter Greene and David Chappelle) want their
share, but getting the diamond out of the station proves to be harder than
Logan thought.
For a Martin Lawrence project, "Blue Streak" is surprisingly tame and
mainstream.  It's almost a Disney movie.  This may be the influence of director
Les Mayfield, whose last two films were "Flubber" and "Miracle on 34th Street,"
or it could be the screenwriting team of Michael Berry and John Blumenthal,
whose previous collaboration was another tame cop comedy, "Short Time" with
Dabney Coleman.  At any rate, it's strange company for a comedian with
Lawrence's raunchy rep.  (Maybe he has his eyes on the lucrative family market
that revived the careers of Robin Williams and Eddie Murphy).  
The script milks its premise for every gag it can, but it's Lawrence's
high-energy performance that yields the laughs.  His best moments have the
freshness of improvisation, a welcome contrast to the stale script.  Compared
to Lawrence, the rest of the cast seems to be moving in slow motion.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Being John Malkovich (1999)
Unemployed puppeteer Craig Schwartz (John Cusack) answers an ad for a file
clerk with "fast hands."  When he arrives at the building for his job
interview, Craig finds that the company is located on Floor 7˝.  This floor is
half the height of any other, so Craig (and everyone else) has to walk hunched
over.  During orientation, Craig meets Maxine (Catherine Keener), an alluring
woman whom Craig pursues despite being married.  
When one of his files drops behind a cabinet, Craig discovers a small door.  He
goes through it, crawls down a tunnel, and is flung into the mind of John
Malkovich.  Craig experiences the world as Malkovich for fifteen minutes and
then falls from the sky into a ditch by the New Jersey Turnpike.  When he tells
Maxine about his adventure, she sees the potential for profit.  They form a
partnership to sell rides through the portal.
When Craig's wife Lotte (Cameron Diaz) takes the trip, she emerges questioning
her gender identity.  Hearing this, the enigmatic Maxine gets the hots for
Lotte and arranges to have a dangerous liaison with Malkovich when Lotte is in
his head.  Jealous, Craig plots to insert himself into Maxine and Lotte's
relationship.  Malkovich becomes, essentially, a strap-on dildo in a bizarre
love triangle.
"Being John Malkovich" is the long-awaited feature debut of director Spike
Jonze, who made a name for himself directing music videos for groups such as
the Beastie Boys, Sonic Youth, and Weezer.  The film lives up to expectations. 
Jonze's style is inventive and appropriately whimsical but doesn't draw undue
attention to itself.  Traveling down a rabbithole in the sky, Jonze offers us a
postmodern, post-Freudian Wonderland.  Particularly good are sequences in which
Malkovich goes down the tunnel to confront a universe of himself and another
where Lotte and Maxine rush through Malkovich's subconscious.
Charlie Kaufman's intellectually rich script offers the viewer much to ponder
but demands little.  You can enjoy it on it most basic level and have a very
good time.  However, the movie also creates the opportunity for deep thought
and discussion about identity and states of being (discussions probably best
undertaken with the mind-altering substance of your choice).
Among the cast, Malkovich and Diaz give especially strong performances.  While
most of his previous characters are calculating and creepy, Malkovich is
surprisingly warm and sympathetic as himself.  He's also not afraid to engage
in physical comedy in scenes where Craig takes control of his body.  Best known
as the alluring Mary about which there was "something" that drew men to her,
Diaz is cast against type as the plain wife Craig forsakes for Maxine, who
seems to have that "something."  (Even Lotte falls for her.)   Diaz manages to
bury her glamorous image and bring the complex Lotte to life.
So . . . why Malkovich?  The movie stresses that the thrill of the going
through the tunnel is being someone else-anyone else.  That John Malkovich is a
famous actor is unimportant.  In fact, judging from the characters in the
movie, Malkovich isn't all that famous; Maxine has never heard of him, and
Craig can't name any of his movies.  If we took a poll of actors people would
like to be, John Cusack and Cameron Diaz would probably place much higher than
their titular co-star, but the relative obscurity of Malkovich is just part of
the wonderful quirkiness of this film.
Look for cameos by Charlie Sheen, Sean Penn, and Brad Pitt as themselves. 
Sheen's first appearance is one of the movie's funniest scenes.
Bottom line:  Fresh and inventive, "Being John Malkovich" is a delight to the
eyes and to the mind.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Toy Story 2 (1999)
Directed by John Lasseter
Written by Andrew Stanton, Rita Hsiao, Doug Chamberlain, and Chris Webb
Starring the voices of Tom Hanks, Tim Allen, Joan Cusack, Kelsey Grammer, Don
Rickles, Jim Varney, Wallace Shawn, John Ratzenberger, and Wayne Knight
Official Site:  http://disney.go.com/worldsofdisney/toystory2/index.html
Grade:  B+
When Andy leaves for cowboy camp, his mother holds a yard sale and scrounges in
his room for old toys.  One of these toys is Wheezy, a penguin with a broken
squeaker.  Woody (Tom Hanks) saddles up Andy's dog and rides out into the yard
to rescue Wheezy.  Woody succeeds in his mission, but doesn't make it back to
the house before Al, the unscrupulous owner of Al's Toy Barn, recognizes Woody
as a rare collector's item and steals him.
Buzz Lightyear (Tim Allen) leads Hamm (John Ratzenberger), Mr. Potato Head (Don
Rickles), Slinky Dog (Jim Varney), and Rex (Wallace Shawn) into the city to
find their friend.  Meanwhile Woody discovers the reason he was kidnapped.  Al
has collected every piece of merchandising from the 1950's TV puppet show
"Woody's Round-up" except for a Woody doll.  Now that the collection is
complete, Al plans to sell Woody and his Round-up Gang-Bullseye the horse,
Jessie the cowgirl (Joan Cusack), and Stinky Pete the old prospector (Kelsey
Grammer)-to a toy museum in Japan.  The Gang is happy about the move; they've
been in storage for years waiting for Woody.  If Woody doesn't go with them,
they'll be closed up in a dark box again, possibly forever.  Trying to convince
him to stay with them, Jessie tells Woody how she was abandoned when her owner
grew up, and Woody realizes that his days as a beloved toy are numbered.
While Woody ponders whether to go to Japan or to go home to Andy, Buzz and the
boys invade Al's Toy Barn, where the Buzz we know is replaced by another Buzz
who doesn't know he's a toy.  The new Buzz generates the movie's biggest laughs
as he leads the other toys in an assault on "Zurg's fortress" (i.e., Al's
apartment building).
The original "Toy Story" won me over because its central themes reflected a
grown-up sensibility rather than the usual
this-is-what-we-think-kids-want-to-hear.  While most kids' movies take the
position that every person is special and has an extraordinary destiny to
fulfill, in "Toy Story" Buzz discovered that he wasn't special, that he was
just like everyone else.  Buzz sank into a suicidal depression, but Woody
showed Buzz that being a toy was worthwhile because a toy is loved and a toy
makes a child happy.  In other words, it's okay to be ordinary if you have love
and a purpose in your life.  Most of us probably come to the same conclusion
when we realize that we're not space rangers and we're never going to be.
"Toy Story 2" addresses the question raised by the conclusion drawn by the
first movie.  Woody is forced to recognize that Andy will grow up and forget
him and that he will likely be discarded, abandoned, or sealed up in a dark box
in the attic.  This is another big grown-up theme:  everything ends.  The theme
is introduced early in the movie when Woody's arm is torn and Andy places him
on a shelf rather than taking him to cowboy camp.  On the shelf, Woody meets
Wheezy, who's dusty, broken, and forgotten.  The other toys are shocked that
Woody has been "shelved," and they worry that Woody's ride out to the 25-cent
box at the yard sale is a suicide attempt.  After he's stolen, Woody has to
decide between a long life in a display case and an uncertain future with Andy
and his pals.
Of course, in spite of the heavy themes "Toy Story 2" explores, it's also very
funny.  Most of the laughs come from the toys' assault on Al's Toy Barn and on
the apartment building.  The brief substitution of a new, still delusional Buzz
was a welcome surprise; I'd wondered how a sequel could be as funny as the
original without the pompous attitude Buzz displayed in the original.
Most of the vocal performances are first-rate.  Tom Hanks stands out for the
level of enthusiasm he puts into his work.  However, one voice-over also stands
out as horribly miscast.  Kelsey Grammer sounds nothing like an old prospector.
 Although he does a lot of voice-over work in commercials and on "The Simpsons"
(as Sideshow Bob), Grammer only makes slight variations on his own voice.  He
doesn't have the range to pull off a role like Stinky Pete.
The animation is even better than in the first.  Especially impressive were the
textures of the figures.  We can now see the difference between flesh and
plastic; in the first movie the people looked just like the toys, but now human
skin looks soft and has a slight bluish tint.  We can also see that Bo Peep is
porcelain.  As you can tell from the long-winded phrasing common in the
merchandising -- "Disney and Pixar's 'Toy Story 2'" -- this is Pixar's coming
out party.  To celebrate they appended their first project, a hilarious short
about two desklamps and a rubber ball, to the beginning of the movie.  They
made the short in 1986, which is incredible when one considers the relatively
primitive level of computer technology available then.
On the downside, "Toy Story 2" follows the formula of the original so closely
that the sequel comes off a bit stale, and some sections tend to drag. 
Overall, though, I had a great time and found "Story 2" to be a worthy
successor to the first "Toy Story."
Bottom Line:  This one really is fun for the whole family!
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for If These Walls Could Talk 2 (2000) (TV)

"If These Walls Could Talk 2" (2000)
Reviewed by Christian Pyle
Directed by Jane Anderson, Martha Coolidge, and Anne Heche 
Written by Jane Anderson, Sylvia Sichel, and Anne Heche 
Starring Vanessa Redgrave, Michelle Williams, Chloe Sevigny, Sharon Stone, and
Ellen DeGeneres
Grade:  C
HBO's "If These Walls Could Talk 2" is an anthology of three films, each set in
the same house in a different year, each concerning a lesbian romance.  It's
not a sequel in any conventional sense.  Its only link to "If These Walls Could
Talk" is format; the first film told three stories about abortion that occurred
in the same house in different years.  (Oh, and Anne Heche acted in "Walls 1"
and writes and directs one of the segments in "Walls 2.")  I didn't like "Walls
1"; even though I agreed with it politically I found it overly manipulative and
one-sided.  On the other hand, its three parts fit together into a coherent
whole.  Although "Walls 2" is more pleasant to watch, its segments seem
unrelated to each other.
The first segment is the only one with a Message.  It's 1961, a time before
terms like "significant other" and "spousal equivalent" were coined.  To most
people who know them, Edith (Vanessa Redgrave) and Abby (Marian Seldes) are
just two elderly friends who live together.  We meet them at the movies, where
they're watching "The Children's Hour."  The movie is about two schoolteachers
whose lives are ruined by a rumor that they're lesbians.  In the scene we see,
Shirley MacLaine confesses to Audrey Hepburn that she is "guilty."  The scene
reminds us that "coming out of the closet" was not an option for Edith and
Abby.
That night Abby has a stroke.  She dies alone; because Edith isn't "family" she
can't be in Abby's room after visiting hours.  After the funeral Abby's nephew
Ted (Paul Giamatti) and his wife Alice (Elizabeth Perkins) start making plans
to sell the house that Abby and Edith bought together, and they box up Abby's
belongings without any regard for Edith's feelings.  Vanessa Redgrave gives a
magnificent performance as a woman who is silently going through Hell. 
Although Abby and Edith lived for decades like a married couple, Edith cannot
claim any right to her home, and no one understands the extent of her loss.
1972 finds a group of lesbian college students living in the house.  They've
just been ousted from the feminist collective they helped found because the
other women are concerned about being known as a "lesbian group."  On a lark
Linda (Michelle Williams) and her pals go to a lesbian bar where they receive a
cold reception from the middle-aged women dressed as men.  There Linda meets
Amy (Chloe Sevigny), a tough young woman in a button-down shirt and necktie. 
Linda's friends mock the "butch" look and question whether Linda can be a real
lesbian if she's attracted to someone who looks like a man.  The romance
between Linda and Amy seems a variation on a familiar formula:  the "girl next
door" and the "rebel without a cause."  Amy even has the requisite t-shirt and
motorcycle.
Although on first glance "1972" would seem to have less to say than "1961," I
found "1972" the most intriguing segment.  The schisms between different groups
of lesbians and between lesbians and feminists presents a complex portrait of a
subculture in transition.  However, these issues only serve as background for
the romance, which has its own areas that I wish were explored more fully. 
Director Martha Coolidge and writer Sylvia Sichel present Amy as self-assured
and in touch with her inner self.  But what is that self?  Any woman who straps
down her breasts would seem to have self-acceptance problems.  Does she see
herself as a man?  If so, what are the implications of that for Linda's lesbian
identity?  Or does Amy see herself as genderless?  If so, why masquerade as a
male?  These are questions Coolidge and Sichel refuse to address.
The final segment takes us to the present day in 2000.  The house is now shared
by life partners Fran (Sharon Stone) and Kal (Ellen DeGeneres).  Fran is trying
to get pregnant, so the ladies are in search of a sperm donor.  The tone is
light-hearted, and the love Fran and Kal share is sweet and endearing.  In
contrast to the two previous segments, the present seems a utopia of equality
and freedom, yet that doesn't seem an accurate reflection of reality.  I was
hoping that the third segment would take up the issues raised by the first two,
but the plights of Edith, with no legal or social recognition of her marriage,
and Linda, caught between warring factions, seem only distant memories.
Bottom line:  If these walls could talk, would they say anything?
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Palmetto (1998)
You know the plot:  a dimwit with a shady past is seduced into committing a
crime only to be double-crossed by a fatal femme.  In "Palmetto," the dimwit is
Harry Barber (Woody Harrelson), a reporter who's just been released from prison
(he was framed by the gangsters and corrupt officials he was investigating). 
Enter la femme:  Rhea Malroux (Elisabeth Shue), the sexy young wife of the
richest man in Palmetto, Florida (Rolf Hoppe).  She and her stepdaughter Odette
(Chloë Sevigny) have a plot to extort 500K from the old man:  Harry will
"kidnap" Odette.  After groping both women, Harry agrees.  As everyone except
Harry can see, he's being set up as a fall guy.  Sure enough, before long,
Harry has a dead body in his trunk and the cops on his tail.  His
brother-in-law (Tom Wright), an assistant DA, has hired Harry to be the press
liaison for the case, so Harry gets a front row seat for his own manhunt (and
we get to watch him sweat-literally).  There are several plot twists, of
course-a couple of them even took me by surprise.
Apparently every woman in Palmetto is a raving horndog, and they're on Harry
like he's the only bone in the kennel.  Shue vamps so broadly that I expected
Tex Avery's wolf to show up.  Her incredible performance in "Leaving Las Vegas"
seems to have been a fluke.  Here, she could easily be mistaken for Melanie
Griffith.  Shue's character is supposed to be a savvy schemer but she comes off
as a brainless bimbo.  In addition to Shue and Sevigny, the kennel includes
Gina Gershon (who filled the dimwit-with-a-shady-past role in "Bound") as
Harry's girlfriend Nina; when Harry gets out of jail, she licks his face (now
there's a horndog).  The parts are so overplayed that with a little push
"Palmetto" could have been an over-the-top parody of film noir a la "Romeo is
Bleeding."  As it is, it's best watched at  2am on Showtime (the love scenes
seem to have been written for one of that channel's soft porn programs anyway).
"Palmetto" has a well-known director, Volker Schlöndorff, who's best known for
his adaptations of major literary works, especially "The Tin Drum."  I suppose
he must have been drawn to this plot-by-numbers script by the same admiration
for classic film noir that led Scorsese to remake "Cape Fear."  Schlöndorff
tries hard-he makes an interesting motif out of the ubiquitous palmetto
bugs-but nothing can freshen up this stale script.
Read Chris' movie reviews at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Christian+Pyle
Check out our auctions at
http://cgi3.ebay.com/aw-cgi/eBayISAPI.dll?ViewListedItems&userid=pyles

Title
Review for Big Hit, The (1998)
"The Big Hit" didn't live up to its name at the box office, but it should have.
 It's a delightful surprise that left me chuckling even after it was over.
First-time screenwriter Ben Ramsey blends two genres that seem worlds apart to
create, essentially, "Pulp Fiction Meets Ferris Bueller."  You'll find the
twisted, violent humor of Quentin Tarantino's world merged with a
I've-got-to-fix-all-this-before-my-parents-get-home farce, and the disparate
styles blend better than you might imagine.  Of course, this hybrid genre is
not without precedent; 1997's "Grosse Pointe Blank" had some of the same
elements in its story of a hitman going to his high school reunion.  However,
"The Big Hit" has a different feel; it tosses out any sense of realism in favor
of style and fun.
"Marky" Mark Wahlberg, fresh from his comeback in "Boogie Nights," is hitman
Melvin Smiley.  He and some of his hitman buddies come up with a scheme to
kidnap the daughter of a wealthy Japanese businessman.  What they don't know is
that (a) the businessman is broke (he blew all his money making a movie called
"Taste the Golden Spray") and (b) the kidnapee (played by newcomer China Chow)
is the goddaughter of their godfather (Avery Brooks).  When he finds out that
his goddaughter has been kidnapped, the mob boss orders Melvin's partner/rival
Cisco (Lou Diamond Phillips) to hunt down those responsible.  So Cisco has to
kill Melvin before the boss finds out about his own involvement in the
kidnapping.
While all this is going on, Melvin is entertaining the parents (Lainie Kazan
and Elliott Gould) of his fiancee Pam (Christina Applegate).  While Melvin is
making nice with his future in-laws, his angry girlfriend (Lela Rochon) - yes,
he has a fiancee and a girlfriend - deposits the kidnapped girl and two bags of
body parts from a previous hit on Melvin's lawn.  He rushes around frantically
to keep Pam and her folks from finding out what he's been up to.
The whole thing gets really goofy at the end, but the spirit of fun that
pervades the movie prepares you for the silliness.
"The Big Hit" is the first American film by Hong Kong action director Kirk
Wong, and it also has the input of action sensei John Woo, who served as
executive producer.  Wong gives us a big stylized action sequence as Melvin,
Cisco, and friends put their lethal skills to work rubbing out a rival mobster.
The other two kidnappers are played by Bokeem Woodbine, whose character is
developing masturbation as an alternative lifestyle, and Robin Dunne, who plays
the stammering dunce of the group.  Kidnapee Chow is smart and funny; her
character, Keiko, refuses to be intimidated by her captors and begins to hit it
off with Melvin, who neurotically insists that everyone has to like him (and,
yes, someone does point out he's in an odd profession for a guy who wants to be
liked by everyone).  There's also a amusing subplot tossed in with a geeky
video store clerk (Danny Smith) who harasses Melvin to return an overdue copy
of "King Kong Lives."
"The Big Hit" may not be for everyone (some weirdoes don't even find murder and
kidnapping funny).  But I loved it when I saw it last summer, and I've enjoyed
watching it twice more since.  Give it a try if you haven't already.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review:  http://www.wpd.net/madreview/

Title
Review for X-Men (2000)
For the uninitiated:  The X-Men are superheroes who are mutants.  Mutants, 
according to Marvel Comics, are born with a genetic change which makes them a 
different species and gives each mutant a unique superpower that is 
manifested during puberty.  Professor Charles Xavier (Patrick Stewart) formed 
the X-Men to combat evil mutants and founded a School for Gifted Youngsters 
so that teenage mutants would have a place to hang.  Xavier's philosophical 
opposite is Magneto (Ian McKellen), a militant mutant leader who wants to use 
force to make a place for mutants in the world.
The X-Men were introduced in the comic books in 1963 and revived with a new 
membership in 1975.  The new team prospered and soon became the most popular 
comic book in America.  Over the last twenty years, Marvel has spun-off 
numerous titles and introduced dozens of mutant heroes and villains.
In adapting the comics to a movie, the filmmakers had to pare down the 
comic-book cast to the most popular characters.  Wolverine (Hugh Jackman) has 
an indestructible metal skeleton, sharp metal claws, the ability to heal 
nearly any wound, feral senses, and a disagreeable disposition.  Rogue (Anna 
Paquin) sucks the life-force out of people with her touch.  Cyclops (James 
Marsden) shoots laser beams out of his eyes.  Storm (Halle Berry) controls 
the weather.  Jean Grey (Famke Janssen) moves objects with her mind, and 
Prof. X is a telepath.
The X-Men's arch-enemy, Magneto, emits magnetism.  His Brotherhood is a 
hodge-podge of popular villains from the comic books.  Sabretooth (Tyler 
Mane) is a furry beast-man.  Mystique (Rebecca Romijn-Stamos) shifts shape, 
and the wall-crawling Toad (Ray Park) licks people from hundreds of feet away.
Here's the plot:  Senator Robert Kelly (Bruce Davison) is proposing 
legislation to register all mutants because he sees them as a threat to 
normal folks.  This brings to a head the ongoing feud between Prof. X and 
Magneto (Ian McKellen)  While that's brewing, teenager Rogue discovers her 
mutant powers and darts off toward Alaska.  In a seedy bar in the frozen 
north, she meets Wolverine.  They hang together long enough to introduce 
Wolvie's various attributes before Sabretooth (Tyler Mane) crashes the party, 
trying to recruit Rogue and Wolverine for the Brotherhood.  However, Cyclops 
and Storm end up taking home the beleaguered pair.  But Magneto isn't done 
with them yet . . .
Although many cranky X-Fans will be lamenting, "But what about [name of fave 
mutant here]?," six heroes, four villains, and a senator are a lot of 
characters for one movie.  Consider how bloated "Batman and Robin" was with 
only three heroes, three villains, and a butler.  It's easy to see why movies 
about superhero teams are even more rare than comic-book movies in general.  
There just isn't enough time to introduce and develop all those characters in 
the downtime between slugfests.  The solution that director Bryan Singer and 
screenwriter David Hayter come up with is brilliant; they focus on Wolverine 
and Rogue and sketch out the rest of the characters only as much as needed.  
Not only does that trim down the amount of exposition needed, but it also 
allows the audience to come to the X-Men from the perspective of a bewildered 
outsider.
The script does miss a few beats, though.  Magneto has this big evil machine 
that somehow works off of his magnetic powers, but no one ever really 
explains how it does.  The last scene confused me completely, but I can't 
really do into it without giving away the end.  Some of the humor works 
wonderfully (particularly the taunts between Wolverine and Cyclops), but 
other lines fall miserably flat.
Despite its flaws, "X-Men" is the first Marvel Comics movie to approximate 
the thrills of the comic book without stumbling into campiness.  Hayter's 
script incorporates crucial X-Themes.  As in the comics, mutants are a 
metaphor for any oppressed minority, allowing for blanket commentary on the 
politics of fear and hatred that use minorities to threaten the majority.  
Another common Marvel theme:  superpowers are more a curse than a blessing.  
This is particularly true for Rogue, who is a troubled teen terrified by her 
own powers.
"X-Men" is visually impressive.  The special effects are amazingly lifelike 
and include Toad's long-distance licking, Mystique's morphing, and Wolvie's 
claw-popping.  Some of the sets were rather bland (Prof. X has a thing for 
stainless steel walls) while others were quite inventive.  I wish the black 
leather uniforms were more colorful.
The cast is lead by two Shakespearean actors, Stewart and McKellen, and their 
resonant voices enriched their parts.  I wish that the script had given 
McKellen more meat to chew, but despite an early scene where we see young 
Magneto's mother dragged away to die in the Nazi gas chambers Magneto seems 
to be the standard badguy-bent-on-world-domination.  The bulk of the acting 
challenges went to Jackman and Paquin, and they both did fine jobs.  
Jackman's Wolverine is younger and less hard-boiled than his four-color 
counterpart, but Jackman gives us a well-rounded character who is sympathetic 
and likeable in spite of his gruff manner.  Oscar-winner Paquin is also in 
fine form and makes Rogue a teenage misfit we can all identify with.
Any movie version of something that has an insular cult following has to pull 
off the difficult task of appealing to both the faithful and the general 
public.  Singer aims for a middle ground between the two.  If you stand 
outside a theater showing "X-Men," you'll hear the True Believers exiting in 
heated discussion of how many things were changed.  I found it more fun to 
focus on how much the filmmakers retained:  Wolverine's adamantium skeleton 
and amnesia, the way Storm's eyes go white when she uses her powers, the 
Blackbird jet, even the street address of Xavier's School.   And what about 
all those moviegoers who don't know a mutant from a muskrat?  As I watched, I 
tried to imagine how I would react to this movie if I had never read an X-Men 
comic book.  I concluded that I might suffer from information overload and 
have a hard time following parts of the movie.  "X-Men" may prove a hard sell 
to the average popcorn-cruncher.
I had a great time, though.  I hope the effort proves successful and spawns 
sequels and imitations of the same high quality.  (The cast of "X-Men" are 
signed for two more pictures, so there's a likelihood of a trilogy if this 
one doesn't tank.)  
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Edtv (1999)
TV producer Cynthia Topping (Ellen DeGeneres) has an idea for a cable network
specializing in "reality shows":  take an average joe and broadcast his life on
TV everyday.  A talent search turns up Ed.  Ed Pekurny (Matthew McConaughey) is
a nobody, a 31-year-old video store clerk with no ambition.  He takes the offer
and Ed TV is born.  The show becomes a phenomenon when a romance develops
between Ed and his brother's girlfriend Shari (Jenna Elfman).  However, Shari
objects to dating with millions of peeping toms watching.  Ed doesn't
understand; although he's strangely unexcited about being a star, he accepts
his on-camera life casually.
Life becomes increasingly difficult for Ed and his family.  Everywhere he goes
crowds and cameras follow, and the constant attention threatens to devour
everyone around him.  "USA Today" takes polls on whether Shari is good enough
for Ed.  When Ed's father (Dennis Hopper) returns after a twenty-year absence,
the cameras record Ed's emotional confrontation with his mother (Sally
Kirkland) and stepfather (Martin Landau).  When Ed decides he wants out, the
network executive (Rob Reiner) says that Ed's contract gives them the right to
film him for as long as they want.
When "Edtv" was first advertised, I had the same reaction as most people: 
"Didn't they already make this movie?  It was called 'The Truman Show.'"  I
ignored the denials of director Ron Howard and various stars as they made the
rounds on interview shows and waited until "Ed" came creeping to cable before
seeing it.  There are basic similarities in the plots of "Ed" and "Truman"
(man's life is broadcast on TV, man decides he wants out of the glass house)
and in the things they satirize (loss of privacy, pop culture crazes), but the
focus is entirely different.  In "Truman" those issues were secondary to the
more esoteric theme of an everyman (Jim Carrey as Truman) discovering that a
god (Ed Harris) controls his life.  In the best parts of "Ed," the focus is
squarely on the twin streams of voyeurism and exhibitionism that fuel our
media-saturated society.   And the other parts?  By the end, the romantic
comedy has taken over center stage, and the movie's attempts to imitate the
comedy of "There's Something About Mary" fall flat (like Ed does on Elizabeth
Hurley's cat in one such scene).
Matthew McConaughey is the worst actor in Hollywood, but he seems to have
finally found his niche in this movie.  He was incredibly unconvincing as a
lawyer (in "A Time to Kill" and in "Amistad") and as a theologian (in
"Contact"), but as a lazy doofus McConaughey lives the part.  Among the
supporting cast, Martin Landau deserves special mention for his touching
performance as Ed's ailing but still upbeat stepfather.
Ironically, a movie about shameless self-promotion offers lots of opportunities
for . . . you guessed it . . . shameless self-promotion.  The Ed TV broadcasts
include an advertising area at the bottom of the screen, and the logos of many
real life corporations appear there.  Pepsi even puts a soda machine in Ed's
apartment.  Also, cameos abound.  Look for Jay Leno, Bill Maher, RuPaul,
Michael Moore, George Plimpton, Merrill Markoe, and Arianna Huffington to
appear as themselves.
Bottom line:  When "Ed" is on target, it fires straight and true.  The rest
we've seen before.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
"Saving Private Ryan" will certainly be remembered among the best war movies
ever made.  It does what a great war movie should-it looks realistically at war
and examines war intelligently.  The plot is deliberately insane:  eight men
are sent into enemy territory to rescue one solider, Private Ryan (Matt Damon).
 Ryan is the last surviving son in his family; his three brothers have all died
in action recently.  Gen. George Marshall (Harve Presnell) is moved by the
plight of Mrs. Ryan, who will learn about the three deaths on the same day, and
orders that the last Ryan be returned safely home.  The hitch is that Ryan
parachuted into Normandy on D-Day, and the Army has no way to know if he is
alive or to bring him out except to send a team in after him.  So, Capt. John
Miller (Tom Hanks) and his squad of Rangers, who have just survived the bloody
battle of Omaha Beach, are ordered to risk their lives to bring Ryan back.
Naturally, the eight soldiers on the rescue team must examine why Ryan's life
is valued over their own.  Ryan serves as much as a symbol as a character; he
comes to represent all the people that soldiers sacrifice their lives for.  The
plot allows "Saving Private Ryan" to explore the complex emotions the soldiers
feel about being asked to lay down their lives and those of their buddies for a
stranger.
In addition to this theme of sacrifice, "Saving Private Ryan" examines the
effects of war.  These eight men are not professional soldiers; they are
everyday guys from a variety of backgrounds who have been plucked out of their
civilian lives.  The men have a pool going about what their captain did for a
living before the war.  When he finally tells them, Miller comments that back
home people quickly guess his occupation and wonders if he has been changed by
the war, so changed that his wife won't recognize him.  Miller justifies the
mission as a purification, declaring, "If [saving Ryan] earns me the right to
get back to my wife, well then that's my mission."
The performances are excellent, and the characters are varied and interesting.
 (This is a major difference between "Private Ryan" and its rival WWII epic
"The Thin Red Line," where the characters tend to be indistinct and to blur
into each other).  The rescue team includes a seasoned sergeant with a
collection of dirt from all the places he's fought (Tom Sizemore), a grumbling
malcontent (Edward Burns), a sharpshooter who prays before firing (Barry
Pepper), a Jewish soldier who enjoys showing his Star of David to captured
Nazis (Adam Goldberg), a sensitive medic (Giovanni Ribisi), and a naďve
translator who's never been in combat before (Jeremy Davies).  Robert Rodat's
screenplay is rich in detail and gives the fine cast a good deal to work with.
"Saving Private Ryan" also features the most harrowing war sequence ever
committed to film.  After a brief introductory frame, we are taken to Miller
and crew on a boat headed for Omaha Beach.  As soon as the gate drops, machine
gun fire begins to tear men to ribbons.  Some dive into the water, but bullets
still slice into them indiscriminately.  Many viewers may be offended by the
violence, but it is doubtless a realistic depiction of the battle (as veterans
have affirmed).  This violence is also quite different than the glamous
shoot-'em-ups we've seen so often in action films-the hundreds of soldiers who
die in this brief scene never had a chance.
Despite its many strengths, "Saving Private Ryan" also has significant
weaknesses in choices made by director Steven Spielberg  and cinematographer
Janusz Kaminski.  Spielberg and Kaminski first collaborated on another movie
about the era of WWII, "Schindler's List" (1993).  What made "Schindler" such a
powerful picture was the clash between Kaminski's stark black-and-white
photography and Spielberg's tug-at-your-heartstrings style of epic
storytelling-either style without the other would have failed.  For "Private
Ryan," Spielberg bleached out 60% of the color in post-production.  While the
black-and-white of "Schindler" served well to suggest the bleakness of the
subject matter and to give a sense of the period (most 1940's movies were in
b&w), the bleached look of "Private Ryan" seems stylized and that undercuts the
movie's aspirations for realism.  Another odd choice-Kaminski's camera often
shakes.  He probably went this way to give the audience a feeling of the chaos
and confusion of battle, but the effect it has is to remove us from the scene
and remind us of the camera.  These strange decisions keep "Private Ryan" from
being the masterpiece that "Schindler" was.
Š 1999 Christian L. Pyle
">http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Christian+Pyle>

Title
Review for Road to El Dorado, The (2000)
For several years Disney enjoyed a virtual monopoly on the lucrative market 
for animated features.  A monopoly breeds monotony, and Disney's annual 
offerings soon slipped into a predictable "ugly duckling" formula (a misfit 
having an identity crisis has an adventure and discovers how special he/she 
is).  Gradually, though, competition emerged:  Fox entered the fray with 
"Anastasia" (1997), and Dreamworks pulled off the unlikely combination of 
Woody Allen and family animation in "Antz" (1998).  "Antz" was followed by 
"The Prince of Egypt", Dreamworks' first foray into traditional animation.  
"Prince" stuck close to the Disney formula but showed a lot of guts in its 
choice of a religious subject and in its refusal to sugarcoat the unpleasant 
elements of the story of Moses.  (After the way Disney sanitized the myth of 
Hercules, I doubt the House of Mouse would have shown God's destruction of 
the first-born children of Egypt.)  Now Dreamworks gives us "The Road to El 
Dorado," which is a pleasant antidote to Disneyfication.
Inspired by the "Road" movies of Bob Hope and Bing Crosby, "El Dorado" is the 
story of two Spanish con men, Tulio (Kevin Kline) and Miguel (Kenneth 
Branagh) who win a map to the legendary city of gold, El Dorado, in the 
Yucatan.  When the losers discover that our heroes were playing with loaded 
dice, Tulio and Miguel beat a hasty exit and unintentionally stow away on the 
ship of explorer Hernando Cortes (Jim Cummings).  Cortes threatens them with 
a life of slavery, but the guys manage another escape with the aid of Altivo, 
a war horse who's smarter than both of them.  Wouldn't you know it, they wash 
up on the shores of the New World right at a spot on the map.  With the help 
of Chel (Rosie Perez), a young thief who's not too keen on life in the city 
of gold, Tulio and Miguel enter El Dorado and, much to their surprise, are 
treated as gods by the high priest Tzekel-Kan (Armand Assante) because their 
arrival fulfills an ancient prophecy about how the Age of the Jaguar will 
begin.  There's a power struggle going on between the evil Tzekel-Kan and the 
benevolent Chief Tannabok (Edward James Olmos), and both badly want to earn 
the favor of the "gods."  The boys have to keep up the ruse as long as they 
can if they want to get away with all the golden tribute they collect.  All 
the time, of course, Cortes is on his way . . . 
If you overlook the coincidences in the plot (our heroes just happen to land 
at a spot on the map, the natives just happen to be speaking the same 
language they do), "The Road to El Dorado" is lots of fun.  Kline and Branagh 
bring rare enthusiasm to their vocal roles, and the friendship between Tulio 
the realist and Miguel the dreamer is touching without the overbearing 
sentiment of Disney.  It's also refreshing to see such rascals as these in an 
animated film.  Altogether, it's a breezier "Butch and Sundance."
The music for "El Dorado" reunites the Oscar-winning musical team from "The 
Lion King": songwriters Elton John and Tim Rice, and composer Hans Zimmer, 
with marvelous results.  When I saw "Tarzan" recently, I grew to hate Phil 
Collins, but when I left "El Dorado" I wanted to run out and buy the 
soundtrack.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Tailor of Panama, The (2001)

The Tailor of Panama
Reviewed by Christian Pyle
Directed by John Boorman
Written by Boorman, Andrew Davies, and John Le Carre (based on a novel by
Le Carre)
Starring Pierce Brosnan, Geoffrey Rush, Jamie Lee Curtis, and Brendan Gleeson
Official site:  http://www.spe.sony.com/movies/jump/f_tailorofpanama.html
In his latest film, Pierce Brosnan plays a British secret agent.  Imagine! 
What a range! 
In his defense, though, this spy, Andy Osnard, shares with James Bond only
his profession and his knack for pissing off his bosses.  After a series of
personal scandals, Andy is being exiled to Panama.  As soon as he gets off
the plane, Andy makes contact with Harry Pendel (Geoffrey Rush), a British
tailor who claims to have a Saville Row pedigree.  Since Harry cuts suits for
everybody who's anybody in Panama, Andy figures that Harry can provide him
with info juicy enough to convince London to send money.  As it happens,
Harry is deeply in debt and is willing to take Andy's offer.  So he spins
Andy tales of a group of revolutionaries planning to overthrow the gangsters
who control Panama.  Harry points to his friend Mickie Abraxas (Brendan
Gleeson), once a vocal opponent of Noriega but now a drunken shell of a man,
and his receptionist Marta (Leonor Varela), whose face was scarred by
Noriega's thugs, as leaders of the opposition.
Andy sees that Harry's stories, true or not, could be profitable.
This movie reminds me of "The Silver Bears," an obscure 1977 film in which
the Mafia takes over a Swiss bank and finds itself the victim of an elaborate
silver-mine scam.  Like that movie, "Tailor" presents a satiric world where
most people are corrupt to some degree and where the few innocents suffer
from the machinations of the guilty.  In "Tailor" someone describes Panama as
"Casablanca without heroes."  That's an apt description; in this movie Bogie
would have sold the letters of transit to the highest bidder, seduced
Bergman, and left Paul Henreid holding the bag.
But I wouldn't be surprised if "Tailor" was a more accurate depiction of how
real-life spies and governments operate than any other movie on the subject.
Although Brosnan gets higher billing, Geoffrey Rush is the lead actor, and he
does his usual top-notch job.  Harry Pendel is a complex character.  He's a
sweet person, a devoted husband (to Jamie Lee Curtis' character), father, and
friend.  He tries to embody the Saville Row tradition, believing that all the
best values of Civilization can be summarized by a well-cut suit.  However,
his whole life is built on lies.  The ghost of his criminal mentor Uncle
Benny (playwright Harold Pinter) appears to Harry whenever Harry is in danger
of telling the truth.  Rush plays the contradictions of Harry's character
expertly. 
Pierce Brosnan has a less challenging job than Rush but does an excellent job
of playing off his image.  Here the natural charm that he plays as suave as
Bond and Remington Steele is played here as slick and smarmy.  The line
between suave and smarmy proves the be surprisingly thin.  Perhaps that is
why Brosnan chose this role.  Since he's planning to leave the Bond series
after the next installment (due next year), one would think that he'd want to
play anything except a British secret agent.  Although he's only been playing
Bond since 1995, the shadow of 007 has lingered over him his entire career;
it's almost as if he had a visible tattoo saying Born to Be Bond.  Leaving
the role is a very risky move for his career.  Consider the post-Bond careers
of the other actors who've had the role; even Sean Connery had a lonely,
hitless decade before his Oscar-winning comeback in "The Untouchables."
Bottom line:  A cynical, entertaining antidote to Bond-inspired spy flicks
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review:
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Jack Bull, The (1999) (TV)
A jack bull, we're told, is a Jack Russell terrier who sinks his teeth into his
prey with such vehemence that his jaw has to be sawed off to remove him.  Such
tenacity is, of course, suicidal.
The title of "The Jack Bull," a recent western from HBO Pictures, refers to
horse rancher Myrl Redding (John Cusack), who proves his tenacity when he comes
into conflict with a greedy neighbor, Henry Ballard (L.Q. Jones).  In its basic
outline, "The Jack Bull" seems like hundreds of other westerns:  an honest
rancher is victimized by an evil land baron and fights back.  But screenwriter
Dick Cusack (John's dad) and director John Badham offer a fresh, intelligent
perspective on that familiar premise.
After Myrl clashes with him on the issue of whether Wyoming should become a
state, Ballard blocks the road Myrl must travel to sell his horses and demands
a toll.  Unable to pay, Myrl is forced to leave two prize stallions behind as
collateral, along with a hand (Rodney A. Grant) to care for them.  When he
returns with the money, Myrl finds that Ballard's goons have sadistically
worked his horses until they are covered with sores and unable to walk and
beaten the man he left with the horses.
Myrl attempts to sue for the rehabilitation of his stallions and compensation
for the hand, but he finds that the local judge (Ken Pogue) works for Ballard. 
When his wife (Miranda Otto) dies as a result of the feud, an embittered Myrl
declares war on Ballard.  He gathers an army of local landowners (they know
that Ballard intends to force them all out and gobble up their land) and begins
a violent campaign against Ballard and anyone who aids him.  In the end, both
Myrl and Ballard must stand trial for their actions before an honest judge
(John Goodman).
"The Jack Bull" is unremittingly bleak.  Badham bleached most of the color out
of the movie to give it a gray, overcast look that echoes its themes.  Myrl has
the same sense of masculine honor that we've seen in the heroes of the many
westerns with similar plots, but he is no superman.  The casting of boyish John
Cusack is key; he doesn't have the hardened exterior of most western heroes. 
As a result, Myrl is vulnerable, human, fallible.  And the world he inhabits is
more realistic.  Usually the hero is purified by his acts of violence against
an evil aggressor, but in "The Jack Bull" we know that every choice Myrl makes
has consequences that he will have to face.  He won't get any free pass just
because he's the "good guy."   By placing a simple and familiar plot in a more
complex and gray world, the elder Cusack and Badham force us to question the
choices Myrl makes and the cultural values that lie behind them.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.wpd.net/madreview/

Title
Review for Gingerbread Man, The (1998)
I'm a bit surprised that "The Gingerbread Man" came and went with so little
fanfare.  It boasts a plot penned by best-selling novelist John Grisham,
direction by legendary director Robert Altman, and a cast of familiar faces. 
Or, perhaps, it's not so surprising . . . because, despite having so many
talented people associated with it, "Gingerbread Man" is a run-of-the-mill
thriller.
Kenneth Branagh stars as Rick Magruder, a (you guessed it, Grisham fans)
Southern lawyer.  A divorced father of two, Rick is always on the prowl for
women and giving a ride home to Mallory Doss (Embeth Davidtz) turns into
spending the night in her bed.  Mallory is menaced by her father, Dixon (Robert
Duvall), an lunatic who has a posse of other crazy old men.  When Rick finds
Mallory's murdered cat dangling in her doorway, he volunteers to help commit
her father to a mental institution.  Dixon's pals break him out, and Rick
starts getting death threats.  When he gets a photo of his kids with their
heads cut out, Rick kidnaps his kids and hits the road.  When the kids
disappear, Rick and Mallory are drawn toward a violent confrontation with
Dixon.
There's a twist or two before it's all over, of course.
The cast also includes Robert Downey Jr. as a private eye who works for Rick,
Daryl Hannah (hidden underneath hair dye and spectacles) as a coworker of
Rick's, and Tom Berenger as Mallory's ex-husband.  Overall, the performances
are impressive.  Branagh sports the most convincing Southern accent in recent
memory (Downey's accent is less so).
While "The Gingerbread Man" is a enjoyable excursion, it is easily Altman's
most conventional movie.  Even when he's worked with genre fiction in the past,
Altman has retained his knack for creating quirky and original films (who else
would cast Elliott Gould as Philip Marlowe?).  His long list of grade-A work
includes "M*A*S*H" (1970), "McCabe & Mrs. Miller" (1971), "Nashville" (1975),
"The Player" (1992), and "Short Cuts" (1993).  But "The Gingerbread Man" offers
little that resembles any of Altman's previous movies and even less that blazes
any new trails.  It's a thriller-by-the-numbers, redeemed slightly by a strong
cast and a refusal in the end to forgive the hero for his sins.

Title
Review for Sleepy Hollow (1999)
Directed by Tim Burton 
Written by Andrew Kevin Walker (based on the story by Washington Irving)
Starring Johnny Depp, Christina Ricci, Miranda Richardson, Michael Gambon,
Casper Van Dien, Jeffrey Jones
Official Site:  http://www3.sleepyhollowmovie.com/flash_intro.html
Grade:  C-
Nearly every film Tim Burton has directed has been an homage to the horror
genre -- "Frankenweenie," "Beetlejuice," "Batman," "Edward Scissorhands," "Ed
Wood," "Mars Attacks!" -- yet none of them have been horror films.  "Sleepy
Hollow" is his first attempt to actually scare people.  I greeted the prospect
with high anticipation; Burton's whole career seemed to be leading up to this. 
I left disappointed.
Andrew Kevin Walker's screenplay takes only the character names from the
classic short story "The Legend of Sleepy Hollow."  In the movie Ichabod Crane
(Johnny Depp) is a New York City police constable who is trying to introduce
scientific methods of investigation to his superiors.  Ichabod is dispatched to
the small town of Sleepy Hollow to investigate a series of murders.  Several of
the town's leading citizens have been decapitated by the Headless Horseman.
Although he rejects the ghost story the town elders tell him, Ichabod finds
that the facts of the case confound his scientific reasoning.  He also
discovers that the killings are not random, that the victims are tied together
by a secret.  Along the way Ichabod gets help from a bewitching (literally)
young woman (Christina Ricci) and the son of one of the murder victims (Marc
Pickering).  
My reaction:  ho-hum.  The plot is an accumulation of cliches without even the
slightest touch of originality to make it interesting.  That in itself is
forgivable; Hollywood constantly tries to sell us used products in new
packages.  However, Burton's attempts at inducing fright come off as goofy.  It
might be his background -- in his previous movies, goofy was the goal.  Along
the same lines, it doesn't help that creature designer (and producer) Kevin
Yagher has done his best work for the tongue-in-cheek Tales From the Crypt TV
series.  A witch's eyes and tongue shoot out like Roger Rabbit's, a tree spurts
blood like it's in a Monty Python sketch, and the Headless Horseman . . . well,
he's a guy without a head . . . on a horse (boo!).
The performances are also awful.  Although he's impressed me with his work in
other films, Depp doesn't seem to know what to do with Ichabod, and his
dialogue is hampered by stilted diction that's supposed to pass for an 18th
century accent.  Ricci seems to put all her effort into seeming enigmatic,
which guarantees that we won't sympathize with her character.  The actor who is
revealed at the end to be the villain comes off as ridiculously cartoonish. 
The only pleasure generated by the cast comes from surprise cameos by
Christopher Lee, Martin Landau, and Christopher Walken.
I wonder if this movie was originally conceived as part of Francis Ford
Coppola's projected series of gothic adaptations, a series that produced only
"Bram Stoker's Dracula" and "Mary Shelley's Frankenstein."  Coppola is an
executive producer for "Sleepy Hollow," and the script reflects his interest in
early forms of "moving pictures," particularly in a toy that Ichabod carries
which blends two pictures to create an optical illusion.  (There's a bird on
one side of the card, a cage on the other.  When the card is flipped rapidly,
the bird appears to be caged.)
Bottom Line:  The hollow isn't the only thing that's sleepy.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Hanging Up (2000)
The ads make "Hanging Up" seem like an upbeat comedy about a rascally father
and his three daughters.  Anyone who went to the movie expecting that left
disappointed.  All of the movie's funny scenes were included in the ad.  
So what do we get?  Eve Marks (Meg Ryan) just put her father Lou Mozell (Walter
Matthau) into a hospital.  Once upon a time, Lou was a Hollywood screenwriter
who collaborated with his now-estranged wife.  His one great moment in life was
writing a film for John Wayne, who gave him a giant bullet-shaped trophy.  Now
Lou is senile and deteriorating rapidly.  Eve tries to convince her sisters
Georgia (Diane Keaton) and Maddy (Lisa Kudrow) that their father is dying and
needs them.  Both are slow to show concern.  So devoted Eve stands vigil over
her father, who constantly asks for his favorite daughter Georgia, while
running her own business (planning special events) and caring for her son
(Jesse James).  (Some comic relief comes when Maddy also drops off her ailing
St. Bernard for Eve to care for.)  The tension builds until all three sisters
are finally in one room at one of Eve's events where Georgia is the keynote
speaker.
There's a superficial resemblance to Shakespeare's "King Lear" (senile king
with three daughters:  one devoted saint and two selfish bitches), but the
material is apparently drawn from life.  Sister screenwriters Delia and Nora
Ephron had parents who were a successful Hollywood writing team.  Henry and
Phoebe Ephron collaborated on 17 screenplays, including "Desk Set" and "There's
No Business Like Show Business."  (Delia's novel, the basis for the film, is
dedicated to Henry).
Surprisingly, the script is as thin as an anorexic's wet dream.  The virtue of
a semi-autobiographical project would seem to be the wealth of material
available.  Yet, the Ephrons provide only the barest minimum of information
about their characters.  Also, the spaces they inhabit seem artificial.  Eve
lives in a house that looks like a magazine layout; no matter how put-upon she
is, we can't feel sorry for anyone whose house is so pristine on any given day.
 Georgia is a famous magazine editor, and in her brief scenes while she chats
on a cell phone with Eve seem like the photo spread for a profile.  When we
first meet Maddy, she's fishing at a picturesque mountain stream.  I expected
to see the credit "Cinematography by 'Vanity Fair.'"
And, yes, Diane Keaton is literally old enough to be Lisa Kudrow's mother.  To
her credit, though, she looks young enough to pull it off.
The one redeeming aspect of "Hanging Up" is that, at its core, is a truth about
siblings.  There's always one on which everyone else in the family relies,
freeing the others to be selfish and emotionally distant.  My wife is the
reliable child in her family; for better or worse, my brother has the role in
mine.  (Being selfish and emotionally distant may not be fulfilling, but it is
a lot less work).
If you have nothing better to do than watch this movie, look for a powerful
cameo by Cloris Leachman as the sisters' mother Pat.  In a devastating scene,
Eve discovers that her mother doesn't love her.  Although Leachman is best
known for comedies like "Young Frankenstein" and "The Mary Tyler Moore Show,"
her performance here reminded me of the considerable dramatic talent she
displayed in "The Last Picture Show."
Bottom Line:  Everyone involved has lived in Hollywood so long they don't
recognize real life anymore.

Title
Review for Adventures of Rocky & Bullwinkle, The (2000)
When I saw that the classic early 60's cartoon "Rocky and Bullwinkle" was 
headed to the big screen with an all-star cast and a mixture of live-action 
and animation, I predicted, "It's either gonna be really, really good or 
really, really bad."  Either the filmmakers would get the distinctive humor 
of the cartoon (a clever mixture of political satire, word play, and 
self-reflexive references) or they wouldn't.  The verdict is in, and they got 
it right.
The movie finds the cartoon players suffering from boredom.  The cancellation 
of their TV series left Rocket J. Squirrel (voice of June Foray, the original 
Rocky) and Bullwinkle J. Moose (voice of Keith Scott) with nothing to do.  
Likewise, their Pottsylvanian nemeses Boris (Jason Alexander), Natasha (Rene 
Russo), and Fearless Leader (Robert De Niro) were crushed (literally) by the 
collapse of the Iron Curtain.  So, the bad guys hatch a plot to conquer the 
live-action world.  With the help of movie producer Minnie Mogul (Janeane 
Garofalo), the evil trio emerges into our world and sets about enslaving 
America with the hypnotic effects of bad television.  FBI Agent Karen 
Sympathy (Piper Perabo) realizes that only her childhood heroes can save the 
day and brings Rocky and Bullwinkle into the real world.  (She also gets the 
deep-voiced Narrator to boot.)  Before they can fight the baddies, our heroes 
have to take a road trip across the country, a trip with several twists, 
turns, and celebrity cameos (including Randy Quaid, Carl Reiner, Jonathan 
Winters, John Goodman, Whoopi Goldberg, Kenan Thompson and Kel Mitchell, 
David Alan Grier, Don Novello, and Billy Crystal).
The key element in the cartoon series for me was the voice of William Conrad 
as the Narrator who commented with deadpan seriousness about the comical 
goings-on.  In the movie, Keith Scott does a great Conrad imitation and the 
interaction between the Narrator and the characters produces the majority of 
the laughs.  (A favorite moment: the Narrator comments on a bad pun by 
saying, "Even their wordplay had become weak and hackneyed," and Bullwinkle 
responds, "No, it was always like this.")
"The Adventures of Rocky & Bullwinkle" indulges unashamedly in cartoon 
silliness while winking at the audience and sharing the laughter at how silly 
it is.  Everything a critic might blast in the movie, screenwriter Kenneth 
Lonergan attacks with a preemptive strike.  Why don't they fly rather than 
driving across the country.  Bullwinkle:  "But then it wouldn't be a road 
movie!"  Why are the villains live-action and the heroes animated?  Karen:  
"Hey I didn't write the movie!"  When Karen asserts that Rocky and Bullwinkle 
aren't in a cartoon anymore, a safe falls from the sky in the path of her car 
(followed by bundles of dynamite marked with big letters TNT).  
De Niro is probably the last actor I'd expect to see in this movie, but then 
who ever thought Nicholson would do "Batman?"  Being a serious Actor in 
Hollywood (a live-action cartoon in real life) must get tiresome, and there 
must be an urge to just be silly.  De Niro parodied his many serious 
performances as gangsters in last year's "Analyze This."  In "Rocky and 
Bullwinkle," he seems to be having a great time doing a Nazi right out of 
"Hogan's Heroes."  He even gets the chance to parody his "are you talkin' to 
me" scene in "Taxi Driver."
I'm not sure if "Rocky and Bullwinkle" plays as well to kids as it does to 
adults.  My wife and I took two with us, and they were underwhelmed.  (They 
much preferred "Gone in 60 Seconds" and "X-Men.")  Come to think of it, I 
never really liked the cartoon when I was a kid.  But, seeing it again when I 
was old enough to get the in-jokes, I loved it.  And I loved the movie.  It's 
sheer fun that's intelligent and silly at the same time.
Bottom Line:  If you like the cartoon, you'll love the movie.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Unbreakable (2000)
Last year, writer/director Night Shyamalan rocketed from obscurity to the 
A-list with "The Sixth Sense," which won both critical and popular acclaim.  
This year, he hopes that lightning will strike twice by serving up another 
supernatural drama, "Unbreakable."  Bruce Willis is back, and there's a 
little boy and a twist ending, too.  However, the current pic just doesn't 
work.
You wouldn't know it from the trailers, but "Unbreakable" is a superhero 
movie.  It begins with a set of stats about comic-book collecting.  (It turns 
out that the average collector will devote an entire year of his life to 
reading comics; I wonder what he wasted the other sixty-nine years on.)  
Comics come up in the movie in the person of Elijah Price (Samuel L. 
Jackson), who suffers from osteogenesis imperfecta, a disease that causes him 
to have brittle bones.  Because he's spent most of his life recuperating from 
injuries, Elijah had a lot of time to read comics.  He owns an art gallery 
devoted to original art by comic-book artists and has an unusual theory:  
superheroes live and work among us.  Elijah figures that if he can have a 
disease that makes his body easily broken, then there must be others who are 
unbreakable.  
Security guard David Dunn (Bruce Willis) is unbreakable.  At the beginning of 
the movie, David is the sole survivor of a terrible train wreck.  Over a 
hundred people are killed, but David walks away without a scratch.  Based on 
this, Elijah believes that David is the fulfillment of his theory.  David has 
problems of his own; he's breaking up with his wife Megan (Robin Wright Penn) 
and trying to maintain a relationship with his son Jeremy (Spencer Treat 
Clark).  So, David resists the idea that he's Superman, until he discovers 
unusual abilities he never knew he had.
Everyone tries very hard to make this movie fly.  Shyamalan pervades every 
scene with the same subtle creepiness that enriched "The Sixth Sense."  His 
direction shows the same meticulous attention to color, and his script endows 
the fragile premise with as much realism as he can muster.  Willis gives his 
best performance in awhile.  While I found him unconvincing as a shrink in 
"Sixth Sense," Willis shines as dull-witted characters who are out of their 
depth (as in "12 Monkeys" and "Pulp Fiction").  David is such a character.  
(When Elijah inquires if David has ever been sick, David has to ask his boss 
and his wife to find out that he hasn't.)   Jackson is slick and charismatic 
with an undercurrent of menace.  Penn is down-to-earth and genuine.  Clark is 
sweet and likeable.
However, despite the admirable efforts of the director and his cast, 
"Unbreakable" just can't make its plot work.  A major part of the problem is 
the somber attitude with which Shyamalan approaches his subject.  Superheroes 
can be a lot of fun, but a sober tone robs the concept of its joy and wonder. 
 The movie's website includes a lot of information on real-life unbreakable 
people, so I assume that Shyamalan shares the theory he puts in Elijah's 
mouth.  Willis recently said that "Unbreakable" was the first chapter in a 
trilogy.  Hope the next two have a sense of humor.
Bottom line:  Unbreakable performances, brittle premise.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for 13th Warrior, The (1999)
"The 13th Warrior" 
Directed by Michael Crichton and John McTiernan 
Written by William Wisher and Warren Lewis 
Starring Antonio Banderas, Diane Venora, Dennis Storhři, Vladimir Kulich, Omar
Sharif, Anders T. Andersen
Official Site: http://movies.go.com/the13thwarrior/index.html
Better Sites: http://www.pnmp.net/13thWarrior/
http://www.powerup.com.au/~stott/13th.html
Grade: D-
In "The 13th Warrior," Arab poet Ahmed Ibn Fahdlan (Antonio Banderas) finds
himself kicked out of Baghdad for feeling up the king's old lady.  With his
translator (screen legend Omar Sharif in a small role), Ahmed heads north to
act as ambassador to the Northmen (Vikings).  He finds a group of warriors
mourning the loss of their king.  A messenger soon arrives from another kingdom
requesting assistance.  A soothsayer says that thirteen warriors must answer
the summons, twelve Northmen and one outsider.  Thus, Ahmed becomes the "13th
warrior."  
On the trip, Ahmed manages to learn the Vikings' language by listening to their
fireside conversations.  A bit far-fetched, it's true, but we have to swallow
it if this flick is going to manage a few lines of dialogue amidst the
grunting.  Ahmed, who's called "Ibn" by the Vikings, forms friendships with
Herger the Joyous (Dennis Storhři) and the Viking leader Buliwyf (Vladimir
Kulich).
When they arrive in the other kingdom, the thirteen warriors discover that
they're facing an army of supernatural cannibals that live up in the caves. 
Hereafter, most of the movie is battle scenes:  the cannibals attack the
Vikings, the Vikings attack the cannibals, the cannibals attack the . . . well,
you get the idea.  Just to add some action, there's also a Viking vs. Viking
duel.
Other movies insert scenes between the fights; these scenes are called
character development.  I suspect that "The 13th Warrior" had a better script
at one time and that it fell through the cracks because of the tag-team
direction.  The movie started off in the hands of John McTiernan (you'll notice
a lot of similarities between "Warrior" and McTiernan's "Predator," including
the chittering jungle sounds).  Somewhere along the line, McTiernan bailed and
Michael Crichton took over.  Crichton, whose novel "Eaters of the Dead" is the
basis for "Warrior," has directed a small assortment of goofy science-fiction
"thrillers":  "Westworld," "Coma," "Looker," "Runaway."  Their result of their
consecutive efforts is a murky and pointless movie.
Perhaps what "The 13th Warrior" needs more than anything else is a villain. 
The "eaters of the dead" are a faceless mob in blackface.  They have no
personality, and by the end they don't even seem particularly threatening.  The
audience has no target toward which to channel its aggression.  McTiernan
should know about the importance of an interesting villain; it was his "Die
Hard" that made villains seem fun and attracted big-name stars to the evil
roles in action films.
"The 13th Warrior" suffers from a lack of vision.  It wants to be "Predator"
meets "Braveheart" meets "The Magnificent Seven" meets "Dances with Wolves." 
With so many competing goals, all it can do is echo what it might have been. 
It might have been a satisfying action film.  It might have been a
beautifully-rendered medieval epic.  It might have been a thought-provoking
examination of the meeting of cultures.  What a shame it turned out to be
nothing in particular.
Bottom Line:  If you want to see Antonio swing his sword, rent "The Mask of
Zorro."
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Keeping the Faith (2000)
As "Keeping the Faith" begins, Brian Finn (Edward Norton) staggers into a New
York bar.  He sits morosely staring at a picture of three children.  The Indian
bartender (Brian George), who wears a "Kiss Me I'm Irish" sticker, offers an
ear and insists that, whatever Brian's problem is, he's heard it before.  Brian
unzips his jacket to reveal the collar of a Catholic priest.  The bartender
responds, "This I gotta hear."
The three children in the photo are young Brian and his best friends Jake
Schram and Anna Reilly.  As they grew, the boys lost track of Anna but remained
close to each other.  While Brian became a priest, Jake (Ben Stiller) became a
rabbi.  Both are committed to dusting off their respective religions and to
bringing the faiths together.  They preach their sermons like stand-up
comedians warming up a crowd.  Jake brings a black choir into his synagogue to
sing.  Together Brian and Jake are opening an inter-faith kareoke lounge.  They
like to think of themselves as "the God Squad."
Re-enter Anna (Jenna Elfman), now a high-powered corporate consultant.  She is
still a person of unbridled energy who shakes up the guys' lives.  As the
twosome again becomes a threesome, Jake is facing a problem.  In order to be
promoted at his synagogue, he needs to get married.  The "Kosher Nostra," the
mothers in his congregation, are constantly offering him daughters he can't
refuse, including a body-building nymphomaniac (Lisa Edelstein) and a network
news correspondent (Rena Sofer).  However, Jake finds himself drawn to Anna,
who isn't Jewish.  While they begin having an affair, Brian also falls in love
with her, leading to tension between the three friends.
"Keeping the Faith" is a joyous feel-good movie because it celebrates the
collapsing of barriers between races and religions.  The supporting characters
are a melting pot of different peoples living in harmony.  The movie also
treats religious vocations with respect, even making them seem fun at times. 
(Maybe too much fun:  as a gentile, I wondered whether Jake was breaking any
rules when he jumps in bed with Anna).  With fewer young men entering the
priesthood, I wonder if Edward Norton might be the best recruiting icon since
Bing Crosby.  The Catholic and Jewish humor is the gentle sort that these
groups make about their own religions.  First-time screenwriter Stuart Blumberg
delivers a very witty script filled with clever pop culture references.  All in
all, "Keeping the Faith" is the funniest movie I've seen this year.
This is the directorial debut of Edward Norton.  In his brief film career,
Norton has received two Oscar nominations.  In "Keeping the Faith," he not only
proves himself a capable director but also shows a talent for comedy that he
hasn't been able to explore in such weighty fare as "Primal Fear," "The People
vs. Larry Flynt," and "American History X."  Of course, Ben Stiller and Jenna
Elfman are always funny, and both are in fine form here.  The supporting cast
includes Anne Bancroft as Jake's mother, Eli Wallach as the senior rabbi in
Jake's synagogue, and Milos Forman (making a rare acting appearance) as Brian's
mentor.
There was one horrendous flaw in the film when I saw it, but I'm hoping that a)
the flaw was only in the preview version and will be fixed before "Keeping the
Faith" goes into general release or b) I was incredibly mistaken.  Anyway, the
problem was that a few scenes were out of order.  At one point in the movie,
Brian arrives at Anna's apartment in response to a phone call to find that she
has broken up with Jake.  But the break-up and the phone call came showed up
later in the movie.  (Even after Brian has confronted Jake about all this.) 
Editing mistakes are usually subtle continuity errors and the like, so I'm
scratching my head in astonishment that such a boneheaded set of mistakes could
slip through.  I hope the next time I see it, "Keeping the Faith" will be the
polished product it ought to be.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Lake Placid (1999)
"Lake Placid" marks yet another entry in the series of "predator pics" that
were a screen staple in the late 1970s (post-"Jaws") and were revived recently
by the godawful "Anaconda."  "Placid" claims to be a "horror/comedy"-it's
directed by the same guy who did "House"-but its attempts at humor are actually
less funny than deadpan seriousness of "Anaconda."
Paleontologist Kelly Scott (Bridget Fonda) is sent up to Maine to examine a
tooth removed from a body that had been bitten in half on the lake. 
Discovering that the tooth belongs to a crocodile (which shouldn't even be in
this hemisphere), Kelly goes croc-hunting with Game Warden Jack Wells (Bill
Pullman) and Sheriff Hank Keough (Brendan Gleeson).  They're joined by an
unwelcome guest, Hector Cyr (Oliver Platt), a scholar who worships crocs and
searches all over the world for them.  Along the way, the merry band meets Mrs.
Delores Bickerman (Betty White), a weird old lady who lives out on the lake.
You know what to expect from this movie:  lots of shots where the camera is the
eyes of the predator (croc cam) swimming toward someone's dangling legs while
"Jaws"-like music plays, one character (Hector) who's obsessed with the croc
and stupidly endangers the rest, another character who insists that the
predator can't possibly exist.  Unlike its slippery cousin "Anaconda," "Lake
Placid" wants to present its formulaic plot tongue-in-cheek, which is
self-defeating.  The result is neither scary nor funny; it's just tedious.
While director Steve Miner has several horror films on his resume (including
two installments of "Friday the 13th" and "Halloween H20"), screenwriter David
Kelley (best known as the creator of TV series like "Ally McBeal" and "Chicago
Hope") doesn't seem to have the stomach for a chomp 'em up flick.  The body
count is surprisingly low and doesn't include any of the major characters, and
most annoyingly Kelly and Hector insist that they capture the crocodile alive
rather than killing it.  ("Lake Placid" manages to have it both ways-I'll let
you discover how for yourself).
The croc itself is mostly computer-generated, of course.  Like the snake in
"Anaconda," the thirty-foot monster crocodile doesn't seem real; it moves too
quickly and in ways that seem unnatural.  "Lake Placid" also offers little
explanation for why a giant crocodile is in Maine.  There is a lot of
semi-mystical mumbo jumbo about how "we really don't know much about
crocodiles."  They would have been better off going with something like the
urban myth about alligators in the sewers.  A movie like this doesn't have to
offer much of an explanation (radioactive mutant? creature from outer space?),
but it does have to give the audience something to hang their disbelief on.
Pullman and Fonda seem to be plodding through the movie on auto-pilot.  Most of
the time, they're probably thinking about killing their agents or wondering if
making this movie marks the end of their careers.  Platt and White, on the
other hand, seem to be giving their best efforts, and they manage to squeeze a
few chuckles out of this sorry script.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.wpd.net/madreview/

Title
Review for Summer of Sam (1999)
New York City, 1977.  Coming home from a disco, Vinny (John Leguizamo) sneaks
into a crime scene and sees the bloody corpses of a couple shot by the ".44
Killer."  The killer would soon by sending letters signed "Son of Sam" to
newspaper columnist Jimmy Breslin (who appears at the beginning and end of
"Summer of Sam" as himself).  However, Sam (Michael Badalucco) and his murders
serve mostly as background in Spike Lee's new movie.  
"Summer of Sam" is really about Vinny and his friend Ritchie (Adrien Brody),
who's just returned to the neighborhood with spiked hair and an affected
British accent.  Vinny is cheating on his wife, Dionna (Mira Sorvino), because
he refuses to ask her for the oral and anal sex he desires.  Dionna feels Vinny
slipping away from her but cannot figure out how to please him.  Because of his
punk look, Ritchie finds himself an outcast in the neighborhood.  While trying
to get a band together, Ritchie makes extra money by dancing at a gay club and
turning tricks in the john.  He finds a soulmate in Ruby (Jennifer Esposito), a
neighborhood woman whose sexual history makes her an outcast as well.
As the murders mount and the summer heat wave goes on, tensions rise.  The guys
in the neighborhood start their own investigation to find the Son of Sam.  They
make a list of everyone who is odd, and Ritchie rises to the head of the list. 
Just as his marriage is collapsing, Vinny is called upon to choose sides
between Ritchie and the other guys in the neighborhood.
This is familiar territory for Lee.  His best-known film, "Do the Right Thing,"
also chronicles the disintegration of a neighborhood and the search for a
scapegoat, and it did so with more complexity and sophistication.  However, the
center of "Summer" lies not in its portrait of a neighborhood but in its
exploration of Vinny.  The dynamic of miscommunication and misunderstanding
between Vinny and Dionna is sensitively played by Leguizamo and Sorvino.  Vinny
is caught up in the madonna/whore dichotomy of his Catholic upbringing and
cannot see his wife as a suitable object for animal lust or Ruby as a suitable
wife for Ritchie.  Knowing that Vinny goes to other women to fulfill his baser
needs, Dionna is forced to the embarrassing necessity of asking Ruby (who used
to sleep with Vinny) for advice.  The tension between Vinny and Dionna reaches
a breaking point when they take part in an orgy.
Lee's style has grown increasingly pretentious over the years.  The greatest
flaw of "Summer" is the way that Lee draws attention away from the characters
with overplayed technical tricks such as tinting scenes and jump cuts,
techniques which seem intended to shout, "Hey look at me, I'm an auteur."  Like
"Get on the Bus," in which Lee overused many of the same techniques, "Summer"
has a strong, character-driven script and a talented cast.  The director's
style should enhance these strengths, not distract attention from them.
Look for lots of familiar faces in small roles.  Bebe Neuwirth (Lilith on
"Cheers" and "Frasier") is Vinny's mistress of the moment. Patti LuPone (of
"Life Goes On") and Mike Starr (a thug in numerous movies) play Ritchie's
parents. Anthony LaPaglia is a detective tracking the killer, and Ben Gazzara
is the local mob boss.  Michael Imperioli (from HBO's "The Sopranos") manages
the gay strip joint; Imperioli also co-wrote the screenplay and served as an
executive producer. John Turturro provides the voice of the dog that orders Sam
to kill.  Spike Lee plays a novice TV reporter; he has a wonderfully sly,
satiric scene when his character broadcasts from a black neighborhood with "the
darker perspective."
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.wpd.net/madreview/

Title
Review for Odd Couple II, The (1998)
So, it's thirty years later, and Oscar and Felix are together again.  That
might have been an exciting notion if it wasn't for the fact that the "odd
couple" of Jack Lemmon and Walter Matthau have been reunited in several recent
movies:  1993's "Grumpy Old Men," 1995's "Grumpier Old Men," and 1997's "Out to
Sea" (i.e. "Grumpiest Old Men").  So, "The Odd Couple II" (i.e. "The Grumpiest
Old Men of All, Really") seems just another entry in a tired series.
The plot is even similar to that of "Grumpy Old Men" in that Lemmon and
Matthau's mismatched characters are brought together by a romance between their
children.  Oscar's son (Jonathan Silverman) and Felix's daughter (Lisa Waltz)
are getting married, and former roommates Felix Ungar (Lemmon) and Oscar
Madison (Matthau) meet at the airport and decide to share a car . . . then
hilarity ensues.  Well, a few chuckles ensue anyway.
Neil Simon, the award-winning playwright who created Oscar and Felix, provides
the screenplay, which is a shock, because the script is a piece of talentless
hackwork from beginning to end.  Unlike the original play/movie, "Odd Couple
II" doesn't find its humor in the personality conflict of its characters. 
Instead, it depends upon a series of humorous situations:  Oscar and Felix lose
the car over a cliff, are caught smuggling Mexicans over the border, take up
with two women on the run from their violent husbands (the women are played by
Christine Baranski of "Cybill" and Jean Smart of "Designing Women"), and hitch
a ride with a man who dies in the desert.
The original 1968 movie "The Odd Couple" remains a classic comedy.  It
introduced the motif of roommate-as-spouse that has provided gags for movies
and sitcoms ever since.  It was the second outing for the Lemmon/Matthau team
(which debuted in 1966's "The Fortune Cookie"), and they made a couple more
worthwhile comedies, "The Front Page" (1974) and "Buddy Buddy" (1981), before
going their separate ways.  The reunion of Lemmon and Matthau in "Grumpy Old
Men" six years ago was delightful, and its sequel seemed appropriate because it
tied up some loose ends from the first movie.  But "Out to Sea" and "The Odd
Couple II" are just beating a grumpy old horse.  (You can add Lemmon's "My
Fellow Americans," i.e. "Grumpy Old Presidents," to that list, too.)  Let's
hope that Hollywood offers these two actors something fresh to do.  Let's hope
also that we see Neil Simon's name on movies that do it justice (this is his
first since 1993's "Lost in Yonkers").

Title
Review for 8MM (1999)
After 1993's "Falling Down," I hoped that Joel Schumacher would mature into a
great director.  Since then he has offered us two so-so adaptations of John
Grisham novels ("The Client" and "A Time to Kill") and two Batman movies that
lowered the standards of that franchise.  Although these disappointments
dampened my enthusiasm for Schumacher's potential, the publicity for his latest
release, "8MM," raised new hope.  It promised to be something unusual.  It
wasn't.
The plot goes like this:  Tom Welles (Nicolas Cage) is a private eye who is
hired by a wealthy woman, allegorically named Mrs. Christian (Myra Carter), to
investigate an 8mm movie found among her late husband's belongings.  The movie
appears to be a snuff film in which a teenage girl is raped and murdered by a
man in a leather mask (who reminds me of Bane in Schumacher's "Batman &
Robin").  Because murders can be realistically simulated in movies, Mrs.
Christian wants Tom to discover if the girl is alive or dead.  By combing
through missing persons reports, Tom finds the girl's name and tracks her to
Los Angeles.  With the aid of Max California (Joaquin Phoenix), a video store
clerk (and another symbolic name), Tom wanders through the underworld of
pornography in search of snuff.
The plot bears an obvious resemblance to Paul Schrader's "Hardcore," in which
a father goes deeper and deeper into the industries of porn and sex to find his
missing daughter.  Both films are modeled on Dante's "The Inferno," of course;
"8MM" makes that connection overly obvious by casting Max as Virgil and having
him constantly tell Tom that they were heading toward a meeting with the devil.
 "Hardcore" is a much more subtle and meaningful film.
"8MM" had a lot of promise.  In its better moments it's an examination of
violence as entertainment and of the beast within even a nice guy like Tom. 
One moment of the first sort:  when we first meet Max he's reading Truman
Capote's "In Cold Blood" underneath the cover of a porn novel.  "In Cold Blood"
was the father of the true-crime genre, which is the literary equivalent of
snuff films.
Max promises that we will see examples of the second theme when he tells Tom,
"Dance with the devil and the devil don't change; the devil changes you."  Tom
does change-I'll let you discover the specifics for yourself-but not
permanently. Schumacher and screenwriter Andrew Kevin Walker didn't have the
guts to take Tom so far down the dark tunnel that he couldn't come back. 
(Walker's "Seven" did a much better job on that theme by refusing to
compromise).
Cage tries hard to pull it off, but the script doesn't give him enough to work
with.  Phoenix walks away with the movie-he's smart, charming, and funny. 
Other cast members include "Fargo"'s Peter Stormare camping it up as porn
auteur Dino Velvet and "The Sopranos"'s James Gandolfini as a soulless porn
merchant who pushes Tom too far.
In the last analysis, since "8MM" falls short of its pretensions and its
promise, its just another private eye story in the Raymond Chandler/Ross
Macdonald tradition of having the detective uncover the depravity behind the
glossy facade of wealth and privilege.  However, unlike other predictable fare
in the genre-last year's "Twilight," for example-"8MM" is especially
disappointing because it could have been much more than it is.

Title
Review for Lara Croft: Tomb Raider (2001)
You'd think that after awhile Hollywood would stop trying to make movies out 
of video games.  It hasn't worked so far.  "Street Fighter?"  "Super Mario 
Brothers?"  "Wing Commander?"  "Mortal Kombat?"  Not a watchable film in the 
bunch.  Still I held out some hope for "Tomb Raider."  After all, the game's 
premise is heavily influenced by the Indiana Jones trilogy and all the mummy 
movies, so there are cinematic elements imbedded in the concept.  However, 
despite the potential of the project, "Tomb Raider" proves to be yet another 
bomb.
The plot is a convoluted accumulation of nonsense probably borrowed from a 
dozen bad movies.  There's a once-ever-5000-years alignment of planets coming 
up, and the Illuminati have to find both halves of an ancient triangle that 
controls time in order to take over the world.  Of course, the ancient folks 
who divided the triangle buried the halves in tombs on opposite sides of the 
world.  Our heroine, Lady Lara Croft (Angelina Jolie), finds the key that 
opens the tombs in relics that her dead father (Jon Voight) dug up.  She 
figures that if she gets the triangle, she can bring her dad back from the 
dead.
Of course, no one was expecting much of a plot from this movie anyway.  In 
both video games and action movies, the plot is just an excuse for the action 
sequences.  However, the action in "Tomb Raider" shows little style or 
originality.   There's lots of shooting and some kung fu fightin', but none 
of it progresses beyond the level of a cheap direct-to-cable flick.  The 
other goofy archeologist flick of the summer, "The Mummy Returns," was much 
better; it had its flaws, but its action was creative and large-scale.
Since winning her Academy Award for "Girl, Interrupted," Jolie hasn't taken 
any projects that would display her acting talents.  "Tomb Raider" seems to 
be more interested in displaying her breasts; so much attention is drawn to 
them that it's a shame there's no Oscar for Best Performance by a Wonderbra.
While we don't see much of her acting ability (with the exception of a 
wonderful upper-crust British accent), we do get a hint of Jolie's less 
savory side.  Considering the rumors of incest that hang over Jolie and her 
supposed obsession with death, having Lara be obsessed with resurrecting her 
dead father (and uninterested in any of the living males around her) seems a 
poor choice.  Having Jolie's real life father Jon Voight play the dead dad 
makes it even creepier.
I haven't decided what to make of director Simon West yet.  His first feature 
was the star-studded disaster "Con Air," but my opinion of him improved with 
"The General's Daughter," which was thick with sultry atmosphere.  Now this 
train wreck.  I hope he improves again because his next project is the big 
screen version of the cult TV series "The Prisoner."  Hollywood has already 
screwed up "The Avengers," and "The Prisoner" represents a chance for 
redemption.
(By the way, speaking of British TV, "Red Dwarf" fans should look for Chris 
"Rimmer" Barrie in his first major film role).
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Blast from the Past (1999)
It's 1962, and the Cuban Missile Crisis has everyone worried that nuclear war
is imminent.  But inventor Calvin Webber (Christopher Walken) is ready.  He's
got an elaborate fallout shelter under his backyard.  Just as Calvin takes his
pregnant wife Helen (Sissy Spacek) underground, a fighter jet crashes into
their house.  Thinking that the Bomb has dropped, Calvin seals the door with a
timelock that will open in 35 years, when the radioactivity will have
dissipated.  The shelter has a complete house and a warehouse full of supplies.
Adam Webber (Brendan Fraser) is born down there and grows to manhood in a
sanitized 1950's fantasy.
Up top, a malt shop is built over the ruins of the Webber home.  Eventually it
becomes a bar, and the neighborhood goes to hell.  In 1997 when Calvin comes up
to take a look, he finds weirdoes, lunatics, transsexual prostitutes, and adult
video stores.  Horrified, he decides that his family should continue to live in
the shelter, but Adam has to go out to restock their supplies.  Raised in an
artificial world, Adam is ill equipped to deal with modern day Los Angeles and
quickly finds himself lost and confused.  But Adam meets Eve (Alicia
Silverstone).  Eve and her gay best friend Troy (Dave Foley) adopt the manchild
and introduce him to the pleasures and perils of life outside the shelter. 
Adam and Eve fall in love, of course, with the usual
"boy-meets-girl/boy-loses-girl" complications.
Brendan Fraser seems to be type-cast as the "dopey good guy."  This project
could just have easily been "George of the Jungle Takes L. A."  "Blast" tries
to get a lot of mileage out of Adam's wide-eyed innocent response to all the
things he's never seen or done.  For example, when he sees his first black
person, he shouts, "Oh my lucky stars! A Negro!"  Fraser's amiability carries
such jokes.  The funniest moments, though, come from Christopher Walken and
Sissy Spacek.  In the scenes showing the passage of time in the shelter, Calvin
prefers his orderly underground world while Helen becomes an alcoholic, a fact
to which Calvin and Adam are oblivious.  These extremely conflicting reactions
are played for comedy and have more bite than anything else in the movie.
This premise could have been used for effective satire on the 90's or the 50's
or both.  However, screenwriters Bill Kelly and Hugh Wilson ignore that
potential and opt instead for light comedy in the fish-out-of-water vein. 
Pity.
Bottom line:  Pleasant distraction that neither taxes nor stimulates the mind.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Happy, Texas (1999)
Small-time crooks Harry Sawyer (Jeremy Northam) and Wayne Wayne Wayne Jr.
(Steve Zahn) bust out of jail and steal an RV.  The RV, it turns out belongs to
David and Steven, a gay couple who go from town to town organizing beauty
pageants.  Harry and Wayne find themselves escorted to David and Steven's next
destination -- Happy, Texas -- where Harry and Wayne have to take over the task
of organizing a pageant for little girls.  Wayne gets the job of teaching the
girls to sing and dance, while Harry romances the owner of the local bank, Jo
McLintock (Ally Walker of TV's "Profiler"), with the goal of ripping off the
bank.  At the same time, thanks to his homosexual cover story, Harry is the
subject of unwanted advances from the local sheriff, Chappy Dent (William H.
Macy).  Wayne has a romance of his own with the kids' teacher (Illeana
Douglas).  Meanwhile, the law (Ron Perlman) and an enemy from prison (M.C.
Gainey) are gaining on the boys.
Despite this movie's quirky indie vibe, at heart it's painfully mainstream. 
Its plot is derived from the same formula as "Houseguest," "Sister Act," and
"Blue Steak":  the hero has to pretend to be someone he's not in order to hide
out, and in the process he changes his life and the lives of those around him. 
That plot is tame and predictable, I hoped that Harry and Wayne would actually
rob the bank and skip town, leaving devastation in their wake.  Instead,
everything goes pretty much as you'd expect.
The most redeeming feature of "Happy" is the performance of Macy.  His
character is a challenge:  a tough Texas lawman who's also a closeted
homosexual.  A lesser actor would have reduced Chappy to a cartoon of
masculinity, but Macy makes Chappy a fully-rounded, believable, and sympathetic
character.  When Chappy's heart is inevitably broken, the scene is devastating.
 Macy's work also keeps "Happy" from being just a homophobic gag, an updated
version of the men-in-dresses motif of "Some Like It Hot."
Sporting a thick drawl, Zahn wrings all the humor he can out of the script as
his character becomes increasingly obsessed with teaching his young charges to
strut their stuff. Northam is a fine actor -- he outacted the overrated Rupert
Everett in "An Ideal Husband" -- but "Happy" gives him nothing to work with. 
Likewise, Ally Walker seems to have potential, but Jo is just another "modern
woman making it on her own in a provincial small town."  Ho hum.
Bottom line:  the gay topic may seem avant garde, but "Happy, Texas" is pure
Disneyland.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Eyes Wide Shut (1999)
Everything I know about the movies I learned from Stanley Kubrick.  "The
Shining" was the first movie of his that I saw, and as I watched the scene
where Danny big-wheels through the large room I understood for the first time
in my life that movies don't just happen, that everything in a movie is
carefully crafted and pieced together.  My crude sense of filmmaking prior to
this epiphany was that someone just pointed a camera and actors did stuff in
front of it.  That, I figured, was pretty much the whole process.  Then I saw a
Kubrick movie, and "it skinned my eyes for me" (line borrowed from "The Horse's
Mouth").
It would be a few more years down the road before I would devote myself to
seeing all of Kubrick's movies.  By that time, "Full Metal Jacket" (Kubrick's
most recent film until now) had long since gone from the big screen to late
night cable.  So, all the Kubrick I had seen until today had been on the small
screen.  I've followed the trickle of reports about the progress of "Eyes Wide
Shut" for two years; with the death of the director earlier this year, "Eyes"
became my last chance to see a Kubrick film on the big screen when it was first
released.
The plot:  After a party where they both flirt with other people, Dr. Bill
Harford (Tom Cruise) learns that his wife Alice (Nicole Kidman) lusts after
other men.  This revelation sends Bill into New York City on a sexual odyssey. 
An old friend (Todd Field) tells Bill about an underground orgy.  Bill bluffs
his way into the party, which takes place at a secluded mansion.  The trappings
of the orgy resemble a black mass-everyone is cloaked and masked, and the sex
is preceded by a ritual.  A woman, naked except for her mask, warns Bill to
leave before he is exposed, but he fails to heed her advice.  The rest of the
film concerns Bill's investigation into the sexual coven.
>From the moment when Bill's delusions about his wife are shattered-the moment
when his eyes go from wide-shut to wide-open-everyone around him is changed. 
Suddenly his mere presence seems to elicit extreme lust in women:  one woman
(Marie Richardson) mauls him only a few feet from her father's corpse; the
daughter (Leelee Sobieski of "Deep Impact") of a shopkeeper (Rade Serbedzija of
"The Saint") offers herself to him with her eyes.
Although "Eyes" is based on a German novel ("Traumnovelle" by Arthur
Schnitzler), it could just as easily be an updating of Nathaniel Hawthorne's
short story "Young Goodman Brown."  In that story, the title character
discovers that all of the seemingly virtuous people in town, including his
wife, are part of a satanic cult.  The essential difference between "Young
Goodman Brown" and "Eyes Wide Shut" is that Bill does not have the comfort of
being the only virtuous person in the world.  He is as corrupt as those around
him, and his sins bring harm to others.  Like the Hawthorne story, "Eyes" is an
allegory with Calvinist overtones (every human is utterly depraved and
undeserving of redemption).
I've given "Eyes" two grades:  one for Kubrick fans, another for everyone else.
 For those who look at the film stylistically, it is a wonderful experience. 
For those who aren't devotees of Kubrick's work, "Eyes" will probably seem dull
and predictable.  
Tom Cruise still can't act.  He's one of those stars who generally plays
variations on a single persona, but the character of Bill Harford is nothing
like the impulsive young hotshots that are Cruise's stock-in-trade.  However,
that Cruise is obviously out of his depth works for the role in a strange way: 
Bill is also out of his depth.  Also, Cruise has a natural talent for seeming
dense, and Bill is very dense (after nine years of marriage he's just
discovered his wife has sexual desires).  However, Cruise is especially
effective in Kubrick's trademark close-ups; he manages to look as if his whole
world has just shattered.  
Kidman and Sydney Pollack (who plays a friend of Bill's) are excellent.  Kidman
is especially riveting, but she has only a few scenes.
I saw "Eyes" a week after it hit town, and the theater was still packed.  Even
though this meant that I had to sit on the front row and look up at a 90-degree
angle for three hours, I was pleased to see that so many people realized that
the release of Kubrick's last film-twelve years after his penultimate film-was
a major event.  But I also worried that many of them would leave disappointed
because they came with mistaken expectations.  
A few months ago I saw a magazine cover with a photo of Cruise and Kidman and
the text "THE SEXIEST MOVIE EVER?"  I grimaced; even then I knew it wouldn't be
sexy at all.  Kubrickian eroticism is an oxymoron.  The essential defining
element of his style is its coldness.  All of Kubrick's best works are
essentially horror movies, and horror of the first order-it doesn't scare you,
it chills and disturbs you deep in your gut.
Despite all the fuss over the rating, "Eyes" is also not shocking.  The
simulated sex at the orgy is oddly pedestrian (so much so that we're left to
wonder why the coven would go to the lengths they do to cover up their
activities).  In an age where the internet provides a carnival sideshow of
every possible perversity and where the President of the United States uses
cigars as dildos, the humping in "Eyes" hardly even seems dirty.  If you're
looking for shock, try Pier Paolo Pasolini's "Salo, or The 120 Days of Sodom."
"Eyes" is not for those seeking cheap thrills, but it is also not for people
who aren't tuned into Kubrick.  A friend who went to "Eyes" with me (and who
had to be dragged against her will because she has a phobia of Tom Cruise)
challenged me to defend the movie.  I can't defend it; I can't even explain why
it affected me as deeply as it did.  "Eyes" resonates on a purely aesthetic
level that defies description or explanation.  Trying to explain Kubrick to
someone who isn't attuned to his style is like trying to describe sunlight to
someone blind since birth.
The experience is akin to seeing my first Van Gogh painting up close and
personal ("Undergrowth with Two Figures" at the Cincinnati Art Museum).  The
power of the painting smacked me right between the eyes and left me dumbfounded
as it washed over me.  But others might look at the same painting and be
unaffected.  What it boils down to is you either get Kubrick or you don't.  If
you do, you should rush out to see "Eyes;" if you don't, you will probably find
"Eyes" to be silly, but you owe it to yourself to study his work when you have
the time.
Grade: A- (for Kubrick fans); D- (for the rest of you)
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.wpd.net/madreview/

Title
Review for How the Grinch Stole Christmas (2000)
You know something, Christmas is not about presents.  It's about over-hyped 
holiday films with lots of merchandising and product tie-ins.  At least that 
would seem to be the message of "The Grinch," which has been advertised since 
last Christmas and whose logo is currently plastered all over stores.  
Hollywood expects us to ignore this cynical greed as the movie scolds us 
about losing the true spirit of the season.
You know the plot:  there's this evil furry green guy called the Grinch (Jim 
Carrey) who lives on a mountain overlooking Whoville.  Down below all the 
Whos are preparing for their Whobilation, but the Grinch is determined to 
steal their Christmas.
The movie is, of course, a live-action version of the beloved children's 
book, which was previously adapted into a 1966 TV special by Looney Tunes 
animator Chuck Jones.  It's rare that a big budget Hollywood release is 
shamed by a thirty-year-old half-hour cartoon, but that's the case when 
Jones' version is compared to Ron Howard's.  The TV Grinch hit all the right 
notes:  Boris Karloff's soft, deep narration; Thurl Ravenscroft singing "Mr. 
Grinch"; Max the dog weighed down by the gigantic antler tied to his head; 
and the Grinch's wide, toothless grin.
By contrast, the movie hits one sour note after another.  First, there are 
the numerous bad choices that Jeffrey Price and Peter Seaman made in padding 
out the short book into a 105-minute movie.  Young wide-eyed Cindy Lou Who 
(Taylor Momsen) is depressed about the misplaced priorities of her parents 
(Bill Irwin and Molly Shannon) during the holiday season.  She begins to 
sympathize with the Grinch, who turns out to be surprisingly sympathetic.  
Cindy Lou discovers that the Grinch turned tearfully away from Whoville in 
grammar school when he was publicly humiliated while expressing his love for 
the prettiest girl in the class, Martha May Whovier (played as an adult by 
Christine Baranski).  Are we expected to like the Grinch, hate the Whos, and 
want him to steal Christmas?  The Grinch isn't even the villain here; that 
role is filled by the corrupt Mayor of Whoville (Jeffrey Tambor) who was the 
Grinch's rival for Martha's affection.  Not only are the characters 
needlessly complex, but the once-simple plot becomes so convoluted that the 
actual theft of Christmas seems like an afterthought.
The casting choices aren't any better than the screenwriting decisions.  Jim 
Carrey seems woefully miscast.  While his face is so supple that the rubber 
make-up seems superfluous, Carrey brings nothing else to the role.  His 
accent keeps changing; I assume he was shooting for Karloff, but he ends up 
sounding like a weird slurry of Richard Nixon, Sean Connery, and Cartman from 
"South Park."  Not knowing what else to do during his many scenes alone in 
the Grinch's home, Carrey falls back on his stand-up comedy and clowns around 
Ace Ventura-style.  Needless to say, his wise-cracking antics don't quite fit 
the character of the Grinch, who is an embittered loner filled with hate.
Little Taylor Momsen brings little to role of Cindy Lou except big eyes and a 
cute smile.  She would have been fine if Cindy Lou was limited to her 
original purpose in the Seuss story (finding "Santa" in her living room 
stealing the tree).  However, the expanded script makes Cindy as important as 
the Grinch, and Momsen is not up to the challenge.
Bottom Line:  When you're stealing Christmas (movies), leave this one behind.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Mummy Returns, The (2001)
You know, nearly being killed by a 3000-year-old mummy might discourage some 
folks from pursuing a career in archeology.  But not the O'Connell clan.  
Eight years after beating back Im-Ho-Tep (Arnold Vosloo) and his dancing 
carrion, Rick (Brendan Fraser) and Evie (Rachel Weisz) are busy raiding tombs 
with their devilishly cute son Alex (Freddie Boath).  What they don't know:  
5000 years ago the Scorpion King (wrestler The Rock) sold his soul to Anubis 
in exchange for a demonic army of dog-men, and the time has come for Scorpy 
to rise again and take over the world.
Not everybody's in the dark.  The curator of the British Museum (Alun 
Armstrong) has a scheme to take over the army of Anubis, but he'll need some 
muscle.  So, he's raising Im-Ho-Tep from the grave again.  Why does he think 
that's a good idea?  
Mischievous Alex, the only one too young to know better, snaps on the 
Scorpion King's bracelet, making him the only one who knows the route to the 
lost oasis of Ahm Shere where the King and his army are resting in a golden 
pyramid.  When Im-Ho-Tep kidnaps Alex, Rick and Evie follow, along with 
Evie's no-good brother Jonathan (John Hannah), the Arabian knight Ardeth Bay 
(Oded Fehr), and a pilot named Izzy (Shaun Parkes).  Can this merry band whip 
two mummies and save the world?  I wouldn't be surprised if they pulled it 
off somehow.
I suppose it's only fair to mention that I was underwhelmed by the 1999 film 
to which  "Returns" is the sequel.  I felt that movie suffered from an 
identity crisis, unable to decide if it wanted to be "The Mummy" circa 1932, 
"Raiders of the Lost Ark," or "Army of Darkness."  Seemingly unaware that 
those movies had very different tones, "The Mummy" 1999 mixed elements from 
all three (and others) without any awareness that they clash with each other. 
 Even more so, "Returns" seems a bizarre gumbo of material borrowed from 
other films.  As a result, the movie leaves the viewer with the same uneasy 
feeling as a meal composed entirely of leftovers does.
Returning writer/director Stephen Sommers leaves little time for character 
development because the raison d'etre of this crowded pic is 
computer-generated battles with all manner of supernatural critter (including 
the slack-jawed henchmen from the last movie, the dog-men of Anubis, a bunch 
of mummy dwarfs, and the resurrected Scorpion King).  Sommers assumes that we 
a) know these characters and b) care what happens to them.  
The latter assumption is particularly false, due as much to bad acting as 
poor scripting. Brendan Fraser seemed an odd choice for a two-fisted 
adventurer in the first "Mummy," and he still doesn't seem to fit in his 
role.  He seems to have a gift for playing a good-hearted doofus ("Blast from 
the Past," "George of the Jungle," "Dudley Do-Right") but Action Hero is just 
not in his range.  Rachel Weisz doesn't bring much to the party either.  I 
liked her better in "The Mummy" because her character was out of her depth.  
In the sequel, Evie remembers she was a warrior princess in a previous life 
and starts kicking butt, making her more capable but less likable.  Also, the 
writers pressed too hard in asserting Evie as a respected scholar.  One line 
that made me wince was when she noted casually that people had been begging 
her "to take over the British Museum."  Weisz plays Respected Scholar about 
as convincingly as Denise Richards played Nuclear Physicist.
Wrestling fans beware, The Rock is hardly in the movie.  He is seen in a 
series of flashbacks at the beginning, but does not appear again as 
live-action.  (His character rises from the grave as a CGI beast).  I don't 
even think he has any lines.  However, those wanting some of his trademark 
trash talk should watch for a spin-off he's filming called "The Scorpion 
King."
Two actors who acquitted themselves well:  John Hannah and Oded Fehr.  Hannah 
is funny and charming as Jonathan.  His character is the only one not 
inflated beyond what the audience will buy or the actor can pull off.  As a 
result, Jonathan came off as the hero of the movie to me:  he's full of 
weaknesses and character flaws, but when his sister and nephew are in danger, 
he shows great courage.  Fehr has an easier job than most; all he has to do 
is look strong, handsome, exotic, and mysterious.  And he does it really well.
Bottom Line:  There's so much going on you may forget you don't care what 
happens to these people.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for My Dog Skip (2000)
"My Dog Skip" is based on the autobiographical tribute of journalist
Willie Morris to his boyhood pet.  Harry Connick Jr. proves the
narrative voice of the elder Morris looking back nostalgically to a
time when he lost his innocence in Yazoo, Mississippi, during World
War II.  Frankie Muniz, the star of TV's "Malcolm in the Middle,"
plays the nine-year-old Willie, a shy, small ch ld who is ostracized
by his peers.  His only friend is his teenage neighbor Dink Jenkins
(Luke Wilson), a high school sports star who's just joined the service
and is about to go overseas.  Realizing that Willie will be lonely
without Dink, Ellen Morris (Diane Lane) buys Willie a dog for his
birthday against the wishes of her husband Jack (Kevin Bacon).  Jack
seems stern and the elder Morris tells us that Jack lost "a piece of
his heart" in the Spanish Civil War along with a leg, but we learn
that Jack resists the dog because it inevitably bring the pain of loss
to Willie.  Willie loves his Jack Russell terrier Skip (Enzo and Moose
of TV's "Frasier") from the start, and Skip soon makes substantial
improvements in Willie's life.
The bullies who torment him become his posse, and the prettiest girl
in chool, Rivers Applewhite (Caitlin Wachs), starts to think he's hot
stuff.  There's a strong "Tom Sawyer" motif in this story.  (Oddly,
though, the director keeps showing us the cover of "Huckleberry
Finn.")  Like Tom, Willie is well-versed in tales of adventure and
leads his friends into mock exploits.  The bullies-turned-friends are
a collective Huck Finn, and Rivers is Becky Thatcher. There are even
some scary bootleggers who stand in for Injun Joe.
The Yazoo of "My Dog Skip" is misted over with the nostalgia common in
memoirs of childhood created after many decades.  (Witness, for
example, Franco Zeffirelli's recreation of his youth in fascist Italy
in "Tea with Musso ini.")  This Yazoo is more realistic than Mayberry
because it allows for the re lities of segregation and war, but it
still rings false.  Even worse, the sappy "Wonder Years"-style
voiceover commentary robs crucial scenes of their sweetness by droning
on and on about the significance of the events.
The saving grace of "Skip" are the performances of Frankie Muniz and
Kevin Bacon.  Muniz does a fine job approximating the accent and
mannerisms of a boy in a small Southern town in the 1940's.  Bacon
gives the best performance of his career.  When the Connick voiceover
introduces Jack Morris, one expects him to be mean and abusive.
However, Jack turns out to be a loving father, and Bacon reveals how
the outward bitterness shields his sensitivity.  He also manages well
with the awkward gait of a one-legged character.  Expect an Oscar
nomination for Bacon.
Bottom Line:  Strong performances keep "Skip" from drowning in its cloying
nostalgia.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review:
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Office Space (1999)
Successful animator Mike Judge ("Beavis and Butthead," "King of the Hill") has
written and directed his first live-action feature, "Office Space."  It has
more in common with the satiric realism of "King of the Hill" than the
adolescent slacker humor of "Beavis."  Judge's target is the mind-numbing,
soul-killing cubicle culture of the 9-to-5 corporate world.
Peter Gibbons (Ron Livingston) hates his job and dreams of doing nothing at
all.  (Think of him as "Ferris Bueller, 10 years later.")  He achieves his
dream briefly when a hypnotherapist (Michael McShane) puts him in a state of
perpetual relaxation.  While he is slacking off, a couple of efficiency experts
(John C. McGinley, Paul Willson) are surveying the employees to decide who to
"downsize."  They like Peter and promote him while firing two of Peter's
hard-working friends (David Herman, Ajay Naidu).  Peter encourages his buddies
to rip off the company with a computer virus.
Meanwhile, Peter is dating Joanne (Jennifer Aniston), a waitress at
Chotchkie's, one of those trendy bar-n-grills where the cubicle class gather. 
Joanne is also having problems with her job.  She's required to wear at least
fifteen "pieces of flair" (inane buttons and the like), and her manager insists
that she should wear more than the minimum to show her "Chotchkie's spirit."
"Office Space" is effective in its details and has many wonderful moments of
biting satire.  However, it lacks a story that ties all those beautiful details
together convincingly; in the middle, the characters seem to wander around in
search of a plot.
The best performances in "Office Space" come from its supporting actors.  Gary
("The Brady Bunch Movie") Cole is hilarious as Bill Lumbergh, Peter's boss. 
Lumbergh is a doofus who attempts to be casual as he leans against the edge of
Peter's cubicle with a coffee mug as a prop, as if he just happened to drop by
to chat, and asks in a grating monotone for Peter to work all weekend.  Another
great character is Milton, played by Stephen ("News Radio") Root, a mumbling
nebbish who is constantly mistreated and shortchanged.
If you work in a cubicle, have eight bosses, or have ever had to justify your
job to an efficiency expert, you'll especially enjoy "Office Space."  And
you'll laugh harder than everyone else.

Title
Review for True Crime (1999)
After "Unforgiven," Clint Eastwood declared that he would no longer star in the
movies he directed.  Since then, he's starred in only one movie he didn't
direct ("In the Line of Fire" -- maybe working for Wolfgang Petersen made
Eastwood rethink his plan) and directed only one without sticking his craggy
puss in front of the camera ("Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil").  His
latest effort, "True Crime," demonstrates the problem of having a
director/producer/star:  who's gonna tell him he's miscast?
Eastwood plays Steve Everett, a broken-down, womanizing, recovering alcoholic
reporter who is one screw-up away from oblivion.  When another reporter dies in
a car crash, Everett is assigned her story:  a "human interest sidebar" on an
execution taking place at midnight.  Despite warnings from his editors to keep
his piece simple, Everett seizes on the story as his chance for redemption and
quickly becomes convinced that Frank Beachum (Isaiah Washington), the man about
to be lethally injected, is innocent.
He is innocent, of course.  I write that without fear of spoiling the movie
because the skeleton of this movie's plot is so rigidly formulaic that there's
never really any doubt in the viewer's mind that Beachum is innocent.  The
ending is so overwrought in its last-minute rush to stop the execution that it
comes off as cheesy.  But hanging on the bones of this predictable plot is the
unrealized potential for a much better film.  Everett is an interesting
character because he is difficult to like.  He cheats on his wife with his
editor's wife, he accidentally injures his daughter because he's in a rush to
pursue a lead, he's a cynical burn-out with little respect for anyone's
feelings.  In his single-minded pursuit of the truth, he plows through people's
lives like a runaway train.  This role, a cousin to Paul Newman's character in
"The Verdict," deserves an actor who could explore the complexities and
contradictions of this deeply selfish man who fights so passionately to save
Beachum's life not because of the value of that life but because proving his
hunch was right will validate his worth as a reporter.  
Eastwood is more a professional icon than an actor.  His range is limited, and
his choice of roles usually takes that into account.  Any number of actors
could have done more with the role of Everett than Eastwood did; my wife
pointed out that the movie would have been served well if Eastwood and James
Woods (who plays Everett's senior editor) had switched roles.
Another element in "True Crime" that cries out for further development is the
questions raised about the death penalty and about biases in the criminal
justice system.  Beachum is a poor black man quickly convicted on the word of
two middle-class white witnesses.  Before Everett bursts in like Henry Fonda in
"Twelve Angry Men" and exposes the rush to judgement, no one -- not even
Beachum's lawyer -- questions the inconsistencies in the case.  Yet when one
character brings up the possibility of racial bias in Beachum's conviction,
Everett dismisses it, and the audience is inclined to follow his lead.
One thing True Crime does well is to attack the attitudes of the press. 
Everett is not supposed to seek the truth; he is only supposed to present a
moving "sidebar" for the morning paper.  Local TV reporters discuss the method
of execution with the same blithe detachment they have talking about the
weather.  In brief moments like these, Eastwood offers devastating satire about
an institution that is content to report rather than investigate.
The case includes several familiar faces.  Woods is very funny, and his
chemistry with Eastwood is terrific. Michael Jeter is excellent as the state's
mousy star witness.  Denis Leary stretches his acting wings a bit.  He plays
Bob, the news editor who assigns Everett to write the sidebar to promote a
liberal point-of-view yet cares little about whether Beachum is actually
guilty.  Bob is distinctly different from Leary's stand-up persona, and Leary
gets some challenging emotional scenes (it's his wife that Everett is
boinking).  But his performance comes off bland.  Another comedian who flops at
drama in True Crime is Michael McKean; he plays a slimy prison chaplain who
(like everyone else in the movie) wants to use Beachum to promote a personal
agenda, but he overplays the part so broadly that he seems to think he's in a
comedy.
Bit of trivia:  Everett's daughter is played by Eastwood's real-life daughter
Francesca Fisher-Eastwood.  Francesca's mother, Frances Fisher of Unforgiven
and Titanic, also has a cameo.
All things considered, True Crime is an uneven film that could have been
worthwhile if Eastwood had recognized its undeveloped potential.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.wpd.net/madreview/

Title
Review for Negotiator, The (1998)
Police hostage negotiator Danny Roman (Samuel L. Jackson) wows the press and
annoys his fellow cops with his daring maneuvers to take out hostage-takers. 
One night Danny's partner Nate (Paul Guilfoyle) tells him that cops in their
precinct are stealing money from the disability fund.  Nate is soon murdered,
and Danny is accused of both his friend's murder and the theft of the
departmental funds.  Faced with certain conviction, Danny takes his only
suspect, internal affairs inspector Niebaum (J. T. Walsh in his last role), and
three others hostage.  Danny knows that Niebaum's co-conspirators will be
nervous that the inspector will talk, so they will reveal themselves and try to
kill both Danny and Niebaum.  Since he can't trust anyone in his precinct,
Danny demands that the hostage team bring in a negotiator from another
precinct, Chris Sabian (Kevin Spacey).
"The Negotiator" is character-driven, so its success rides on the able
shoulders of its lead actors.  Jackson and Spacey complement each other well: 
Jackson -- angry, on edge, striking out at everyone around him; Spacey -- calm,
crafty, perceptive.  Their scenes together are tense and suspenseful.  Danny
stalks around with a gun, spewing threats and coming ever closer to killing a
hostage.  Chris approaches the situation like a chess match, and he tries
various gambits to gain control of the board.  The conflict of negotiators is
built around talk, of course, and Jackson and Spacey are two of the best
talkers in Hollywood.
The cast is filled out by a familiar group of character actors.  As the major
suspects to be the mastermind that framed Danny:  David Morse (the father in
"Contact"), Ron Rifkin (the DA in "LA Confidential"), and John Spencer (the FBI
director in "The Rock").  Paul Giamatti offers some welcome comic relief as a
petty crook among Danny's hostages. Regina Taylor (from TV's "I'll Fly Away")
plays Danny's wife.
The down side?  Even though Danny is supposed to be an unpredictable
risk-taker, we also know early on that he is a) innocent and b) a good cop. 
This undercuts a lot of the suspense; despite the movie's elaborate attempts to
make us believe that Danny will kill his hostages, we know he's too decent a
person to cross that line.  
"The Negotiator" won't make anyone's Ten Best list, but it is solid genre fare
with a strong cast.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.wpd.net/madreview/

Title
Review for Jackie Brown (1997)
In "Jackie Brown," the title character (Pam Grier) is a stewardess who is
caught by the feds (Michael Keaton, Michael Bowen) bringing in a shipment of
cash for arms dealer Ordell Robbie (Samuel L. Jackson).  Ordell sends
bailbondsman Max Cherry (Robert Forster) to get Jackie out of jail, and Max
falls for her at first sight.  Jackie soon hatches a plan to play the feds and
Ordell against each other to make off with a sackfull of Ordell's money.
"Jackie Brown" attempts to introduce audiences to a different Quentin
Tarantino-more low key, more subtle than the fast-paced maverick of "Reservoir
Dogs" (1992) and "Pulp Fiction" (1994).  Touches of the old QT are here, of
course-Ordell and his pal Louis (Robert De Niro) are refugees from the
atmosphere of "Pulp"-but the heart of "Jackie Brown" is the romance of Jackie
and Max.  
The weakness of the movie is its casting.  Although he has two of the best
actors in Hollywood on hand (Jackson and De Niro), Tarantino gives the most
crucial roles to Grier and Forster, neither of which is up to the challenge. 
Tarantino offers several long close-ups of Forster's deep-lined face as if the
actor's expression is supposed to communicate Max's unspoken thoughts and
feelings.  However, Forster's expression says nothing.  Likewise, Grier,
obviously cast in homage to her 70's blaxploitation films, can deliver dialogue
with gusto but cannot lend her character the complexity that Tarantino's pacing
and script seem to desire.

Title
Review for Double Jeopardy (1999)
Libby Parsons (Ashley Judd) has the perfect little life -- a rich husband, a
cute son, and a house on the ocean -- but when her husband Nick (Bruce
Greenwood) takes her sailing, she awakes to find him gone and her hands covered
with blood.  Just as she makes it to the deck and picks up the bloody knife
lying there, the Coast Guard arrives in response to a distress call her
vanished husband sent.  She's convicted of his murder, of course, and leaves
her son Matty (Benjamin Weir) with her best friend (Annabeth Gish).  Time
passes, and the friend disappears with Matty.  During their last phone
conversation Libby hears Matty yell "Daddy!" and realizes that her husband is
still alive.
Libby serves six years, growing harder and driven by the desire to kill Nick
(based on the theory that because of the "double jeopardy" amendment she can
off him with impunity).  When she gets parole, she's sent to a halfway house
run by Travis Lehman (Tommy Lee Jones), a former law professor who ruined his
life with a drunk driving accident.  After a little breaking and entering and
some destruction of property, Libby jumps parole and lams it across the country
looking for Nick and Matty.  Travis pursues, naturally.
"Double Jeopardy" is a watered-down version of "The Fugitive," with Jones
sleep-walking through his well-worn pursuer persona.  Although Libby never
leaps from a bus that collides with a train, she manages to get into a few
nail-biters -- chased down the beach by a jeep, chained to a car that plunges
into the ocean, sealed in a coffin -- that add some much needed thrills to an
anemic, slow-moving script.  
Character development is thin.  Travis' intriguing backstory is mentioned a
couple times but has no effect on the story.  (I think they only made him a
former law professor so that he could verify the double-jeopardy theory when
Libby gets the drop on Nick.  It's a long way to go for one line).  There's
considerable sexual tension between Travis and Libby (hey, there's something
"The Fugitive" didn't have!), but it never goes anywhere.  Libby is a TV-movie
Everywoman, but Judd's intense performance draws us in and makes us forget 
that her character has no distinguishing characteristics.  This is Judd's most
prominent role to date, and she proves that she can light up the screen.  Let's
hope Hollywood gives her more to work with next time around.
The quality of director Bruce Beresford's movies seems to depend on luck.  When
he has a good script and a strong cast, he turns out Oscar-caliber work like
"'Breaker' Morant," "Driving Miss Daisy," and "Tender Mercies."  When he
doesn't . . . we get "Double Jeopardy."  Screenwriters David Weisberg and
Douglas Cook previously collaborated on "The Rock," a script which probably
benefited from the numerous uncredited rewrites.
Bottom Line:  Ashley Judd tries hard but can't save this predictable bore.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Analyze This (1999)
When mob boss Paul Vitti (Robert De Niro) has a panic attack, he seeks therapy
from psychiatrist Ben Sobol (Billy Crystal); hilarity ensues.  Director Harold
Ramis' new comedy "Analyze This" has lots of fun with this premise as the very
different worlds of Paul and Ben collide.  There are subplots to keep the plot
moving:  Paul is about to be rubbed out by a rival gangster (Chazz Palminteri);
Ben is about to marry Lisa Kudrow.
The plot is interestingly similar to HBO's new series, "The Sopranos."  There,
also, a mob boss has a panic attack and starts seeing a therapist.  While "The
Sopranos" aspires to realism, "Analyze This" offers a cartoonish sketch of the
mob.  
However, despite its distance from reality, "Analyze This" is great fun.  De
Niro obviously enjoys the self-parody in playing a comic gangster (I wonder if
Brando got the same charge out of "The Freshman").  Although he rarely does
comedies, De Niro has considerable comic skills.  His Paul Vitti is as funny
when he's vulnerable as he is when he's threatening.
Crystal's job is to react to the outrageous actions of Vitti and his
slow-witted henchman Jelly (Joe Viterelli).  (In this regard, the De
Niro-Crystal interplay is something like Crystal's scenes with Jack Palance in
"City Slickers").  Actually, that's our job, too-and there's plenty to laugh
at:  Ben rear-ends a mob car, and the trunk pops open to reveal a man
bound-and-gagged; Ben's wedding is interrupted by a man being thrown off a
balcony; Ben has to represent Paul at a mob conference.  As a general rule, I
don't like Crystal's movies-too soppy for my tastes-but I laughed long and loud
during "Analyze This."  
Š 1999 Christian L. Pyle
">http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Christian+Pyle>

Title
Review for Siege, The (1998)
Edward Zwick's "The Siege" raises more questions than it can convincingly
answer or even clearly articulate.  Its subject is the rising threat of
terrorism in American cities. Denzel Washington is Anthony "Hub" Hubbard, who
runs the FBI's anti-terrorism task force in New York.  His investigation into
Arab terrorist cells intensifies when suicide bombers take out a busload of
people.  Hub focuses on a mysterious CIA operative (Annette Bening), whose goes
by both "Elise" and "Sharon."  As the terrorist attacks continue and the body
count rises, the question of martial law is raised.  Enter General Devereaux
(Bruce Willis), who opposes martial law at first but who, as soon as the
President decides to send in the Army, begins herding Arab immigrants into a
prison camp and attacking every link that Hub uncovers in the terrorist chain. 
Hub listens as Devereaux tortures and murders a suspect.   
The future Zwick and screenwriter Lawrence Wright offer is all too possible. 
What would happen, they ask, if terrorism became as much a fact of daily life
in New York as it is in cities like Beirut and Belfast?  What would happen to
our civil liberties if soldiers patrol our streets with machine guns?  These
questions "The Siege" answers in realistic detail.  It implies tougher ones,
though:  what can be done to combat terrorism without sacrificing justice and
freedom?   if we encourage terrorism abroad (from Bening's character we
discover that the CIA trained the bombers), will it inevitably come back to us?
"Siege" avoids the tougher questions by endowing its hero, Hub, with a
uncompromising sense of clear right and wrong.  This comforting fantasy of Sir
Galahad confronting the evils of the modern world is an escape from the
thought-provoking issues the movie raises.  Still, Zwick deserves credit for at
least addressing the issue with as much realism as he does where so many movies
(Willis' "Die Hard" series, for example) offer only a comic-book view on
terrorism.

Title
Review for Bowfinger (1999)
Hack director Bobby Bowfinger (Steve Martin) wants to break into feature films.
 Armed with the script for "Chubby Rain," an alien invasion action pic (the
rain is chubby because  the aliens invade disguised as raindrops), Bowfinger
gets a promise from a major producer (Robert Downey Jr. in a small role) that
"Chubby" is a go if Bowfinger can cast the hottest action star in America, Kit
Ramsey (Eddie Murphy).  Kit gives him the boot, of course, so Bowfinger hits
upon a scheme to have Kit star without knowing it.  His crew will follow the
guy around, and the other actors will simply walk up to Kit and say their
lines.  A factor in their favor:  Kit is a loon with paranoid fears that aliens
are trying to steal his gonads, an obsession with exposing himself to the Laker
Girls, and a complete devotion to the Mindhead (read: Scientology) cult.
Bowfinger's merry band includes Christine Baranski as a wannabe actress,
Heather Graham as a starlet trying to sleep her way to the top, Jamie Kennedy
as a stagehand who can steal all the gear they need from the studio, and Eddie
Murphy (again) as a dweeb whose dream is to run errands for people.  Less
familiar faces include an accountant turned screenwriter (Adam Alexi-Malle), a
dense but attractive young actor (Kohl Sudduth), and a crew of illegal aliens
who gradually become film buffs.
Martin's script delivers plenty of laughs but little substance.  There's none
of the insider satire that we saw in his "L. A. Story."  Except for the stab at
Scientology, Hollywood comes through "Bowfinger" unscathed.  Bowfinger is a
latter-day Ed Wood and deserves to be marginalized.  Outside of Kit, the few
successful Hollywood types in the movie are sane, shrewd people.  
The script also depends on several big coincidences to hold its bizarre plot
together.  If Kit Ramsey didn't happen to be a paranoid nutcase, he would have
just had Bowfinger and company arrested.
Despite those flaws, I laughed a lot while watching this movie.  Martin is, as
always, sly and skillful at both verbal and visual humor, and "Bowfinger" marks
a return to form for Murphy, who hasn't been this funny since the '80s.  As
Kit, he loudly rapid-fires bizarre theories (catch phrases are a racist
conspiracy, Teddy Kennedy is black); as Jiff, body double and aspiring errand
boy, he's shy and easily embarrassed.  Jiff is also easily fooled, making him a
perfect pawn for the scheming Bowfinger.  In the movie's funniest scene,
Bowfinger convinces Jiff to run across a busy highway, saying that all the cars
are driven by "stunt drivers."
Bottom line:  "Bowfinger" is a fluffy diversion with two master comedians at
the top of their game.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Shakespeare in Love (1998)
On first hearing, it sounds like an unlikely hit.  "Shakespeare in Love?" 
Wouldn't most people rather see "Schwartzenegger in Love?"  A script loaded
with allusions to the plays and Elizabethan in-jokes?  Will that put bums on
seats?
"Shakespeare" only recently made it to the hinterlands of Lexington, Ky., and I
had to try twice before I could get a ticket and squeeze in
shoulder-to-shoulder with a sold-out crowd.  I've seen similar crowds lounging
on blankets for an outdoor Shakespeare festival.  Despite the differences in
language and culture and the centuries that have passed, Shakespeare retains a
popular appeal because he speaks to the whole human experience-our noblest
aspirations and lowest urges.
John Madden's "Shakespeare in Love" celebrates the spirit of the Bard in
language anyone can understand.  We find William Shakespeare (Joseph Fiennes)
suffering from writer's block and unable to make any progress on his new play,
a comedy called "Romeo and Ethyl, the Pirate's Daughter."  Theater owner Philip
Henslowe (Geoffrey Rush) is anxious to produce "Romeo" to keep a loanshark (Tom
Wilkinson) off his back.
Meanwhile, Viola De Lesseps (Gwyneth Paltrow), a young woman from a rich
family, is so entranced by the stage that she disguises herself as a man to
audition for "Romeo."  (In Elizabethan England, women were forbidden to be
actors;  the parts of women were played by boys.)  Will is blown away by
performance of the disguised Viola, and soon discovers her secret.  A
passionate romance erupts.
The structure of "Shakespeare in Love" is modeled on "Romeo and Juliet," with
the premise that Will's love for Viola inspired the famous play.  So, as the
romance develops, Will incorporates events into his new play, and Viola
performs them on stage as Romeo.  Like Juliet, Viola has a nurse (Imelda
Staunton) who is her confidant and a rich fiance (Colin Firth) she doesn't
love.  Like Romeo, Will crashes a party and woos his love from beneath her
balcony.  There are references to and motifs from other Shakespeare plays, too,
especially "Twelfth Night," which has a cross-dressing heroine named Viola.
"Shakespeare in Love" features cameos by other luminaries of the period. 
Shakespeare's rival Christopher Marlowe (Rupert Everett) is on hand, as is
Jacobean playwright John Webster (Joe Roberts), here a bloodthirsty boy.  Ben
Affleck is hilarious as conceited actor Ned Alleyn; his performance serves as a
sharp satire on star status.  (I get the sense that Affleck may have modeled
Alleyn on John Barrymore; it may be coincidence but Alleyn plays the same role
that Barrymore played in the 1930s version of "Romeo and Juliet.")  Another
standout is Judi Dench, who plays Queen Elizabeth.  Dench, who recently played
Queen Victoria in "Mrs. Brown" (also directed by Madden), gives us an Elizabeth
who is perceptive, witty, and commanding.
"Shakespeare" is the smartest script in recent memory.  Tom Stoppard, one of
its authors, is a respected playwright best known for the inside-out version of
"Hamlet"-"Rosencrantz and Guildenstern Are Dead."  The other author, Marc
Norman, has a less-impressive record, but his most recent work, "Cutthroat
Island" (1995), was also a period piece about a woman who crossed gender lines.
"Shakespeare" is a guaranteed crowd pleaser which combines plenty of comedy
with a passionate romance.
Š 1999 Christian L. Pyle
">http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Christian+Pyle>

Title
Review for Thin Red Line, The (1998)
The television ads for "The Thin Red Line" promise "images you'll never be able
to shake."  Thankfully, that blurb is hyperbole (psychological scars are not
something I'm looking for in a movie experience), but the line from the ads
suggests a collection of powerful fragments, which is what "Red Line" offers.
"The Thin Red Line," based on a novel by James Jones, marks the return of
writer/director Terrence Malick after a twenty-year absence.  Malick's previous
works as a director-"Badlands" (1973) and "Days of Heaven" (1978)-still garner
the praise of critics.  Several Hollywood stars (including George Clooney, John
Travolta, Woody Harrelson, and John Cusack) took small roles in "Red Line" just
for the opportunity of working with Malick.
The movie is about the effort to drive the Japanese out of Guadalcanal in World
War II.  It's an ensemble piece with a variety of characters, each dealing with
the horrors of war in his own way.  There's no clear protagonist or linear plot
development, but these may not be faults-war doesn't have a protagonist or a
plot.  Malick explores the psychological and philosophical aspects of war, the
latter in voice-overs in which various characters muse about the meaning of it
all.  
There is brilliance in this movie-powerful images, intense performances,
thought-provoking confrontations-but the accumulation of beautifully-crafted
fragments never melts together into a coherent whole.  This lack of cohesion is
probably due to contradictory desires for what the movie should express.  The
desire to represent the scope of war by painting a large canvas competes with
the desire to explore the psychologies of individual characters in depth.  The
viewer has trouble remembering who's who, and the size of the roster leaves
little time, even in a three-hour movie, to develop the characters clearly. 
The desire to pose philosophical questions raised by war competes with the
desire to capture the intensity of combat.  The voice-overs suggest a lyrical
repose where characters can muse on the why's of war, but the characters live
in constant danger.
So, we are left with a pile of fine pieces.  "Red Line" begins with deserter
Pvt. Witt (Jim Caviezel) enjoying a separate peace with island natives whose
simple lives centered around family and community contrast with the war. 
Later, pulled back into the war, Witt wanders through another native village
and sees a collection of human skulls.  The war in these Pacific islands is a
siege of paradise.  The scenery the soldiers plod through is breathtakingly
beautiful and tranquil, a powerful contrast to the machinery of war.
Many of the most dramatic moments occur as Charlie Company crawls up a grassy
hill to attack the Japanese machine gun nest hidden above.  The camera gives us
a soldier's perspective, crouching in the mud, unable to see through the
surrounding grass.  Explosions burst nearby, appearing suddenly and seemingly
at random.  Machine-gun fire crackles ahead.  Malick draws us into the terror
of war for soldiers who are like us, ordinary Joes plucked out of their
ordinary peacetime lives.
Their leaders, too, are unused to combat.  Halfway up the hill, Capt. Staros
(Elias Koteas), a lawyer in civilian life, refuses to advance for fear that his
men will all be slaughtered.  Staros' refusal draws his commander, Col. Tall
(Nick Nolte), closer to the fray.  Tall is an aging West Point graduate who's
been passed over for promotion.  This is his first war, and he is eager to
prove himself.  The two men play off of each other-Staros, unwilling to
sacrifice any man's life no matter how important the objective; Tall, can see
only the objective and is puzzled by the concern that Staros and Capt. Gaff
(John Cusack) have for their men.
The conflict between Tall and his captains is parallel to a conflict between
Sgt. Welsh (Sean Penn) and Witt.  Penn gives the most compelling and complex
performance of the movie, and Welsh is a fascinating mixture of cynicism and
heroism.  Other performances are considerably weaker, particularly the cameos
by Clooney and Travolta.
Š 1999 Christian L. Pyle
">http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Christian+Pyle>

Title
Review for American Beauty (1999)
Midway through "American Beauty" teenage filmmaker/pot dealer Ricky Fitts (Wes
Bentley) shows his girlfriend Jane Burnham (Thora Birch) a plate that Ricky's
father (Chris Cooper) keeps in a locked display case.  The plate is plain white
with gold trim; it is visibly old and elegant in its simplicity.  Jane turns
the plate over to find a swastika stamped in black.  Ricky explains, "It's like
official state china of the Third Reich."  The plate is a potent symbol for the
mission of the film:  to reveal the hidden depravity beneath the simple
elegance of American suburban conformity.
To the casual observer, the Burnhams seem perfect.  Lester (Kevin Spacey)
writes for a marketing magazine.  Carolyn (Annette Bening) sells real estate
and devotes her spare time to her rosebushes.  Their daughter Jane is a
cheerleader.  However, under the facade the cracks run deep, and everything is
about to split wide open.  Lester's boss has hired an efficiency expert (Barry
Del Sherman) to ax several workers.  Despite the fact that Carolyn's business
is overshadowed by that of Buddy Kane the Real Estate King (Peter Gallagher),
she lords her relative success over Lester's head and denies him sex or
affection.
Just as life looks its bleakest, Lester finds a strange salvation in Angela
Hayes (Mena Suvari), a teenage friend of Jane's.  Watching Angela perform as a
cheerleader, Lester has a surreal epiphany that launches him on a mid-life
crisis.  Before long, he quits his job in favor of working at a fast food
restaurant, buys a sportscar, buys weed from Ricky, and starts working out in
the garage.  Everytime Angela comes over, he fawns over her like a lovesick
kid, disgusting his daughter and raising an intense jealousy in her.  Meanwhile
Carolyn begins having an affair with Buddy and takes up target shooting.
The Burnhams are contrasted with their new neighbors, the Fitts.  Ricky is an
unusual young man obsessed with filming Beauty, an obsession that draws him to
Jane.  His father is a stern Marine Corps colonel given to fits of violence,
and his mother Barbara (Allison Janney of TV's "The West Wing") seems to have
been beaten into submission.  As dysfunctional as the Burnhams are, they're not
as bad as the Fitts.
Ricky becomes as important a character as Lester.  Although young, Ricky has
figured out what Lester learns in the movie.  Speaking of his most treasured
video, a plastic bag dancing in the wind, Ricky says this moment taught him
that "there was this entire life behind things and this incredibly benevolent
force that wanted me to know there was no reason to be afraid, ever."  Thus,
the title "American Beauty" is not as ironic as it may at first appear. 
Lester's vision of Angela as Aphrodite amid streams of rose petals is his
equivalent of the dancing bag, but he's confused by his lust and sexual
frustration for most of the movie.  Beneath the satire, "American Beauty" is
about the life-giving quest for beauty.
American Beauty marks the debut of both director Sam Mendes and screenwriter
Alan Ball.  Look for both to contribute great things in the future.  Ball's
script is easily the best of 1999 and richly deserves its inevitable Oscar.
The performances are excellent all around.  Since Kevin Spacey and Annette
Bening have already gotten their share of critical acclaim and award
nominations, I'd like to single out the always underrated Chris Cooper.  His
character, Col. Fitts, is an especially challenging character who has to go
through a complex transformation, and Cooper does an excellent job.  (Video
recommendation:  If you can find it, check out Cooper in "Pharaoh's Army," an
indie about the Civil War.)
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Gladiator (2000)
"Gladiator"
Reviewed by Christian Pyle
Directed by Ridley Scott  
Written by David H. Franzoni, John Logan, and William Nicholson
Starring Russell Crowe, Joaquin Phoenix, Connie Nielsen, and Oliver Reed
Grade: B
More than forty years ago, the "sword and sandals" genre of historical epic
ruled the box office.  During the 1950's Hollywood sought to give audiences a
reason to turn off their televisions and go out to the movies by offering the
grand spectacle of the Roman Empire in Cinemascope.  "Ben-Hur."  "Cleopatra." 
"The Robe."  "Sparticus."  "The Fall of the Roman Empire."  "Quo Vadis." 
Sometimes brilliant, sometimes campy, the Roman epic was the Technicolor
funeral pyre of classic Hollywood.  Since then, epics have appeared
infrequently ("The Last Emperor," "Braveheart") and some of the best have been
small-screen affairs produced in the 1970's ("Roots," "Shogun").  Yet, the
phrase "We who are about to die salute you" has been absent until now.
"Gladiator" begins in Germania in A. D. 180.  Roman General Maximus (Russell
Crowe) has conquered yet another group of barbarians for his emperor Marcus
Aurelius (Richard Harris), and he is eager to retire to his plantation in Spain
where his wife and son are waiting.  However, the emperor is worried that his
decadent weakling son Commodus (Joaquin Phoenix) will prove a poor successor,
so he wants to make Maximus his heir as a transition toward Rome becoming a
republic again.  When Commodus hears the plan, he strangles his father and
orders Maximus and his family murdered.  Maximus escapes from the executioners,
but he arrives home too late to save his wife and son.  A caravan of slavers
pick up the wounded hero and carry him off to North Africa.  (Why the caravan
happened to be cruising by Maximus' place is never explained.)  An African
named Juba (Djimon Hounsou) treats Maximus' wounds.  Proximo (Oliver Reed), a
gladiator who won his freedom, purchases Maximus and Juba as fodder for the
arena.  Of course, Maximus proves as able a gladiator as he was a soldier, and
his fame spreads.  When Commodus reopens the Coliseum, Proximo brings his
troupe of warriors to Rome to compete.  Our hero wins the hearts and minds of
the cheering crowds and finds that he has an ally in Commodus' sister Lucilla
(Connie Nielsen).
The similarities to "Braveheart" are obvious:  an evil king, a determined
warrior seeking revenge for his murdered family, the aid of a lovestruck
princess.  Also, like Mel Gibson's epic, "Gladiator" has a primarily visceral
appeal and is driven forward by the hero's anger.  It's a simple tale of good
versus evil.  Maximus has all the manly virtues:  nobility of purpose, courage
in battle, loyalty to king and country, physical stamina, and devotion to
family.  Commodus is his opposite in every way:  a sniveling, selfish coward
who is intended to disgust the audience.
The opening night crowd in my theater was about 70% male, and that seems
appropriate.  "Gladiator" is a guy movie (would the opposite of a "chick flick"
be a "dick flick"?).  There's much pumping of testosterone and chopping off of
body parts in gruesome battle sequences.  (Those easily offended by gore should
stay away.)  Lucilla is the only female character, and what sparks there are
between her and Maximus are dampened by his devotion to his dead wife.
Joaquin Phoenix gives an astounding performance.  In the scene where Commodus
kills his father, Phoenix shows the pain of a son who has never had his
father's love or pride.  Throughout the picture, Phoenix manages to give depth
to a character who's scripted as a caricature of evil.  I've been a Russell
Crowe fan since "Romper Stomper."  This role doesn't offer him the complexities
of his parts in "L. A. Confidential" and "The Insider" -- essentially his job
is to grunt heroically -- but his voice, which has a Richard Burton resonance
textured by a Clint Eastwood rasp, is perfect for the genre.  The late Oliver
Reed gave us the best work of his career in his last role.  I hope it will be
rewarded with an Oscar.
My only major quibble with "Gladiator" is its stylized look.  Several scenes
are tinted.  We've seen a lot of the tinted look lately, particularly in
"Payback" and "The Matrix."  I don't get the appeal of the style, which makes
feature films look like TV ads.  In "Payback" it was merely annoying, but in
"Gladiator" it bleaches the color out of the grand spectacles that are the
raison d'etre of the Roman epic.  (Perhaps it's meant to gloss over the
imperfections of the computer-generated shots.)  Also, the battle scenes are
filmed in a strange herky jerky style that seems to be slo mo and fast forward
simultaneously.  (It reminds me of the way the Flash runs in the comic books,
leaving a half-blurred trail of images of himself behind.)  With a more
realistic look, "Gladiator" could be even more satisfying than "Braveheart"
because it has a tighter script and a more fulfilling conclusion.
Bottom line:  A rousing action film enriched by fine performances but tarnished
by stylistic choices.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Hannibal (2001)
Some sequels rush into theaters before the end credits are through rolling on 
their predecessors.  Others take a decade.  But "Hannibal: The Phantom 
Menace" is finally here.  Anthony Hopkins reprises his role from "Silence of 
the Lambs" as Dr. Hannibal "the Cannibal" Lecter.  The doc is still on the 
loose following his magnificent jailbreak in "Silence."  We find him in 
Florence, Italy, posing as a scholar.  
Hopkins' co-star in "Silence," Jodie Foster, opted out of "Hannibal," so 
Julianne Moore takes over the role of feisty FBI agent Clarice Starling.  
Clarice's career has hit the skids after a controversial shooting of a drug 
dealer (Hazelle Goodman), and the Justice Department has sent dickhead Paul 
Krendler (Ray Liotta) to hassle her.  The Bureau reassigns Clarice to the 
Lecter case and sends her to interview Mason Verger (Gary Oldman), a 
hideously deformed but filthy rich former victim of Lecter.  (Lecter 
convinced a drugged Verger to cut off his own face and feed it to dogs; 
Verger explains, "It seemed like a good idear at the time.")  Verger has been 
trolling a $3 million reward for information leading to Lecter.  He finally 
gets a nibble from cynical Florentine cop Rinaldo Pazzi (Giancarlo Giannini), 
who is suspicious of the new scholar in town and is in need of a few million 
in ready cash.  However, ol' Hannibal might have a trick or two in store for 
these fellas . . . 
Knowing that "Silence" would be a hard act to follow, producer Dino De 
Laurentiis recruited a respected trio of talents to adapt Thomas Harris' 
latest thriller for the screen:  director Ridley Scott, playwright David 
Mamet, and "Schindler's List" screenwriter Steven Zaillian.  I read the novel 
when it came out last summer, and Mamet and Zaillian showed excellent taste 
in their choices.  They trimmed the part of the book that dwells on Clarice's 
career problems in favor of the much stronger cat-and-mouse game between 
Lecter and Pazzi in Florence.  (This is lots of fun in both book and movie 
because Pazzi thinks he's the cat, but we know he's the mouse.)  The 
screenwriters also judiciously dumped the ridiculous ending of Harris' novel. 
 However, the ending they chose instead seems so much of an anti-climax that 
the film might as well close with "To Be Continued . . ."  Scott serves up a 
beautiful picture painted with somber but rich tones.
The centerpiece of "Hannibal" is, of course, Hopkin's performance.  More than 
any other element, his personification of evil made "Silence" the critical 
and popular success that it was.  (No other thriller, not even the 
masterpieces of Hitchcock, has ever swept the Academy Awards; no other 
thriller even won Best Picture.)  However, Hopkin's take on Lecter has lost 
its edge.  Ironically, Lecter radiated much more menace standing completely 
still in a glass cage in "Silence" than he does on the loose in "Hannibal."  
Hopkins seems to have forgotten some of the subtle touches he brought to the 
character ten years ago, such as the slight hiss on his S's.
The fatal flaw of "Hannibal," though, is the absence of Jodie Foster.  She 
pulled out after the script had been revised to her specifications.  It 
attempts to build on the psychosexual undertones in the exchanges between 
Foster and Hopkins in "Silence."  However, all these efforts fall flat 
because of the recasting.  Julianne Moore is an exceptional actress who has 
proven her talent in numerous films over the past few years.  However, 
despite her best efforts to adopt the West Virginia accent and tough 
willfulness of Clarice Starling, Moore can only hope to echo Foster.  When 
Foster left the project, the filmmakers should have delayed production and 
rewritten the script to eliminate Starling.  The character is unimportant to 
the scenes in Florence and only tangential to the conflict between Lecter and 
Verger.  That's the only Foster-less option that would have allowed 
"Hannibal" to fulfill its potential.
A bit of trivia:  Besides Hopkins, the only cast member from "Silence" to 
return is Frankie Faison, who reprises his role as Barney, the orderly who 
tended to Lecter at the asylum.  (What else could Scott Glenn possibly have 
had to do?)  Faison also had a small role in 1986's "Manhunter," making him 
the only actor to appear in all three segments of the "Hannibal Lecter 
Trilogy."
Bottom Line:  Beautifully rendered but doomed to fail
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Postman, The (1997)
When I first heard that Kevin Costner was making a movie called "The Postman,"
I thought, "An American version of 'Il Postino?'  Starring Costner?  God help
us!"  When I found out that it was not a remake of "Postino" but an
postapocalyptic epic, I thought, "'Landworld?'  Please, God, make him stop!"
As it turns out, "The Postman" is a much better film than I had expected. 
Despite being set in 2013, the movie is, at heart, a western:  a band of thugs
terrorizes peaceful villagers; a wandering hero opposes the bandits and
inspires others to fight back.  The setting, however, allows that familiar plot
to take on greater significance:  American society has collapsed due to plagues
and wars, and survivors live behind barracades in isolated villages.  The
struggle of a dead society to be reborn has a grand quality and deserves the
epic scale Costner grants it.
Costner's nameless character, a wandering actor, rides in from the vast
wasteland and is soon shanghaied into the service of General Bethlehem (Will
Patton), a former copy-machine salesman turned bandit king.  Our hero escapes
and discovers the body of a dead postman.  Taking the uniform and bag of mail,
he passes himself off as a representative of "the Restored United States."  He
is shocked at the hope that he inspires in the people he meets.  One young
disciple, Ford Lincoln Mercury (Larenz Tate), organizes a full-scale postal
service.  Ford spreads The Postman's message of hope until Bethlehem finds that
the once-meek villagers are beginning to resist his rule.  As war breaks out
between Bethlehem's army and the postal workers, Costner's character steps into
the legend he created and goes from self-centered loner to leader of the
revolution.  His lie of the Restored United States becomes a self-fulfilling
prophecy.
"Postman" is an odd blend of a bleak setting and a message of wide-eyed
optimism (sort of "Sergio Leone meets Frank Capra"), but its treatment of hope
and renewal is compelling.  What could have been another knock-off of "The Road
Warrior" (like "Waterworld" was) surprises the viewer with a sensitively told
story of nobility emerging from rubble.
Tate is the stand-out in the movie's large cast.  Ford Lincoln Mercury
(self-named) is the polar opposite of O-Dog, Tate's character in his debut
film, "Menace II Society" (1993), and Tate makes Ford's innocent belief in hope
as convincing as O-Dog's cynicism and brutality.  His performance sells the
movie.  Interestingly, as Tate moves from his usual street-smart roles to
youthful optimism, the soft-eyed Patton, who usually plays nice guys, proves a
disarming villain.
Olivia Williams makes her film debut as The Postman's love interest, Abby. 
When they first meet, Abby asks him to father her child because her husband is
sterile.  Predictably, the husband is soon eliminated by the bandits, and Abby
is thrown back into the company of the hero.  However, their relationship
develops slowly as the emotional conflicts of both characters are explored
(she, torn by grief, guilt, and anger; he, resisting his destiny).
"The Postman" is Costner's best work thus far.  Perhaps that alone gives us
hope for the future . . . 

Title
Review for Twentieth Century (1934)
When searching this afternoon for a comedy my sick wife hadn't seen, I chose
Howard Hawks' "Twentieth Century."  She didn't laugh much, but this is one of
those comedies that gets funnier with familiarity.  John Barrymore stars in a
delicious self-parody.   His character, Broadway director Oscar Jaffe, is
egotistical ham given to grand melodramatic gestures.  From Oscar's
catch-phrase expression of disapproval ("I cast the iron door upon you") to
something as simple as turning over a picture, Barrymore plays every word,
every movement with a perfect flair for the deliberately theatrical.  
The plot concerns Oscar's relationship with an actress he discovered and
groomed (Carole Lombard).  She was a lingerie model named Mildred Plotka until
Oscar decided she was an actress and changed her name to Lily Garland.  Lily's
career takes off quickly, but she feels smothered by Oscar's obsessive
attention.  She runs off to Hollywood and becomes a star; Oscar goes broke
trying to create another star.  They meet again on a train, the Twentieth
Century.  Since we saw her last, Lily has become just like her mentor-a
melodramatic egomaniac.  The ensuing conflict anticipates the battles of the
sexes in Hawks' better known comedies, "Bringing Up Baby" (1938) and "His Girl
Friday" (1940).
In addition to the dueling egos, Roscoe Karns is a treat as Owen O'Malley,
Oscar's drunken publicist.  More than any other aspect of  the movie,
O'Malley's sarcastic barbs showcase the wit of writers Ben Hecht and Charles
MacArthur, best known for "The Front Page" (the basis for "His Girl Friday").
Etienne Girardot is also a hoot as an oddball who goes around the train putting
up stickers saying, "REPENT for the time has come."

Title
Review for Man on the Moon (1999)
Many geniuses have been misunderstood, but Andy Kaufman may be the only one who
made being misunderstood a goal.  Milos Forman's "Man on the Moon" chronicles
the career of the comedian.  Several of the reviews I read of the movie fussed
that Forman did not explain Andy.  These reviewers missed the point:  no one
could explain Andy, not even Andy.
As the movie begins, Andy's father finds young Andy facing the wall in his room
performing to an imaginary audience.  Even as a child, he lived his life on an
imaginary stage.  Grown up, Andy (Jim Carrey) plays the comedy clubs to mixed
reactions, but he catches the eye of talent agent George Shapiro (Danny
DeVito), who manages to get Andy a part on the sitcom "Taxi."  Reluctantly,
Andy agrees with the condition that lounge singer Tony Clifton be a regular
guest star.  George goes to see Tony perform and is horrified by the singer's
belligerent attitude toward his audience.  Backstage, George discovers that
Tony is Andy in disguise.  The secret soon becomes public knowledge, and people
book Tony with the assumption that Andy will appear.  However, there's a joke
within the joke:  Andy's friend and collaborator Bob Zmuda (Paul Giamatti)
often performs as Tony.
"Man on the Moon" follows Andy through all his "greatest hits"-the Elvis
imitation, the Mighty Mouse routine on "Saturday Night Live," the rise and fall
of "Taxi," the aborted sketch on "Fridays," the wrestling matches with women,
and the fight with Jerry Lawler on the Letterman show-up to his untimely death
from cancer.  The movie feels episodic, jumping from memorable moment to
memorable moment, but this may be a result of how many outrageous and original
things Andy did in his brief career.
What makes the movie work is Jim Carrey's sensitive and subtle performance. 
I've never been impressed by Carrey's acting before, not even in "The Truman
Show."  However, in "Man on the Moon," he proves that his rubber face can
convey complex emotions.  Carrey's Andy is a mixture of a mischievous imp, a
driven artist, and a confused soul who is as much a prop in his own madcap
artform as everyone around him.  He laments to his love, Lynne Margulies
(Courtney Love), "Nobody knows the real me."  She responds, "There is no real
you."  Carrey's expression registers a combination of bemusement and horror as
he replies, "Oh yeah, I forgot."
The movie's best scene comes near the end as Andy travels to a ramshackle
clinic in the Philippines in search of a miracle cure for his cancer.  Pale,
bald, and confined to a wheelchair, Andy watches as another patient is treated;
the doctor plunges his fingers into the patient's abdomen and rips out a
handful of tissue.  The wound heals itself immediately.  After Andy takes his
place on the table, he can see that the doctor has the wad of tissue concealed
in his palm.  Even as his eyes register the hopelessness of his situation, Andy
laughs, realizing that life had finally played a prank on him.
Rather than attempting to explain Andy Kaufman and his unusual form of
performance art, "Man on the Moon" urges the viewer to contemplate the
questions posed by Andy's life:  Was there a point?  Did he know what it was? 
Why attracted him to playing creeps like Tony Clifton and the "bad-guy
wrestler"?  Did he want his audience to hate him?  Did he hate them?  Was his
life a joke in search of a punchline?
Wrestler Jerry "the King" Lawler plays himself in his bouts with Andy.  Other
players in the Kaufman saga appear briefly as themselves, including the cast of
"Taxi" minus DeVito (Jeff Conaway, Marilu Henner, Judd Hirsch, Carol Kane, and
Christopher Lloyd), David Letterman and Paul Shaffer, Improv owner Budd
Friedman, and "SNL" producer Lorne Michaels. The real George Shapiro and Bob
Zmuda also have cameos, in addition to exec-producing the picture.
Director Forman and the writing team of Scott Alexander and Larry Karaszewski
share a fondness for unusual biopics.  They previously collaborated on "The
People vs. Larry Flynt," a biography of the "Hustler" publisher.  In addition,
one of Forman's best films is "Amadeus," the story of Mozart, and Alexander and
Karaszewski wrote Tim Burton's "Ed Wood," about the "world's worst director." 
Somehow this strange group of bizarre personalities seems like the perfect
company for Andy Kaufman.
Bottom line:  A thought-provoking, funny, and poignant portrait of a comic
genius 
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Evolution (2001)
Evolution
Reviewed by Christian Pyle
Directed by Ivan Reitman
Written by David Diamond, David Weissman, and Don Jakoby
Starring David Duchovny, Julianne Moore, Orlando Jones, and Seann William 
Scott
Official Site:  http://www.countingdown.com/evolution/index2.html
Grade: C-
Movie concepts are often pitched to producers with mathematical formulas 
involving successful films of the past.  So, undoubtedly one day someone 
said, "'Evolution?'  It's 'Ghostbusters' plus 'Men in Black' plus 'Tremors.'" 
 And so it is.  Sum total none.  
The alienbusting begins when a meteor lands in Glen Canyon, Arizona.  
Community college science profs Ira Kane (David Duchovny) and Harry Block 
(Orlando Jones) take some samples from the meteor and discover that 
one-celled organisms from inside it are evolving rapidly, doing in hours what 
took millions of years for life on earth.  Just about the time I was 
wondering, "Hey, doesn't the government usually come in and take over the 
whole area in these movies," the government came in and took over the whole 
area.  The leader of the pack, Gen. Woodman (Ted Levine), turns out to be an 
old nemesis of Ira's, and Ira and Harry are blocked from doing further 
research.  
Meanwhile, the organisms continue to grow until they are large enough to 
start attacking people.  By this time, Ira and Harry have gained a friend in 
Dr. Allison Reed (Julianne Moore) of the Center for Disease Control.  A 
country club poolboy, Wayne Green (Seann William Scott), has also attached 
himself to the merry band.  But can they find the means to stop the aliens in 
time?
Director Ivan Reitman seems to be revisiting his biggest hit, 1984's 
"Ghostbusters," but "Evolution" falls miserably short.  One reason is readily 
apparent.  "Ghostbusters" had three really funny guys as its scientists (Bill 
Murray, Dan Aykroyd, and Harold Ramis), but "Evolution" has ONE really funny 
guy (Orlando Jones) who can adlib and milk the comic potential of lines that 
prove useless in anyone else's hands.  For good measure, "Ghostbusters" had 
the comic talents of Rick Moranis; "Evolution" offers Seann William Scott, 
who was much funnier in "American Pie" and "Road Trip" than he is here.  
Scott has one amusing scene where he sings "You Are So Beautiful to Me" to a 
dragon-like alien to draw it into a trap.  Other than that, Scott seems 
unable to make much of the thin material the writers gave him.
An actor in search of a forte, David Duchovny looked for his gritty action 
hero side in "Playing God" and his romantic side in "Return to Me."  Now he 
wants to find his wacky comedic talent; what we all find is that he doesn't 
have any.  Look for him to be back on TV in five years or so.
Another sad case is Julianne Moore, who needs to be more selective about the 
offers she accepts.  She's a talented actress with an impressive list of 
credits and award nominations, so why is she trying to do slapstick comedy?  
Her character has a tendency to trip over and bump into things, but the trait 
comes off as a pathetic plea for laughs.
The sole saving grace of the film is Jones.  He's at the center of the 
movie's funniest scene -- where an alien bug invades Harry's body and has to 
be pulled out through his ass.  Jones is the only cast member who can take 
the comedic ball and run with it, but he can't carry the whole movie by 
himself.  He found himself in a similar situation in "The Replacements," 
where he was also the only comic talent in an ensemble cast.  Jones will 
eventually find the project that will make him a major comedy star, but this 
isn't it.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Title
Review for Twilight (1998)
In "Twilight," a ex-alcoholic, ex-cop, ex-husband, ex-private-eye, Harry Ross
(Paul Newman), works for a pair of aging Hollywood actors, Catherine (Susan
Sarandon) and Jack Ames (Gene Hackman).  Jack is being blackmailed, and he asks
Harry to deliver the payoff.  Instead of the blackmailers, Harry finds a dying
ex-cop (M. Emmet Walsh).  As more bodies begin to pile up, Harry realizes that
he will have to solve the disappearance of Catherine's first husband twenty
years earlier to find out who's willing to kill to keep that secret buried.
Newman.  Sarandon.  Hackman.  With an A-list cast of Oscar laureates like that,
"Twilight" would seem very promising.  However, the script is tired and
predictable.  It would serve well as a TV-movie-of-the-week, possibly with some
1970's detective hero reprising his role.  The appeal of the project for its
stars and its director, Robert Benton, is nostalgia.  "Twilight" wants very
much to be a 1940's film noir with Alan Ladd or Dick Powell.  All of the
standard tropes are here:  a hard-boiled P.I. among the rich and beautiful
whose glamour hides sinister secrets, a femme fatale who tempts and confounds
the hero, shadowy figures shooting from doorways, dead bodies confronting the
hero at every turn, cops dogging his path and interfering with his
investigation.  The script offers little originality, and co-authors Benton and
Richard Russo seem unaware that what was original in 1948 is a cliché in 1998. 
Elmer Bernstein's score is hauntingly melodic and could have been drawn
note-for-note from a vintage noir.
The lead actors try hard-none of the three has every made less than a full
effort, even when burdened with a bad script.  They try to invest every line
and gesture with meaning, and they create a convincing sense of the
relationships between the main characters.  Harry is fond of Jack but is in
love with Catherine.  Jack is dying of cancer and is jealous of Harry's love
for Catherine.  Catherine teases Harry and enjoys his attention, but her real
feelings are hidden beneath a carefully-maintained veneer.  "Twilight" wants to
be character-driven like "Nobody's Fool" (also directed by Benton, also
starring Newman, based on a novel by Russo) was, but the tired script gives the
actors too little to work with.
"Twilight" also squanders a fine supporting cast:  Stockard Channing (Harry's
friend on the police force), Reese Witherspoon (Jack & Catherine's bratty kid),
Giancarlo Esposito (the humorous sidekick), John Spencer (Harry's nemesis on
the force), Liev Schreiber and Margo Martindale (the blackmailers), and James
Garner (a cop who bailed movie stars out of trouble).

Title
Review for Wild Wild West (1999)
Another July Fourth weekend, another big Will Smith action/sci fi release. 
This time around, Smith stars in the big screen version of the "Wild Wild West"
TV series (1965-1970), a light-hearted, campy western with lots of science
fiction elements.  Although I'm generally opposed to the trend of making every
1960's TV series into a movie, I enjoyed "Wild Wild West."
It's 1869, a few years after the Civil War.  Government agent Jim West (Smith)
is tracking former Confederate general "Bloodbath" McGrath (Ted Levine, best
known as Buffalo Bill in "Silence of the Lambs"), who was responsible for
slaughtering a community of freed slaves which included Jim's parents.  Jim
collides with marshal and inventor Artemus Gordon (Kevin Kline), who is
following McGrath to find a group of kidnapped scientists.  President Grant
(also Kline) assigns Jim and Artie to work on the case together. 
They trail McGrath to Louisiana and find that the mastermind behind the
abduction of the scientists is Dr. Arliss Loveless (Kenneth Branagh), a mad
scientist who lost half of his body creating super-weapons for the Confederacy.
 Loveless plans to conquer the country and carve it up between himself and
various other nations.  With the help of a giant mechanical spider, Loveless
kidnaps the president just before Grant can drive the golden spike joining the
transcontinental railroad.
The appeal of "Wild Wild West" depends almost entirely on the charisma of Will
Smith.  There's a scene in the movie where he charms a mob that is ready to
lynch him, and that scene typifies Smith:  he is irresistibly funny and
likeable.  Since he's playing an action hero, Smith swaggers a lot, talks
tough, and acts cool, but it's his sense of humor and genial nature that make
the movie fun.
Also delightful is Branagh's performance.  Perhaps taking his cue from Jack
Nicholson's Joker, Branagh revels in playing a campy, over-the-top cartoon
villain.  His Southern accent is deliberately exaggerated (he can do a more
realistic one; check out "The Gingerbread Man"), and he grins broadly most of
the time.
The weak link is Kline.  He seems ill-pale, sagging, tired.  The buddy film
elements fall flat because Kline seems unable to hold up his end.  His usual
comic energy (on display as recently as "In & Out") is entirely absent.  He's a
bit funnier as Grant than as Artie.
For some reason, Salma Hayek is in this movie.  Her character, Rita Escobar, is
also on the trail of the scientists, but there are only token nods toward a
romance between Rita and either hero.  Rita wanders in and out of the movie,
and the audience is not motivated to notice either her presence or her absence.
The script, from writers responsible for "Tremors" and "Who Framed Roger
Rabbit?," has both strengths and weaknesses.  The overall plot (kidnapped
scientists, mad scientist plotting conquest, heroes with opposing personalities
thrown together) is tired and predictable.  However, there are small touches
that are clever.  I especially enjoyed how the gadgets Artie invents seem to
work with nineteenth-century technology.  For example, a miniature drill he
carries is powered by an air pump in his boot heel.  There is also a hint of
intelligence in the theme of national unity:  Loveless threatens to tear apart
the country which has only recently be rejoined and chooses to strike just
before the spike can be driven into the railroad that will physically unite
west and east.
Elmer Bernstein's score deserves special mention.  Smith's rap theme, which was
featured in the trailers, is saved for the end credits.  "Wild Wild" begins
with an updated version of the TV theme, and Bernstein (who's scored over 150
movies but is best known for "The Magnificent Seven") gives us rousing, heroic
music that draws on the long tradition of western movies.
Best known for "The Addams Family" and "Men in Black," director Barry
Sonnenfeld has a style that is free-flowing, bizarre, and fun.  Although his
work as a director lacks the depth of his work as a cinematographer under other
directors (most notably the Coen Brothers; Sonnenfeld photographed "Blood
Simple," "Raising Arizona," and "Miller's Crossing"), he can be relied upon to
deliver a movie that is visually interesting and unusual.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.wpd.net/madreview/

Title
Review for Galaxy Quest (1999)

Galaxy Quest
Reviewed by Christian Pyle
Directed by Dean Parisot  
Written by Robert Gordon and David Howard
Starring Tim Allen, Sigourney Weaver, Alan Rickman, Tony Shalhoub, Daryl
Mitchell, and Enrico Colantoni
Official Site: galaxyquest.com
Better Sites:  http://greatsci-fimovies.hypermart.net/galaxy_quest/
http://www.moviefanonline.com/previews/1999/galaxy_quest/galaxy_quest.htm
Grade:  B+
Somewhere out in space, the peaceful Thermians are being slaughtered by a
belligerent race of lizard people.  Their last hope:  Commander Peter Quincy
Taggart and the valiant crew of the Starship Protector, heroes the Thermians
know from Earth's broadcasts.  The Thermians travel to Earth to find Taggart. 
One little problem:  the Thermians don't know that the "historical documents"
they've received from Earth are actually episodes of "Galaxy Quest," a TV
series that was cancelled in 1982.
Eighteen years after the show ended, the cast of "Galaxy Quest" is still in
costume, making personal appearances at conventions, spouting catch phrases,
and lamenting the lack of other opportunities.  William Sha - uh, I mean -
Jason Nesmith (Tim Allen), who played Commander Taggart, is an egotistical boob
who doesn't realize how much his former co-stars hate him.  Alexander Dane
(Alan Rickman) played alien scientist Dr. Lazarus and now whines constantly
that he was once a Shakespearean actor.  Gwen DeMarco (Sigourney Weaver) wore a
tight, low-cut as Lt. Tawny Madison, whose only job aboard the Protector was to
repeat what the computer said.  Laidback Fred Kwan (Tony Shalhoub) was the
ship's engineer, and Tommy Webber (Daryl Mitchell of TV's "Veronica's Closet")
was the child star at the steering wheel.
A contingent of Thermians led by Mathesar (Enrico Colantoni of TV's "Just Shoot
Me") scoop up a hung-over Jason and whisk him up to a working replica of the
Protector to negotiate with General Sarris, leader of the lizard people. 
Accustomed to personal appearances with fans who earnestly believe the show is
real, Jason only realizes that he's actually been on a spaceship after the
Thermians beam him back to Earth.  By that afternoon, the Thermians are back
for more help, and this time Jason brings the rest of the cast, including Guy
Fleegman (Sam Rockwell), who played the ill-fated "Crewman # 6" in one episode
of "Quest."  To survive, the cast will have to learn how to play their parts
for real.
"Galaxy Quest" does for science fiction television what "Austin Powers" did for
60's spy movies. The script is smart and on target.  It's filled with funny
moments that satirize ridiculous plots, motifs, and characters common to the
genre as well as attacking the obsessive fan culture that still surrounds shows
decades after they're cancelled.  My favorite sequence has Jason and Gwen
racing through the bowels of the ship to stop it from blowing up when they're
confronted by a passageway lined with huge metal choppers sliding menacingly up
and down.  Gwen:  "It doesn't serve any purpose!  Why would they even build
anything like that!"  Jason:  "It was on the show!"  Gwen:  "The show was badly
written!" 
The cast is filled with comic talent, so much so that I was a little bummed
that Tony Shalhoub and Daryl Mitchell didn't get more screen time.  Sigourney
Weaver stood out (in more ways than one - considering the way her costume was
cut to accentuate her breasts), reminding me of the comic flair she showed
years ago in "Ghostbusters" and "Working Girl."
On the down side, the losers-rise-to-the-occasion-and-become-heroes plot is
predictable and thin.  More bothersome to me, however, were the serious moments
as Thermians are tortured by the evil lizard guys.  These scenes weighed down
the comedy that followed.  The theme of genocide (the small band of Thermians
aboard the ship are the last of their race) seems inappropriately heavy for
this movie.
Bottom Line:  There's more laughter than lulls, and I had a great time.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html
